CHAPTER I.
The
romance of history pertains to no human
annals more strikingly than to the early settlement
of Virginia. The mind of the reader at once
reverts to the names of Raleigh, Smith, and
Pocahontas
.
The traveller's memory pictures in a
moment the ivy-mantled ruin of old Jamestown.
About the year 16, the city of Jamestown,
then the capital of Virginia, was by no means an
unapt representation of the British metropolis;
both being torn by contending factions, and
alternately
subjected to the sway of the Roundheads and
Royalists.
First came the Cavaliers who fled hither after the
decapitation of their royal master and the
dispersion
of his army, many of whom became
permanent
settlers in the town or colony, and ever
afterwards
influenced the character of the state.
These were the first founders of the aristocracy
which prevails in Virginia to this day; these were
the immediate ancestors of that generous,
fox-hunting
,
wine-drinking, duelling and reckless race of
men, which gives so distinct a character to
Virginians
wherever they may be found.
A whole generation of these Cavaliers had
grown up in the colony during the interregnum,
and, throughout that long period, were tolerated
by those in authority as a class of probationers. The
Restoration was no sooner announced, however,
than they changed places with their late superiors
in authority. That stout old Cavalier and former
governor, Sir William Berkley (who had retired
to the shades of Accomack,) was now called by
the unanimous voice of the people, to reascend the
vice-regal chair.
Soon after his second installation came another
class of refugees, in the persons of Cromwell's
veteran
soldiers themselves, a few of whom fled
hither
on account of the distance from the court and
the magnitude of their offences against the reigning
powers. It will readily be perceived even by those
not conversant with the primitive history of the
Ancient Dominion, that these heterogeneous
materials
of Roundheads and Cavaliers were not the best
calculated in the world to amalgamate in the
social
circles.
Our story commences a short time after the death
of Cromwell and his son, and the restoration
of Charles the Second to the throne of his fathers.
1*
The city of Jamestown was situated upon an
island
in the Powhatan, about twenty leagues from
where that noble river empties its waters into those
of the Chesapeake Bay.
This island is long, flat on its surface, and
presents a semicircular margin to the view of one
approaching from the southeast; indeed it can
scarcely be seen that it is an island from the side
facing the riverthe little branch which separates it
from the main land having doubtless worn its way
around by a long and gradual process.
At the period of which we write, the city
presented
a very imposing and romantic appearance,
the landscape on that side of the river being
shaded
in the back ground by the deep green foliage
of impenetrable forests standing in bold relief for
many a mile against the sky. Near the centre of
the stream, and nearly opposite the one just
mentioned
,
stands another piece of land surrounded by
water, known to this day by the very
unromantic
name of Hog Island, and looking for all the
world like a nest for pirates, so impenetrable are the
trees, undergrowth, and shrubbery with which it is
thickly covered.
To prevent the sudden incursions of the
treacherous
savage, the city was surrounded with a wall
or palisade, from the outside of which, at the
northwestern end, was thrown a wooden bridge, so
as to connect the first mentioned island with the
main land. A single street ran nearly parallel with
the river, extending over the upper half of the
island
and divided in the centre by the public square.
On this were situated the Governor's mansion,
state house, church, and other public buildings.
Near where the line was broken by the space just
mentioned, stood two spacious tenements, facing
each other from opposite sides of the street. These
were the rival hotels of the ancient city; and, after
the fashion of that day, both had towering signposts
erected before their respective doors, shaped
something
like a gibbet, upon which swung
monotonously
in the wind two huge painted sign-boards.
These stood confronting each other like two angry
rivalsone bearing the insignia of the Berkeley
arms, by which name it was designated,and the
other the Cross Keys, from which it also received
its cognomen. The Berkley Arms was the
rendezvous
of all the Cavaliers of the colony, both
old and young, and but a short time preceding the
date of our story, was honoured as the place of
assembly
for the House of Burgesses.
The opposite and rival establishment received its
patronage from the independent or republican
faction.
It was late in the month of May, and towards
the hour of twilight; the sun was just sinking
behind
the long line of blue hills which form the
southwestern bank of the Powhatan, and the red
horizontal rays fell along the rich volume of
swelling
waters dividing the city of Jamestown from
the hills beyond with a line of dazzling yet not
oppressive
brilliance.
As the rich tints upon the water gradually faded
away, their place was supplied in some small
degree
from large lanterns which now might be seen
running half way up the signposts of the two
hotels
before mentioned, together with many lights of
less magnitude visible in the windows of the same
establishments and the various other houses within
reflecting distance of the scene. The melancholy
monotony of the rippling and murmuring waters
against the long graduated beach now also began to
give place to louder and more turbulent sounds, as
the negroes collected from their work to gossip
in the streetsIndians put off from the shore in
their canoes, or the young Cavaliers collected in
the Berkley Arms to discuss the news of the day or
perhaps a few bottles of the landlord's best. On
this occasion the long, well-scrubbed oaken table in
the centre of the News Room was graced by
the presence of some half dozen of the principal
youths of the city. In the centre of the table
stood the half-emptied bottle, and by each guest a
full bumper of wine, and all were eager to be
heard as the wine brightened their ideas and the
company received fresh accessions from without.
Oh, here comes one who can give us some news
from the Governor's, said the speaker
pro
tempore
,
as a handsome and high-born youth of
twenty-one
entered the room with a proud step and
haughty mien, and seated himself at the table as
a matter of course, calling for and filling up a wine
glass, and leisurely and carelessly throwing his cap
upon the seat and his arm over the back of the
next vacant chair, as he repliedNo, I bring
no news from the Governor's, but I mistake the
signs of the times if we do not soon hear news in
this quarter.
All eyes were now turned upon the youth as he
tossed off his wine. He was generally known among
his companions by the familiar name of Frank
Beverly, and was a distant kinsman and adopted
son of the Governor, Sir William Berkley. News
was no sooner mentioned than our host, turning a
chair upon its balance, and resting his chin upon
his hand, was all attention.
What is it, Frank? inquired Philip Ludwell,
his most intimate friend and companion.
Some mischief is brewing at the Cross Keys
to-night, replied Frank, as the landlord moved
up his chair nearer to the table, more than ever on
the
qui vive
, when the Cross Keys became the
subject
of discussion.
There is no one in the Tap of the Keys, as I
can see from here, said another of the party,
and there is no light in any other portion of the
house except the apartments of the family.
They hide their lights under a bushel,
continued
Frank, with an affected nasal twang and a
smile of contempt. Taking his nearest companion
by the lappel of his doublet, and drawing him
gently to where the rival establishment was visible
through the doorDo you not see a line of light
just perceptible along the margin of the upper
window
?
and if you will observe steadily for a
moment
,
you will see numerous dim shadows of
moving
figures upon the almost impenetrable curtain
which is drawn over it.
Master Beverly is right, by old Noll's nose,
said the landlord, as they all grouped together to
catch a glimpse of the objects mentioned.
You may well swear by Noll's nose in this
case, returned Frank, for unless I am much
mistaken, those motions and gestures proceed from
some of his late followers; indeed I know it. I
was accidentally coming up the alley-way between
the Keys and the next house, when I saw four or
five of them cross the fence into the yard, and from
thence enter the house by the back door.
That's true, I'll swear, said the host, for
there they are, some dozen of them at least, and
I'm a Rumper if a soul has darkened his front door
this night. But couldn't you, Master Beverly, or
one of the other young gentry, just step to the
stout Sir William's, and make an affidavy to the
facts? My word for it, he'd soon be down upon
'em with a fiery facias or a capias, or some such or
another invention of the law.
The youths all burst into a loud cachinnation at
the zeal of the landlord to unmask his rival, and
reseating themselves, called for another bottle,
which our friend of the Arms was not slow to
produce
,
by way of covering his retreat and hiding his
disinterested zeal. As they all refilled their glasses,
Frank waved his hand for silence. Has any
gentleman
here seen Mr. Nathaniel Bacon very
lately?
I have notI have not, replied each of the
party, and the interrogator then continued, I
would give the best pair of spurs that ever graced
a Cavalier's heels to know whether his long
absence
has had any thing to do with the getting up
of yonder dark conclave?
Whether any of the party were Bacon's
immediate
friends, or whether they suspected Frank's
motives in the case, we shall not undertake to
determine
at present; but certain it is they were all
silent on the point except his intimate friend
Ludwell
,
who repliedBy St. George, Beverly, I
believe you are jealous of Bacon on account of the
favourable light in which he is said to stand in the
eyes of your fair little mistress.
If I thought that Virginia Fairfax would
entertain
a moment's consideration for a person of
such doubtful parentage and more doubtful
principles
as Mr. Nathaniel Bacon, the ill-advised
proteg
of her father, I would forswear her for ever,
and dash this glass against the floor, with which I
now invite you all to join me in pledging her,
What say you? Will you join me, one and all?
All rose at the invitation, and while standing with
glasses suspended midway to their lips, Ludwell
added the name of the pretty Harriet Harrison.
It was drunk with three times three, and then the
landlord was brought up by the collar of his jerken
between two of the liveliest of the party, and made
to tell the reckoning upon the table with his
well-worn
chalk. Having settled the score, they
proceeded
to decant full half the remaining bottle
into one of his own pint flagons, seized from his
shelves for that purpose. Mine host made
sundry
equivocal contortions of the countenance, and
practised by anticipation several downward
motions
of the muscles of deglutition, and then
swallowed
the enormous potation without a groan.
There now, said Ludwell, bear it always in
your remembrance that a like fate awaits you,
whenever
your wine bears evidence of having passed
rather far into the state of acetous fermentation.
As the party were now leaving the room in pairs,
linked arm in arm, Stop! stop! cried
Beverly
;
I have one proposition to make before we
separate. It is this. You know that there is to be
a grand celebration the day after to-morrow, which
is the anniversary of the restoration. The whole to
conclude with a ball at the Governor's, to which I
feel myself authorized to say that you will all be
invited. Now I propose that we all go at different
hours to-morrow and engage the hand of the fair
Virginia for the first, second, third, fourth, fifth,
and sixth sets. So that when Mr. Nathaniel Bacon
returns, as he assuredly will, to claim her hand,
to which he seems to think he has a prescriptive
right, he will find no less than six different
successful
competitors. What say you, gentlemen?
The proposition was instantly acceded to by all
the party, and then the landlord of the Arms was
left to digest the pint of his own sour wine in
solitude
,
as he leaned his overgrown person against the
casings of the door and watched the youths as
they departed one by one in different directions to
their respective places of abode.
Natty Bacon is a goodly youth, however, he
muttered in soliloquy; ha, ha, ha; but he shall
know of the plot if I can only clap eyes on him
before they see the young lady. Let me see; can
it be possible that Natty can have any thing to do
with yonder dark meeting of Noll's men? I'll not
believe it; he is too good a youth to meddle with
such a canting, snivelling set as are congregated
there. He always pays his reckoning like any
gentleman's son of them all; and a gentleman's son
I'll warrant he is, for all that no one knows his
father but Mr. Gideon Fairfax.
The Cromwellians alluded to, who were
supposed
by the youths to be assembled at the Cross
Keys, were a few of the late Protector's veteran
soldiers, and were the most desperate, reckless and
restless of the republicans who, as has been already
mentioned, had fled to Jamestown after the
restoration
.
These soldiers were unfitted for any kind of
business, and generally lived upon the precarious
hospitality of those of their own party who had
settled themselves as industrious citizens of the
new community.
Vol. I. 2
The names of the leaders of these veteran
soldiers
and furious bigots were Berkinhead, Worley,
Goodenough and Proudfit; and of these the reader
will hear more anon.
CHAPTER II.
Late
in the afternoon of the day succeeding the
one designated in the last chapter, towards the
southwestern extremity of the beach and outside
of the palisade, a young and gentle creature, of
most surpassing loveliness, moved thoughtfully
along the sandy shore, every now and then casting
a wistful glance over the water, and as often
heaving
a gentle sigh, as a shade of girlish
disappointment
settled upon her blooming face. Her dress
was simple, tasteful, and exquisitely appropriate to
her style of beauty. She had apparently scarce
passed her sixteenth birthday; and of course her
figure was not yet rounded out to its full perfection
of female loveliness. So much of her neck as
was visible above a rather high and close cut
dress, was of that pure, chaste and lovely white
which gives such an air of heavenly innocence to
the budding girl of that delightful age. The face
although exceeding the neck in the height, variety
and richness of its colouring, was not disfigured
by a single freckle, scar or blemish. The features
were generally well proportioned and suited to
each other, the lips full and gently pouting, with a
margin of as luxurious tinting as that with which
nature ever adorned the first budding rose of spring,
and when parted, as they often were, by the most
gentle and
naive
laughter, displayed a set of teeth
beautifully white and regular. Yet one could
scarcely fasten the eye upon them for the
admiration
excited by the exquisite expression of the
dimpled
mouth, ever varying, and as it seemed,
more lovely with each succeeding change. The
motion of her eyes was so rapid that it was difficult
to ascertain their colour; but certain it is they
were soft and brilliant, the latter effect produced in
no small degree by long fair dewy lashes which
rose and fell over the picture, as lights and
shadows
fall from the pencil of an inspired painter.
The fair flaxen ringlets fell beneath the small
gipsey hat in short thick curls, and were clustered
around her brow, so as to form the most natural
and appropriate shade imaginable to a forehead of
polished ivory. She was about the medium height,
symmetrically proportioned, with an exquisitely
turned ankle and little foot, which
now
bounded
over the beach with an impatience only surpassed
by her own impetuous thoughts, as her eyes
became
intently riveted upon a moving speck upon
the distant waters. The wild and startled
expression
,
excited in the first moment of surprise, might
now be seen merging into one of perfect satisfaction,
as the distant object began to grow into distinct
outlines
at every plunge of the buoyant waves; her heart
heaving its own little current to her face in
perfect
unison with their boisterous movements.
A beautifully painted canoe soon ran its curled
and fantastic head right under the bank upon
which she stood, and in the next moment a gallant
and manly youth leaped upon the shore by her
side, and taking her unresisting hand, gently
removed the gipsey hat so as to bring into view a
certain crimsoning of the neck and half avertod
face. Nathaniel Bacon, the youth just landed,
was about twenty-one, and altogether presented an
appearance of the most attractive and commanding
character. He wore a green hunting jerken,
buttoned close up to his throat so as to show off to
the best advantage a broad and manly chest.
Upon his head was a broad brimmed unstiffened
castor, falling over his shoulders behind, and
looped up in front by a curiously wrought broach.
A small brass hunting horn swung beneath one
shoulder, while to the other was suspended a short
cut and thrust sword. In his hand he bore a
fishing
rod and tackle.
Few as evidently were his years, much painful
thought had already shadowed his handsome and
commanding features with a somewhat precocious
maturity. It was obviously, however, not the
natural
temperament of the man which now shone
out in his features, after the subsiding of the first
glow of delighted feeling visible for an instant as
he watched the heightened bloom on the
countenance
of the maiden.
You were not irreconcilably offended then at
my rash and disrespectful behaviour to your father
at our last meeting?
Certainly not irreconcilably so, Nathaniel, if
2*
offended at all; but I will confess to you candidly,
that I was hurt and mortified, as much on your
own, as on my father's account.
You are always kind, considerate and
forgiving
,
Virginia, and it behooves me in presence of
so much gentleness, to ease my conscience in some
measure by a confession. You have sometimes,
but I have never, forgotten that I was thrown upon
your father's hospitality an orphan and an outcast.
This fact constantly dwells upon my mind, and
sometimes harrows up my feelings to such a degree
that I am scarcely conscious of my words or
actions
.
It was so on the occasion alluded to. I
forgot your presence, the respect due to your
father
and my benefactor, as well as what was due to
myself. I had been endeavouring to revive some of
the drunken reminiscences of that eccentric fellow
who sits in the canoe there, but they tended only
to inflame my ardent desire to know something
more of myself. Certainly some allowances must
be made for me, Virginia, under the mortifying
circumstances in which I am placed. I thought
your father could and ought to relieve this cruel
suspense.
He will if he can, Nathaniel; and that he does
not do so immediately, is the best evidence to my
mind either that he knows nothing on the subject,
or that some powerful reason exists why he should
not disclose his knowledge at present. Come, then,
return with me to our house; my father will
take no notice of your absence or its cause, unless
to jest with you upon your want of success in
your fishing expedition, which it seems was the
ostensible motive of your absence.
It was my purpose to return, but I had not so
amiably settled the how and the when; indeed the
objects I had in view were so urgent that I
determined
to brave even your father's continued anger
in order to obtain an interview with you.
With me, Nathaniel!
Ay, with you, Virginia! You know that
there are on the island some restless and turbulent
spiritslate soldiers of the Protector. They have
some dangerous project brewing I am well satisfied,
from circumstances which accidentally fell under
my own observation. You know too that the
Recluse
is said to have unbounded influence with
these desperate men, and to be familiar with all
their designs and movements. And
notwithstanding
your childish dread of him, you know that he
loves you more than any living creature.
I know all the things you speak of, except the
last, and for that I suspect I am indebted to your
imagination; but to what does all this lead?
I have just returned from a visit to that strange
and mysterious old man, and as I have already
hinted, hastened hither for the purpose of seeking
an interview with you, which fortune has so
opportunely
thrown in my way.
But I am yet in the dark. Why did you
hasten from the Recluse to me, after discovering
the things you speak of?
I will tell you; but you must be cool, calm
and considerate while I do so, because I have that
to tell and that to propose which will astound
you!
Oh do tell it at once then, and not play upon
my feelings thus.
Your father's and your uncle's life is in danger,
Virginia! Heaven, what have I done? he
continued
,
as he saw his companion turn deadly pale
and lean against the palisade for support. But
instantly
recovering herself she asked.
Whence does this danger come?
That I do not know exactly; but the Recluse
knows, and I have been vainly endeavouring to
learn it from him; and this brings me to the
proposition
which I have to make. You must visit
him this night! Ay, Virginia! start not, you must
do it for your father's and your uncle's sake!
Visit the Recluse, and at night! What will my
parents say to it, think you?
They must not know one word of it.
Then it is absolutely out of the question.
Do not say so, Virginia, till you hear me out.
As I have already said, the Recluse loves you
better
than he does any creature in the colony. He
knows all the plots and counterplots that are
going
on, and if you will surprise him with a visit
to-night, he will divulge the whole affair to you.
Why must it be to-night?
Because there is no time to be lost. To-morrow
is the anniversary of the Restoration. There is
to be a grand celebration during the day, and a
ball at night; this opportunity is to be taken
advantage
of in some way or other by the desperate
men alluded to. If we wait till to-morrow, and
make our visit publicly, these men will all know
of it, and its very object be counteracted by that
circumstance.
Your reasons are plausible I confess, Nathaniel,
and secret enemies are at all times dreadful, but
your alternative is scarcely less so.
I will pledge my life for your safety. You
have the keys of your father's house at command,
you can go and return through the servants' hall
when they are all asleep. No sentinels are placed
on the walls since the general peace with the
confederated
tribes of Indians. My canoe lies under
the first abutment of the bridge. I will watch
you from your father's door till you arrive there.
We can then cross the creek in the canoe, so that
no one will see us at the bridge. Brian O'Reily
shall wait on the opposite shore with my horse
and pillion for you, and another for himself. What
then is there so much to be dreaded in this simple
nocturnal excursion to a retired old man, who, to
say the worst of him, is nothing more than
fanatical
on religious subjects, and certainly he is very
wise and learned upon all others.
It is the clandestine nature of the expedition
that I object to, Nathaniel; it is so hurriedat such
a strange hour too. At all events I must have a
little time to consider of the propriety of the step.
Certainly, you shall have as much time as the
nature of the case will admit of. But see, the long
shadows of the trees are already extending across
the river and the birds are seeking their resting
places for the night.
Oh, happy little songsters! would to Heaven
that my rest could be as sweet and tranquil as
theirs this night? But Nathaniel, at what hour
shall I meet you at the bridge, provided I
determine
upon the step you propose?
As the clock from the tower of the church
strikes eleven I will be at my post. And as he
stepped into his canoe, he continued,
Remember
,
Virginia, that it is your own peace and your
father's safety that I am endeavouring to secure in
the course I urge you to adopt.
As the little vessel rose and sunk over the
swelling
waves in its passage round the town, Virginia
stood on the brink of the river and gazed upon
the scene in a deeply meditative mood, very new to
her young and hitherto careless heart. At length
when her late companion had long
disappeared
from her sight, and the sombre shadows of
evening were fast closing around the ancient city,
she slowly passed into the gates of the palisade
and sought her father's dwelling.
CHAPTER III.
Violent
was the struggle of contending
emotions
within the bosom of Virginia Fairfax, when
she had gained her own apartment, and strove to
form her determination in the matter proposed by
Nathaniel Baoon. On such occasions feeling usurps
the place of reason, and the longer we deliberate,
the more perplexing seem to grow our doubts and
difficulties. If, however, there were powerful
feelings
contending against the enterprise, there were
equally if not more powerful ones operating in its
favour. Not the least among these was the
estimation
in which she held both him who proposed
the nocturnal expedition and him whose advice
and aid were expected to be gained. Bacon
himself
,
it was generally believed, had acquired most
of his knowledge of books from the mysterious
personage alluded to, and he in his turn had been
the instructer of his fair young associate and
playmate
.
It is true that these relations of the several
parties had somewhat changed of late years, as the
two younger ones approached the age at which
their continuance might be deemed improper, to
say nothing of any little misgivings of which, they
might themselves be conscious, as to the nature of
many strange and novel impressions, the growth
of years and intimacy, perhaps, but not suspected
until with advancing years came change of relative
situation and prospect for the future.
All the various relations of our heroine to the
other parties presented themselves in successive
aspects to her view, as she endeavoured honestly to
decide the matter according to the dictates of duty.
While she was thus deliberating, the usual evening
meal was announced. As she entered the apartment,
and beheld her father and mother waiting for her
to assume the head of the table, which on account
of the latter's delicate health had been her custom
of late, all the contending emotions which had so
lately occupied her mind were renewed with
increasing
force by the sight of the beloved objects
in whose behalf she was solicited to undertake the
strange adventure.
Gideon Fairfax, the father of Virginia, was one of
the Cavaliers, before alluded to, who fled to
Jamestown
during the interregnum. He was
brother-in-law
to the Governor of the colony, and was, at the
time of which we write, a member of the council.
He was one of that remarkable race of men which
has so powerfully influenced the destinies of the
Ancient Dominion from that day to the present.
He was rather above the medium height, with light
hair and eyes, and although he had considerably
passed the prime of life, there was a sparkling of
boyish vivacity in his eyes, and a cheerful
expression
always hovering about his mouth, which
instantly
dispelled any thing like formality in his
intercourse
with others. Yet withal there was a bold,
reckless daring in his look, together with an
openhearted
sincerity which served to give a manly
dignity to the lighter expressions already
mentioned
.
To his only daughter he was most devotedly
attached.
Mrs. Emily Fairfax seemed about the same age
as her husband, and though she still preserved
some evidence of former beauty, her countenance
was now mostly indebted for any charm that it
possessed to a mild, lady-like and placid serenity,
which was occasionally shadowed by an air of
melancholy so profound, that more than once
her friends were alarmed for her reason. As
Virginia assumed her place at the board, the
conflict
in her mind was in nowise subdued by
observing
that one of these melancholy visitations
was just settling upon her mother's countenance;
indeed there seemed to be a mutual discovery on
the part of mother and daughter, that each had
some secret cause of uneasiness; but the effect was
by far the most painful to the mother's heart, as it
was the first time that she had ever seen her
daughter's gay and happy temperament seriously
disturbed. The parting hour for the night
arrived
,
without making either of them wiser as to
the cause of the other's pre-occupation and evident
anxiety; the mother having sought an explanation
in vain, and the daughter being too much
accustomed
to her present state of mind to intrude
farther
upon her sorrows, whatever might be their
cause or nature. Bacon's arguments prevailed, and
Vol. I. 3
long before the hour appointed, Virginia was sit
ting at the window, her light extinguished, mantle
drawn close around her to exclude the damp air
from the river, and her hat tied on in readiness
for the expedition.
At length the town clock began to send its slow
and solemn sounds across the water. The house
was still and dark, and the inmates apparently
wrapped in profound slumber. Her own
clandestine
movements, so new to her, seemed like the
trampling of armed heels rather than the footfalls
of her own slight figure. More than once she was
on the point of retracing her steps, so tumultuous
and painful were her emotions in prosecuting an
adventure which still appeared to her of such
questionable
propriety. The servants' hall, garden, and
postern gate were all passed without the slightest
interruption, save an occasional start at her own
shadow, or the impetuous beating of her agitated
heart. The moon was at her zenith, and the clouds
coursing high in the heavens, so as every now and
then to obscure her reflected beams, and present
alternate and fantastic contrasts of light and shade
upon the surrounding objects. The river for one
moment looked like a dark abyss, and the next
a mirror of light as the silver rays fell sparkling
upon the rippling waters beneath the bridge. The
interminable forest beyond was at one moment dark
as Erebus, and the next as light as fairy land. There
is no appearance of the heavens, perhaps, which
produces a greater tendency in the mind to
undefined
and superstitious terror than that which we
have attempted to describe. Our own shadow,
visible
as it is only for an instant, will startle us; and
the ill-omened birds of night acquire huge and
unnatural
proportions as they flit swiftly by on
noiseless
wings in this rapid alternation of light and
gloom. The wolves and other beasts of prey might
be heard at long intervals, as their wild and savage
howls broke upon the ear, reverberating from cliff
to cliff as they fell upon and were borne across the
water. Under these circumstances it may be
readily
imagined that our heroine was not a little
relieved
at the sight of Bacon leaning against the
nearest abutment of the bridge, anxiously watching
for her approach. In a few moments he had
seated
his companion in the boat, upon a cushion
formed
of his cloak, and was rapidly approaching the
opposite shore. When they arrived at the
appointed
rendezvous, a very unexpected source of
uneasiness
was speedily discovered. As has been
already
intimated, Bacon had early in the evening
despatched
his usual attendant, Brian O'Reily, across
the bridge to wait their arrival. The horses were
indeed thereand O'Reily was there, but so
intoxicated
as to be apparently in no condition to
guide the motions of a horse, even should he be
able to keep the saddle. Bacon lost all patience at
this discovery, and would perhaps have taken
summary
and not very agreeable means to sober his
attendant, had he not been reminded by his gentle
companion of the peculiar and privileged position
which Brian had from time immemorial enjoyed
in his service, as well as that of their own family.
How comes it, sir, said the young man, that
I find you in this predicament when I gave you
such strict injunctions to keep yourself sober? Now
of all other times!when I had taken so much
trouble to instruct you whom you were to guard,
and upon what expedition?
By the five crasses but you've hit the very
nail upon the head. By the contints of the book
but that's the very rason I took a dhrop of the
crathur
!
What is the reason, you drunken old fool?
The business were an to be sure! you wouldn't
be after axing a sinner like Brian O'Reily to ixpose
himself to sich a timptation widout taking a dhrop,
and may be your haner would do that same for all
your spaking aginst it so intirely.
And what may the nature of the temptation
be of which you speak?
And is it Brian you're after axin? O be gorra,
but that's runnin away wid the story intirely, so
it is; sure it's me should be axin your haner after
that same!
None of your subterfuges, sir! I am
determined
to know your ideas of this dreadful
temptation
.
By my purty an is it Brian's idaas you're
axin
after, divil a miny o' them he's got any way,
barrin a small bit of a smotherin about the heart
whenever I think of the business we're on, and
the gintleman we're goin to see, savin your
prisence
and the beauty o' the world by your side.
What gentlemanspeak out and I will forgive
your drunkenness, provided you give me up that
bottle I see peeping from the pouch of your jerkin.
An is'nt it the man widout the shadow you're
after making a tay party wid?
And who is the man without a shadow,
Brian
?
inquired Virginia, willing to forget her own
misgivings in the more ludicrous superstition of
the son of the Emerald Isle, whose countrymen, it
may be remarked, formed no inconsiderable part
of the inferior population of the city at that day.
Oh bad cess to me, but I'm as glad to see you
as two tin pinnies, you beauty o' the world; but it
bates all the love I had for you and ever had these
ten years past to see where you'r going.
Well, where is it, Brian?
Hav'nt I tould your ladyship it was to a tay
party wid the inimy himself.
Come, see if you can assist Virginia to the
pillion, said Bacon, as he sprang into the saddle.
By my purty and I'll do that same; kneeling
upon one knee and taking one foot in his hand,
and then seating her as easily and gracefully as if
he had been a stranger to the bottle for a month.
I had no idea that you were such a coward,
Brian, continued his master.
Sorra a dhrop o' coward's blood runs in Brian
O'Reily's heart, iny way. It's one thing to trate
3 *
the grate inimy with dacent respect, and its
another
to fight the yellow nagres that go dodgin
from tree to tree like so many frogs; the devil fly
away wid the one and the t'other o' them for me,
I say.
And who is the great enemy?
Sure hav'nt I tould your haner and the beauty
o' the world by your side, it was the man widout
a shadow what lives in the stone house widout
windows
,
as well he may, seein the light o' his own
counthenance may be seen across the river the
darkest
night any day.
Sit your horse straight, you drunken piece of
stupidity, or you will break your neck.
Oh! an if Brian never breaks his neck till he
falls from a horse, sure he'll live to take many a
dhrop of the crathur yet before he dies. Sure I
was only crassin myself, divil a word o' lie's in
that, iny way.
There, I have broken one of your necks at
least, said Bacon, as with the butt of his riding
whip he struck the neck from a bottle which every
now and then peeped from Brian's pocket as the
motions of the horse raised him in the saddle.
Oh! murther all out, but you'll come to want
yet before you die. Oh sure, but the crathur's safe
after all. Wo, ye divil of a baste, don't you hear
the crathur all runnin down the wrang side o' me,
Wo, I say! Oh but the bottle sticks as tight to
the pouch as if it growed there. Oh murther all
out, I'm ruined, I'm ruined intirely.
Draw your arm from your jerken, Brian, and
then you can drink out of your pocket, said
Virginia
,
suppressing a laugh.
Oh you beauty o' the world, see what it is to
have the larnin, replied the Irishman,
immediately
adopting the expedient; but here a new
difficulty
presented itself. Oh murther, but the
gable
end's all knocked off and fax the chimney went
along with it. Oh, but the crokery sticks up all
round like pike staffs. Wo you murthur'n baste;
Now I've got it, now I've got it, you beauty; sorra
one of the lane cows at Jamestown gives sich milk
as that, fax if they did, I'd be head dairyman to
the Governor any way.
Thus our adventurers beguiled the way through
a dreary and-trackless forest of some miles, until
they approached a spot where Bacon signified to
the party that they had accomplished so much of
their journey as was to be performed on horseback.
What farther befell them will be described in the
ensuing chapter.
CHAPTER IV.
Bacon
and his companion having left O'Reily
with the horses, now commenced descending an
immense hill which formed one side of a dark and
dismal looking glen. The tall pine trees with
which the higher grounds were covered seemed to
reach half way to the clouds. A cold midnight
breeze swept through the damp and dewy foliage
of the trees and shrubbery. The birds of night
chimed mournfully and dismally in unison with
the monotonous rustling of the leaves, and the
rippling
of a little brook just before them. When
they had stepped across the stream, and cast their
eyes up the face of the opposite hill, the rays of
the moon suddenly broke through a fissure of the
clouds, revealing to them rather the darkness
around than any distinct traces of the path which
they were to pursue. Bacon stood for an instant,
and gazed intently upon a little spot of partially
cleared ground half way to the summit, then gently
drawing his companion to the same place where he
stood, and pointing upwards, he said Do you not
perceive something moving yonder? It is he!
you must now proceed alone!
Alone, Nathaniel? Impossible!
You must, Virginia; he will not admit more
than one person at a time within his cell. Fear not
there is no earthly danger; I will be within call.
Rouse your drooping courage! the worst half of
your undertaking is now accomplished.
By far the worst half is yet to come,
Nathaniel
;
you can form no conception of the awe with
which I look upon that being! You forget that I
have never seen more of him than I see now,
notwithstanding
you say that he is so much attached
to me.
It is strange, I confess, Virginia, but it is
nevertheless
true.
His affection, if it exists, must be the fruit of
your representations as to some imaginary
proficiency
in my studies.
Not at all; he seems to know every one in
Jamestown, and all the circumstances connected
with their history: but come, Virginia, we are
losing precious time. Move on and fear nothing.
Clasping her hands, and internally summoning
up all her resolution, she advanced with a sort of
desperate determination. Having arrived within
some forty yards of the spot before alluded to, the
outlines of a gigantic figure could easily be
discerned
as his footfalls were distinctly heard
moving
restlessly to and fro on a sort of platform or
level space, left by nature or formed by art, in the
side of the hill. His head towered far above the
stunted undergrowth, interspersed among the
rugged
outlines of the scene. And as he impatiently
measured the narrow limits of this outer court to
his castle, he seemed not unlike a chafed and
hungry
monarch of the forest when making the narrow
rounds of his iron bound limits. Having gone thus
far, she was sensible that it was nearly as bad to
recede
as go forward, and that if she retreated now
upon the very eve of the fulfilment of all that
Bacon
had promised, her past anxieties would have
been endured for nothing: she braced her nerves
therefore, and endeavoured to subdue the
overpowering
terror which the distant view of this
strange and mysterious man had excited.
Summoning
all her resolution for one desperate effort,
she threw herself forward and fell at the feet of
the huge mortal, who stood apparently astounded
at the abrupt appearance of his unwonted and
untimely
visiter. When Virginia found courage
enough to raise her lately closed eyes, she was not
a little astonished to see him leaning against the
stone walls of his cell, no less agitated than
herself
.
He was apparently about sixty years of age,
his hair slightly silvered, and his features worn
and weatherbeaten, yet eminently handsome. His
person was very remarkable, being about six feet
and a half in height and perfectly proportioned.
His dress conformed in some degree to the military
fashions of the day, having however rather the
appearance of undress than full uniform. The
expression
of his countenance was decidedly
intellectual
;
and about the lower part of his face there
were some indications of a disposition to
sensuality
,
but tempered and controlled in no ordinary
degree
by some other fierce and controlling passion,
His eye was wild and unsettled at times, and again
assumed the mild serenity of the profound student.
Altogether, his presence was intellectual and
commanding
in the highest degree.
As he stood against the wall of his cell quaking
like an aspen, an indifferent observer would have
been at a loss to determine which was the most
agitated, he or his gentle visiter. Virginia noted
with more than one furtive glance his strange and
unexpected embarrassment, still however,
preserving
her humble and supplicating posture. At
length, struggling with the emotions which
unmanned
him, muttering all the while broken
sentences
which fell strangely upon her ear, and
among which she could distinguish repeated
allusions
to herself, and to events of long passed years,
recalled as it appeared by some fancied
resemblance
traced by his excited imagination in her
form and features. He approached the kneeling
maiden, and taking her hand, he raised her from
the ground, and said in a tone of kindness, My
wayward fancies frighten thee, my child; be not
alarmed, howeverthere is nothing here to harm
thee. My house is poor and cheerless, but such
as it is, thou art welcome to its shelter, and to any
services which I can render to thee. Come, my
daughter, let us in from the damps of the night.
The cell of the Recluse was formed on three
sides by stone walls without windows, as O'Reily
had described them, the fourth being furnished by
the side of the hill, and the roof an arch of ma
sonry overgrown with moss, grass and weeds.
[1]
[1]
A house very similar to that we have described stands to this
day near the Ancient City. Its former objects and uses are entirely
unknown.
Pressing open the rude door, he entered, followed by
Virginia. Near one corner of the room stood a
common deal table, on which was placed a small
iron lamp, and near to it a three legged stool of the
rudest construction. These were the only articles
of furniture of which the apartment could boast.
The floor, which consisted of the earth, as nature had
made it, was overgrown with weeds and bushes.
This, said he, with a bitter smile upon his
countenance
,
is my hall of audience! Here I receive
my guests, with one solitary exception; thou shalt
be another. Having thus spoken, he took the
lamp from the table, and drawing aside some dried
bushes which were piled against the side formed
by the hill in apparent carelessness, he exhibited to
her view the mouth of a cavern, not sufficient in
height by several feet to admit his person in the
erect position. This, said he, as he stooped to
enter, is not a house made with hands, and it is
built upon a rock of ages. The rains may descend,
floods may come, winds blow and beat upon it,
but it falleth not. It is proper that thou shouldst
see it, and such has long been my intention. I
have much to say to thee, and doubtless thou hast
something to communicate to me, or thou wouldst
not have made this visit. But not a whisper of
what thou mayst see or hear must ever pass thy
lips, save to those I shall authorize thee to make
partakers of thy knowledge. This is a condition
which thou must impress upon thy mind.
Stepping
in a bent position within the mouth of the
cavern, he moved forward and downward,
motioning
her to follow. They descended many rude and
natural steps, which were imperfectly seen by the
light of the lamp borne by her singular guide, the
rays being often obscured by the bulk and great
height of his person in the narrow passages of the
cave, so that she was more than once
compelled
to grope her way by sliding her hand along
the cold damp and dripping walls, and by slipping
her feet over the uneven ground, without raising
them in the act of stepping. Having completed
the descent, she found herself in a long natural
vestibule to the inner apartmens. Her guide had
gained rapidly upon her, so that when once more
upon level ground, some thirty feet below the
outer
surface of the earth, he was almost out of sight.
She would have cried out, had she not been
restrained
by a counteracting feeling, which placed her in
a grievous dilemma between horror at the dismal
place, and fear of the singular being who had
undertaken to guide her through its recesses.
Commending
herself however to her Maker in mental
prayer, and trusting in his protection the more
confidently on account of the motive for her
undertaking
,
she hastened forward so as with great
exertions
to keep within sight of the rising and
sinking
light of the lamp, and the devious windings of
Vol. I. 4
the cavern. The footballs of her Herculean guide
rechoed along the damp and gloomy tunnels
with an awful and dismal effect, amidst the
gravelike
stillness of the place. Occasionally flickering
shadows were reflected against the walls, when the
light turned suddenly round a projecting rock,
affording
to her imagination the most startling and
frightful images. While her mind was
combatting
these unreal terrors, she was surprised by the
tone of a deep hoarse voice abruptly rumbling
through the high dark arches far above her head,
with that reverberating sound peculiar to these
secret
places of the earth. But her amazement was
still greater, when lifting her eyes in the
direction
of the lamp she beheld the Recluse
standing
upon a lofty but narrow ledge of rock, the
lamp flickering and sinking every now and then
so as to threaten total darkness. He was pointing
with his finger, and directing her to a projecting
and winding pathway by which she must ascend
to the platform upon which he stood. This once
gained, she had a complete view of the resting place
of her mysterious guide.
Immediately fronting the platform was a natural
doorway, about as high as her own head, leading
into the inner chamber. From the high and
vaulted
arches hung thousands of the fantastic creations
of hoary time, and from the centre of these a cord
swung into the middle of the area, to which was
suspended a burning lamp, the rays of which were
brilliantly reflected from a thousand shining
mirrors
of nature's forming. In one corner she
discovered
,
as they entered, several pieces of fire-arms,
and against the wall on one side hung huge swords,
long enough for two-handed weapons to ordinary
mortals, together with Indian war clubs,
moccasins
,
wampum, pipes, tomahawks, spears, arrows,
and other implements of savage warfare. In another
corner stood a rude bedstead, evidently
constructed
by the hands of its nightly occupant, a small
table, two or three chairs, and a few culinary
articles
,some
the manufacture of the savages, and
others the product of civilized ingenuity. By
far the largest part of one side of the room was
occupied by coarsely constructed shelves,
bearing
many volumes of the most venerable
appearance
.
One of these was lying open upon the table,
a pair of horn spectacles upon the page to mark the
place where the owner had last been engaged. The
very letters in which it was printed were entire
strangers to the eyes of our heroine. Some thirty
yards distant, in the remotest part of the room, a
little furnace diffused a narrow circle of glowing
light through its otherwise gloomy precincts.
These completed the establishment, so far as the
eye could discover its arrangement.
When he had led Virginia into the inhabitable part
of this area, he placed a chair, and motioned for
her to be seated, drawing a stool near the table at
the same time for himself, and resting his head
upon the palm of his hand. I will not affect
ignorance of thy name and person, my daughter,
nor yet of thy errand here. The first I should
most certainly have known, if I had not surmised
the last. Alas! my child, thou wilt think no
doubt that I speak in riddles when I tell thee that
those features have been engraven upon the heart
of one who has forsworn the world for many a
long and irksome year. Thou mayest well look
amazed, my poor bewildered child, but it is true!
I cannot explain it to thee now, however; some
day perhaps thou mayest know all. Oh, if thou
couldst imagine what events must take place in this
little isolated world around Jamestown, before the
mysteries of which I speak can rightfully be made
clear to thee, thou wouldst fall upon thy knees and
pray that such disastrous knowledge might never
come to thy understanding!
As his eye rested from time to time, while he
spoke, upon the features of the beautiful girl, he
covered his face with his hands, and seemed for
an instant to give way to an agitation similar to
that which unnerved him at her first appearance on
the platform. Occasionally too, when not
speaking
himself, he became profoundly abstracted for a
moment, and his eye was wild and restless, and
not a little alarming to his gentle visiter, as it ever
and anon fell upon herself, and seemed to gather in
her face the solution of some subtle doubt of his
troubled mind. But observing that his glances,
wild as they were, always became humanized and
softened as they rested upon her face, she seized
the first opportunity to complete the object of her
journey, not well knowing how it might
terminate
,
being herself ignorant of its especial object,
and indeed of the very nature of the threatened
danger.
Father, I came here to seek your aid and
protection
for those who are near and dear to me;
My honoured parentsmy mothershe would
have proceeded, but at the mention of her mother's
name he was seized with such a convulsive shudder
that she paused in astonishment. It seemed as if
the hand of death was already laying its cold grasp
upon his vitals. His eye gleamed wildlyhis lips
trembled, and his hands shook as one stricken with
the palsy, or overwhelmed by some sudden stroke
of calamity. By a desperate effort of resolution,
he speedily resumed his attention to the discourse,
and she proceeded: I have been advised and
urged in my resort to this step by one not unknown
to you, under the vain hope, I fear, that you were
cognizant of some threatened danger to my dear
parents and kindred, and that you would
communicate
the knowledge to me rather than to him.
As I have already said, my daughter, I
surmised
that something of this nature was the object
of thy visit, and I will now confess to thee that
this appeal places me in an embarrassing position
between some friends of former and better days
and my desire to grant thy request. Pausing and
apparently soliloquizing, he continued: But
have they not acted against my advice? Did I not
4 *
tell them, that we had had enough of that already?
Did I not warn them against this very result? I
cannot betray them, however; no, no, my old
comrades, I will give you another warning, and
then your blood, if it must flow, be upon your
own heads. He was about to resume his discourse
to his visiter, but stopping suddenly and raising
his finger in the attitude of one listening in the
profoundest attention, he seized the small lamp,
rushed past the little furnace in the direction of the
cave through the hill opposite the entrance, at one
time rising and anon descending, until Virginia
(who had followed, fearing to be left alone)
supposed
they must be again near the surface of the
earth. He paused once more to listen, motioning
her at the same time to be silent. He had
scarcely
done so, when the distant sound of running
water
struck upon her ear,sometimes distinct, and
again as if buried in the bowels of the earth. Then
came the noise as of a stone splashin in the
water
.
The eye of the Recluse sparkled as he
turned
with a quick and expressive glance towards his
companion. He hastily applied his ear to the rocky
side of the cavern and listened for a second, then
hurried back, taking Virginia by the hand in his
return, and leading her to her former seat. He
then busied himself for a few moments in
exchanging
the short cutlass by his side for one of the huge
weapons hanging on the wall, and placed a pair of
large and richly inlaid petronels in his belt, as if
about to march on some secret and desperate
expedition
.
Whether these were really for such a purpose,
or were his usual preparations for repose,
Virginia
was entirely at a loss to determine. Meantime
she had an opportunity to survey the features and
expression of his countenance, as he from time to
time faced towards her, intently engaged with
his occupation, and muttering all the while words
to her altogether inexplicable at the time.
His large and light blue eye had an expression
of forced resignation and calmness, drops of cold
perspiration stood upon his brow, lip, and bald
head, which was now uncovered. His features
were large and striking, but well proportioned, the
lips protuberant, the teeth large, white and regular,
and as a smile, indicative more of wretchedness than
mirth, played upon his face, the impression was
irresistible that the wrinkles which marked his
features
were the impress of suffering rather than of
age. In his personal as well as mental attributes
he was eminently gifted, though there seemed to
be a settled design, as much to clothe the one in
the garb of age, as to exhibit the other, if at all, in
meekness and huminity.
It is not consistent with my duty to all parties
in this business, my daughter, to enlighten thee as
to the nature of the danger which threatens thy
friends, or as to the means of preventing it. I owe
it to myself, first to warn those from whom it
comes, yet once more against their undertaking,
as I have already donebut thus far in vain. If
they are still deaf to my admonition and
entreaes
,
rest assured that I will leave no power or
influence
within my control unexerted to thwart
their purposes. Thou mayest therefore direct him
who must have conducted thee hither, to see me
early on the morrow, and I will inform him as to
the result of my endeavours and the best means to
pursue in case they are unsuccessful. Rest thou
contented yet a little while; I see thou art
impatient
,
but I have some things to say to thee
concerning
other matters than those which brought
thee hither. I see thou art studying these
evidences
of years in my features as the forester
examines
the rings in the fallen tree to estimate its
age, but these (pointing to the wrinkles) are records
which years alone could not have wrought. Few
of us, my daughter, can read these marks of time
and destiny, and trace through them one by one,
the disappointed hopes, the cruel mishaps, the
hair-breadth adventures, their failure, sealed
perhaps
in the blood of those who had basked together
with us in the sunshine of youth and hope,
without
a sinking of the heart within us, and a deep
sense of the utter worthlessness of all those gay
illusions which beam so brightly on thy own
youthful
features.
I allude to this subject now, my daughter,
because
there seems to be some connexion between
it and the one upon which I have been so anxious
to commune with thee. Although we have never
met before, it is not the first time I have seen thee,
nor is this, which thou hast given me, the first
information
I have received concerning thee and
thine. I have taken some pains to learn even the
minutest circumstances connected with thy past
history, present occupation and future prospects.
I see thy surprise, but it was not done in idle
gossip
thou mayest be well assured. My motives will
all be made plain enough to thee some day. In the
mean time I must approach a subject which I fear
will give thee pain, but my duty is imperative, I
mean the state of thy mind and feelings.
Alas, father, I fear you will find them but too
deeply engrossed with the cares and pleasures of
this world.
Thy mistake is a natural one, said he, (one
of those smiles of wretchedness passing over his
pale countenance, as a flash of electricity darting
along the horizon sometimes shows us the extent
and depth of the darkness beyond) my situation
and past misfortunes would indeed seem to fit me
for a teacher of holy things, but my present
business
is with thy worldly affections. Start not, my
daughter; I have the most urgent reasons which a
mortal can have for thus endeavouring to intrude
myself into thy feminine secrets; believe me, no
trifling cause could impel me thus to startle thy
maidenly delicacy, nor indeed needest thou be
startled on one account which I see agitates thee.
Thou very naturally supposest me to have some
charge to bring against thee for want of proper
spirit and maidenly reserve; I see it by thy
blushes; but there is no such thought within my
breast; thou mayest have been even more guarded
than is customary with females of thy age. My
business is with facts, and facts of such a nature
that however stubborn they may be, I fear that
thou art unconscious of them, though they relate to
thyself and one other person only. However,
without
bringing thee to confessional, I think I can
sufficiently
put thee upon thy guard without
wounding
thy delicacy. The only question in my own
mind is, whether the time to speak has not already
passed.
I am at a loss to comprehend you, father.
I will speak more plainly then. Thou hast been
associating for some years with a youth of little
more than thine own age. He is noble and gifted
with every manly and generous attribute; well
instructed too for his time and country. To thee
I will give credit for corresponding qualities
suitable
to thy own sex, and I have no doubt that thou
possessest them. Thinkest thou then that two
such persons could grow up together constantly
within the influence of each other's expanding
personal
attractions, besides the nobler ones of mind
and heart, without feeling more towards each other
than two ordinary mortals of the same sex? Oh, I
see the crimson tell-tale mounting in thy cheeks;
thou hangest thy head too in tacit
acknowledgement
,
that I have surmised no more than the truth.
His visiter for some time made a vain effort to
speak, and at length overcoming her confusion and
surprise, in broken sentences exclaimed, Indeed,
indeed, father, you wrong me! indeed you wrong
us both! such a subject was never mentioned
between
us to this hour! Nay more, it never entered
our,as she looked up and perceived his
searching
glance riveted upon her countenance, her head
again sunk in embarrassment, and the words died
upon her lips.
Cease, cease, my daughter, to punish thyself.
I will give thee credit for all thou wouldst say.
I am willing to believe that neither of you has ever
mentioned this subject, and perhaps that neither has
ever been conscious of more than a brotherly
affection
towards the other. Nevertheless, the last
half hour has fully convinced me that
self-examination
,
some sudden prospect of separation, or some
untoward circumstance in the ordinary current of
your intercourse was only necessary to awaken
both to the perception of the truth. But my
business
now is of a far more painful nature than the
mere finding of the facts. I am bound in duty to
warn thee! solemnly warn thee that this passion
must be subdued in its inception. I beg of thee
not to suppose for one moment, that my warning has
reference merely to obstacles which commonly
obstruct
the current of young and mutual affection!
They are absolutely insurmountable,far more so
than any that could arise from difference of rank,
or faith, or country! Nay, if death itself had put its
seal upon one or both, the gulf could not have
been more impassable! His language began
gradually
to grow more impassioned, his eye shot
forth a continued instead of occasional gleam of
wildnesshe rose upon his feet, and as he
pronounced
the barrier to be impassable, he took
down a large and ancient manuscript volume,
bound in leather, threw it open upon the table,
and to her astonishment a bloody hand was all
that was visible upon the page which seemed to
have been accidentally turned up. He pointed to
this singular sign-manualhis finger trembling
with emotionSee there, said hesee what
it is to neglect a solemn warning. There is the
diary of my eventful lifethe transactions of
every day for more than twenty-seven years are
there written, save one! There is the only record
of that day! Its history is written in blood!
The seal of Cain is stamped upon all the events of
the succeeding pages. Since that bloody token
was placed there, its author has been a wanderer
and an outcast. I was born among the haughty
and the proud of a proud landthere is my coat
of arms, said he, with a horrid laugh which sent
the blood coursing back to the heart of our
heroine
chilled and horrified. These are not or should
not be uninteresting records to thee!had that
crimson attestation never been imprinted there,
thou wouldst never have been born! but this will
suffice for the first lesson, (and he closed the
book and replaced it upon the shelf;) at some
more convenient season I will reveal another
page of the history of one with whom henceforth
thou wilt be more connected than thou now
imaginest
.
Now, my daughter, before thou takest
leave, let me entreat thee to remember and ponder
well upon what I have said to thee. Shouldst
thou ever be in any sudden strait of danger or
difficulty send to me a memento of the bloody
seal and I will come to thee, if within the compass
of mortal means; and remember likewise, should I
ever send such an emblem to theepause well upon
what thou art about to do. Now thou mayest
depart in peace, but say nothing of what thou hast
seen or heard farther than I have directed thee to
do. And thus speaking he took the lamp and
conducted her out by the same opening at which
they had entered.
They stood upon the platform overlooking the
shadowy mazes of moonlit foliage down the glen;
all nature was as silent as when it first came
from the hands of its Creator. Looking towards
heaven, and placing his hand upon her flaxen
ringlets, now wafted about in the richest
reflections
and deepest contrasts of light and shadow,
as a cold breeze from the valley beneath sought an
opening to the plains beyond, he said, May
God Almighty bless and preserve thee, my
daughter
!
And then led her some distance down the
hillbade her adieu, and left her to seek her more
youthful guide, and to ponder upon some novel
and not very pleasing passages in the diary of her
own experience.
Her ideas were any thing but clear and definite.
The whole scene of her late interview was so
newthe subject so startling to her young and
innate
Vol. I. 5
delicacy. Taking it for granted, however,
that all the surmises of the Recluse were true with
regard to herself, that person has studied human
nature to little purpose, who supposes that she,
after all that had been so solemnly announced,
admitted
the undefined obstacles mentioned to be as
insuperable as the person who suggested them
seemed to imagine. Nevertheless an injunction so
grave and authoritative had its minor effectsthe
first of which were visited upon the head of our
hero, who impatiently awaited her approach at
the foot of the hill.
CHAPTER V.
When
Virginia arrived at the foot of the hill,
and looked back, she could see the Herculean
figure of the Recluse, throwing its tall shadow far
down the face of the cliff, as he paced his narrow
court exactly as she had found him doing.
The surrounding scenery now looked doubly
brilliant to her confused senses, after the gloomy
contrasts of her late subterranean journey. The
fleeting clouds were entirely dispersed, and the
moonbeams shone clearly forth in undimmed
splendour, tipping with silver light each tree and
shrub, on the hill side and in the dale, and sparkling
like gems along the rippling current of the
purling
brook on the banks of which Bacon waited
her approach.
Although the language of the Recluse was
somewhat
dark and oracular, it was sufficiently
explicit
to produce a very sensible effect upon the
mind of Virginia, which our hero was not long
in discovering; for as he extended his hand to
assist
her across the brook, she tacitly declined the
proffered aid, as if unobservant of his intention,
and leaped the streamlet unassisted. He was the
more astonished, that in the whole of their long
intercourse he could not recollect such a whim or
freak occurring towards himself. She seemed
reserved
and formal too, as they moved up the
opposite
hill; but without remarking on her altered
mood, he sought to draw from her the result of her
expedition. Barely communicating so much as
she had been directed to do, however, she
remained
to him inexplicably silent.
While he was revolving these things in his mind
his companion, silently and moodily walking at his
side, without availing herself of his offered arm,
they met Brian O'Reily somewhat farther down
the hill than the spot where they had left him
the bridle of a horse slung upon each arma
handkerchief tied round his waist, into which were
stuck two pertronels from his own saddlebow;
and in his hand his master's, ready for use.
In the name of all the saints in Ireland,
what is the matter, Brian? exclaimed Bacon.
Oh! an be the Holy Father at Rome, is it
there ye are? Sure as death, but I'm the boy
that thought ye were clane murthered iny way.
Murdered! why who was to murder us?
Faix, an there's enoughiv them to do that same
in
this
bloody place. Barrin the tay party wid the
great inimy in the side iv the hill yonther, a'int
there enough iv the bloody nagurs (the savages,)
ranting about like so many wild bastes, ready to
peale the tap iv your heads like a pair of onions
or murpheysdivil a word a lie's in that iny
way.
Are there any of the savages abroad to-night?
Be the contints iv the book, but there is five
yallow rascals gone over the hill towards the city
half an hour since. Oh, by my purty, but I was
as near putting a key note to one of their whistles,
as two tin pinnies, only, that I was jalous iv your
own safety, and the beauty by your side at that
same reckning.
I commend your discretion in not shooting
and I wonder at your sobriety, considering the
condition in which we left you.
Oh, is it Brian O'Reily's discretion your
haner's
after namin?an is'nt it me that's a pathern
o' sobriety? Oh, by the five crasses, but it all
comes iv the dhrap o' the crathur I got by the
larnin iv you, ye beauty; divil a word a lie's in
that.
Gone towards the town have they? said
Bacon
,
musingand then examining the priming
of his petronels, he took themplaced them in
their holsters, and mounted his horse, motioning
to his attendant at the same time, to assist Virginia
to the pillion. She being mounted, he continued
his discourse to her. Keep up your courage my
brave pupil; no danger shall molest you
unencountered
.
Strange as it may appear, replied she, for the
first time uttering something more than a
monosyllable
.
The real danger in which we seem
placed, has few terrors, after my late
subterranean
visit. This last part of the sentence was said
in an under tone, as they cantered over the hill.
You have done bravely, Virginia, and now
5*
Brian it is our turn. Do you ride foremost
but on no account pull trigger, or draw your
sword, without my orders. We are at peace with
the confederated tribes of the peninsula:should
the party therefore prove to be any of these,
bloodshed will be unnecessary. Remember, and
be watchful!
Oh! be the powers iv mud and darkness, but
there's no more profit in watchin these skulking
nagurs, than there is in spakin to the fish to make
them take the bate; both the one and the tother o'
them bites when you laste expect it. Oh!
would'nt it be a fine thing to have a praste to walk
along afore ye wid the contints of the book spread
out before him?
Get along O'Reily with your nonsense; one
would suppose, to hear you talk, that you were
the greatest coward in Christendom.
The conversation of the Hibernian was at all
times amusing to our adventurers, and was
enjoyed
with more zest, doubtless, on account of the
many excellent qualities which they knew him to
possess, being as they knew, brave, devotedly
attached
to them both, and of unvarying good
humour
.
On the present occasion, Bacon encouraged
his volubility in order to divert his companion's
attention from dwelling upon the danger which
he but too clearly saw might await them on their
passage to the city; and thus was the time
beguiled
,
until they arrived at the top of the hill
commanding the town and river, without
encountering
a single foe, or meeting with any
adventure
worth recording. As they descended
towards the river, and O'Reily was just
felicitating
himself that there was a clane path intirely
across the stream. A sudden exclamation of
surprise from Bacon, induced him to rein up his
steed, in order to ascertain the cause. This
however
was clearly seen before the retrograde
movement
was completed.
Oh! the murtherin thaves iv the world, said
O'Reily, there they are in our boat too, as sure as
my name's Brian O'Reily. Your haner's a good shot
across that same little river, any way, and by
these pair o' beauties that never lie nor chate he
continued, unslinging his arms, but I'll be bound
for a couple or three more iv them. By the
vestments
but we'll put some o' them to slape, wid a
tune that'll ring in their ears to the day o' their
deaths.
Softly! softly, O'Reily said Bacon, you
are as far on the one extreme now as I thought
you on the other a while ago. Don't you see that
two watch on this side, besides the three in the
boat? And as I live, they are preparing to push off.
Quick, Brian, dismount and follow me behind these
bushes! we must despatch these two, at least,
without the use of firearms. And you, my
gentle
pupil, must remain with the horses. If we
fall, remain quiet until they have carried off
whatever
it is they are endeavouring to steal, and then
leave the horses and seek a passage by the bridge,
I know your situation is a trying one, but it is the
best we can do under the circumstances.
Oh! no, no, Nathaniel! said Virginia,
suddenly
recovering her feelings as well as her voice. It
is not the best we can do. Stay here yourself, and
I can slip round, unperceived, to the gate of the
bridge, and from thence alarm the city. Do,
Nathaniel
,
suffer me to go.
Not for worlds! answered Bacon; do you
not perceive that it would be impossible for you
to pass the two on this side unnoticed? Besides,
were you even to gain the gate, they would
tomahawk
you before you could arouse one person in
the town. No, no, you must remain. Seat
yourself
on the sward and hide your eyes, if you will,
until we despatch these two, and then we can hold
the others at bay.
But what is the necessity of attacking them at
all, Nathaniel?
Do you not see that they have been
committing
some depredation?perhaps worse, and would
be sure to make fight were we to show ourselves
in so small force. But come; O'Reily, we are
losing
precious time; follow me, and for your life do
not shoot.
This short and earnest dialogue was held in
whispers, and in much less time than we have
taken to record it.
The precaution against using firearms was
doubtless
given for fear of betraying to the inhabitants
of the town the delicate and apparently equivocal
position in which Virginia was placed. We
must be upon these two with our good swords, O'
Reily, said Bacon, before the others can join
them, and if possible before they perceive us.
Devil burn me but my hand itches to get
acquainted
wid the taste o' their skulls any way.
Oh! if we can only smash these two but we'll keep
the others to see their own funerals iny way.
In a few moments, Bacon and his trusty
follower
were silently gliding through the bushes on the
banks of the river, and advanced to within a few
rods of the savages, unperceived either by the
party on the beach or those loading the boat on the
opposite shore. But as they were just emerging
from the last bush which protected their
movements
,
a characteristic and startling exclamation
hugh! from the watch stationed in the boat, at
once precipitated their movements, and put the two
on their guard whom they were about to attack.
There was at that day no male inhabitant of
Jamestown or the surrounding Colony, arrived
at the years and vigour of manhood, who was
entirely
unacquainted with the mode and usual end
of Indian warfare. Of course, on such occasions
as the present, the contest was for life or death.
Bacon, notwithstanding his youth, had already
acquired some renown as a warrior in these
desperate
single-handed conflicts, which doubtless gave
him and his companion more assurance of success
on this occasion, notwithstanding the fearful odds
which it was possible might be brought against
them. Springing upon their adversaries, who, as
has been seen, were on their guard, the conflict at
once became desperate, while those in the boat
made the utmost efforts to join their companions
and overpower their unexpected enemies. No
sooner were the two good swords of Bacon and
O'Reily flashing in the moonbeams, than
corresponding
motions of the savage war clubs gave
evidence
that they also were ready for battle. Many
and hard were the blows which were given on
both sides in the struggle, a mere protraction of
which Bacon perceived was destruction.
Accordingly
bracing up his own nerves, and
cheering
O'Reily, he made a vigorous and successful
lunge at his immediate antagonist, but not before
the reinforcement of the enemy was on the ground
to take his place. A contest of this kind, when
the parties were any thing like equal in number,
was generally not long doubtfulvictory in most
instances being upon the side of superior skill and
weapons. But O'Reily, although a veteran
soldier
,
had met his match in this instance, his
antagonist
being a tall and brawny warrior of most
fearful proportions. Yet he laid about him
stoutly
,
while Bacon, merely having time to catch his
breath, renewed the unequal contest with two of
the new assailants, the third at the same time
joining
his already too powerful chief against the
Irishman. The conflict was now desperate and
bloody; our adventurers fought well and skilfully,
every blow was followed by a crimson stream, and
they too in their turn were more than once beaten to
their knees by the terrific sweep of the war clubs.
At one time Bacon was entirely prostrated, but
instantly
recovering and rising to his knees he
continued
to defend himself until he had once more
regained his feet.
This warfare had now lasted for some minutes,
which seemed an age to the trembling maiden who
stood an unwilling yet enchained spectator on the
side of the hill above them. But victory appeared
at length about to crown the desperate efforts of
her friends, whose assailants were now reduced to
exactly their own number, and one, the tall old
chief opposed to Brian, covered with his own
blood and just ready to fall, when a sudden and
terrific yell immediately behind them announced
a reinforcement; and Virginia sank upon the
earth in terror and despair.
Plunge into the stream and swim for your life.
shouted BrianOh! but I'll keep their hands
busy till ye go clear, even wid a stack of the
yellow
devils afore me!
Six horrid and painted human monsters, (so they
seemed to our adventurers) now leaped into the
midst of the conflict, relieving their-own brethren
and thundering their blows upon the heads of their
already exhausted adversaries. In vain they made
furious lunges, forgetting the cunning of fence in
the perfect desperation of the hopeless conflict. At
length they both fell under the weapons of their new
enemies and two of the savages, flashing their knives
from their sheaths, prepared to complete the
sacrifice
;
indeed a despairing yell from O'Reily
announced
that the butchery had already commenced;
when in an instant the head of the old Chief
stooping
over him was severed from the trunk, and in
the next a second blow from the same gigantic arm
prostrated the one about to tear the bloody trophy
from the fallen Cavalier.
Virginia had by this time ventured another
despairing
look upon the fate of him who was the
cherished companion of her childhood. In that
moment, doubtless, all the warnings and
injunctions
of the Recluse were forgotten, or if
remembered
,
instantly set aside as the over prudential
suggestions of pride in rank, or wealth, or power,
governing the feelings of her friends, or of him
who undertook to give her counsel in their stead.
But there were still enemies left besides the two
who had flourished the scalping knife over our
prostrate adventurers. With these the Recluse
(for he it was who had come so opportunely to
the rescue) at once renewed the conflict.
Placing
his back against a tree, and throwing away
his castor and scabbard, he joined in the strife
with a zest like that of an epicure who bares his
arm to the exercise of the carving knive
whirling
his enormous weapon amidst the falling clubs
with the precision, ease and coolness of a
professor
exhibiting his skill with the harmless foils.
His first exertions were, of course, on the
defensive
,
among so many assailants, but if his blows
were rare they were sure and fatal. He was
evidently
but putting in practice a sort of exercise
in which he must have both delighted and
excelled
in days long past.
At every blow or thrust a savage went down to
rise no more, Bacon, too, now rallied his scattered
senses and exhausted strength, and resumed his
part in the conflict, with enough of both to render
him a valuable auxiliary in the way of defence,
which the Recluse perceiving, sprang into the
midst of the enemy and speedily put to flight, or
the sword, the exhausted and disheartened
remnant
.
When Virginia saw this
devoutly-prayed-for
termination to the battle, she sank upon the
ground as powerless and exhausted as if she too
had heen actively engaged. The Recluse stooping
over O'Reily and feeling his head and wrist,
hastened
to the boat, and seizing the wooden vessel
with which the water was usually bailed out,
returned
and bathed his face and temples. Not so
swift were his motions however as to prevent his
stopping for a moment at the boat and gazing with
astonishment at something which it contained; but
there was little time for wonder, and he hastened
on his errand. When Brian's face was cleansed
from blood it was found that the scalping knife of
the old warrior had probably been struck from its
intended destination so that the point had caught
Vol. I. 6
in one corner of his mouth and inflicted a wound of
some magnitude across his face. While he was
thus attended, Bacon hastened, with what speed he
was able to exert, toward the spot where he had
left his helpless companion. He found her just
recovering from the listless stupor in which we
left her. Oh, Nathaniel! was all that she was
enabled to articulate as she fell into his arms,
forgetting
in the deep excitment of the moment every
feeling save the strong and innocent affection
which had so long existed between them.
Bacon placed her upon his horse, and taking
the bridle in one hand, and holding her steady in
her seat with the other, proceeded to the scene of
the late mortal struggle. They found O'Reily.
sitting up, with his mouth already bandaged, and
his late assistant and protector gone, having first,
as Brian indistinctly muttered, pointed to the boat,
as if there were something there which craved
attention
.
Their own perceptions were now startled
from the same quarter, by the sound of groans.
Bacon ran to the spot, and found a female bound,
and lying upon her face in the bottom of the boat.
Having cut the cords and bathed her swollen face
and temples, he speedily restored her to something
like consciousness, and then bore her to the shore
and laid her upon the ground. O'Reily now
recognised her as Mrs. Jamieson, wife of Jamie
Jamieson, principal fisherman to the town, whose
hut, for convenient purposes in his avocation, was
situated without the protection of the fort. This
statement also accounted to Bacon for the presence
of a quantity of fish netting in the boat, which
doubtless excited the cupidity of the poor
ignorant
savages, who lay cold and lifeless at his feet.
New embarrassments seemed to stare our
wanderers
in the face at every step on this eventful
night. Scarcely was O'Reily restored to his
senses, and Mrs. Jamieson to such a state as to
give hopes of recovery, when it occurred to our
hero that something must be done with the dead
bodies. But when he came to reflect upon the
appearance which the battle ground itself would
present, he determined to leave the rest to chance,
and to say nothing himself or through his follower,
and thus leave the gossips of the town to account
for the slaughter of the Indians as they might.
Mrs. Jamieson was now carefully replaced in the
boat, and O'Reily assisted to his post at the
tiller
,
while Bacon, having seated Virginia, occupied
Brian's usual place at the oar, being the least
injured
of the two.
The former was for once in his life perfectly
silent, perhaps owing to the awkward accident
which had happened to his mouth, thereby
rendering
it difficult for him to enunciate with the true
Hibernian pathos.
The females having been landed, Bacon desiring
Virginia to sit by the still benumbed Mrs.
Jamieson
,
returned for his horses, which were led by the
side of the boat without any difficulty.
The whole party now proceeded to the
fisherman's
hut, Bacon supporting the feeble steps of its
exhausted mistress. Here a new disaster awaited
them. A few yards from the house towards the
river, they discovered the body of the fisherman
himself, cold, stiff, and lifeless. O'Reily was
directed to remain with the woman of the house
until she should completely recover her senses,
but on no account to stay longer, or enter into
any explanations.
Bacon and Virginia entered the gate of the fort
unchallenged, and proceeded to the house of Mr.
Fairfax, when the latter entered as quietly and as
unperceived as she had sallied forth; while he
officiated as ostler to his own steed, which service
being finished to his satisfaction he sought his
apartment; the morning being far advanced towards
the dawn of day. His slumbers, it may be readily
imagined, were not profound and undisturbed,
the restless nervousness of over exertion in mind
and body, being very similar in its effects to that
of too much repose.
CHAPTER V.
On
the morning of the Anniversary of the
Restoration
,
the sun was just emerging above the
eastern horizon, the sky was unclouded and serene,
the air balmy and elastic, and the volumes of misty
drapery from the river were fast rolling away over
the hills, as the Recluse stood upon one of the
highest points of the river cliffs, with folded arms,
surveying the scene around him.
Far back as the eye could reach to the west, all
was interminable forestthe foreground exhibiting
occasional specks of cleared land, where some
planter, more adventurous than his fellows, had
boldly trusted his fortunes to the mercy of the
savage.
He looked upon the little city beneath, as the
weary mariner on a long voyage may be
supposed
to look upon a green island in the midst of
a desert of waters. His chest heaved as the
swelling
emotions of pent up years burst from his
overloaded
heart. Bacon, the manly and ingenuous
youth, whom the reader will remember as having
been appointed to visit him on this morning, had just
sprung upon a mettled and pawing charger, which
was now throwing the fire and pebbles from his
heels in thick volleys, as his master with a fire
6*
and impetuosity scarcely inferior to his own, bent
over his uncurbed neck as he descended into the
plain. Several pieces of light artillery, together
with volleys of musketry in quick succession,
thundered over the smooth waters of the
Powhatan
,
and reverberated in multiplied peals under the
feet of the Recluse. There was something
connected
with this day, and its celebration, which
seemed powerfully to have stirred up the still
waters within him. Thick coming fancies
connected
with by-gone days were rolling over his
soul in an uncontrolled torrent. But we must
leave him for a time to his own reflections, amidst
the solitary grandeur of the scene, while we pursue
the road of the flying Cavalier towards the city.
The bells from the Church and State House were
now also heard in the intervals of the cannonade,
and as we approach nearer to the scene, a strange
confusion of many sounds greet the ear. Drums
and fifes, violins and banjoes, and even jews-harps,
all lent their aid to swell the burst of joy and
gratulation. Smiling and happy faces were
grouped
along the streets, while gay damsels, in their
holyday finery, adorned the doors and windows of
the busy citizens. A perfect Babel of commingled
noises issued from the spacious area of a tobacco
warehouse, which, after the usual fashion,
consisted
of an extensive roof, supported by colonnades to
every front. Here was congregrated the rising
generationboisterous and happy in the midst of
their games and sports. No schoolmaster was
abroad on that day, to rush in upon the unwary
urchins, and wreak upon them the vengeance of
Samson upon the Philistines.
Our forefathers suffered their children to follow
very much their own humours in the selection
of those amusements suited to their age and
condition
.
We see not but the result was as happy
as that of the systems of our day, when every
thing is regulated by system, even to the games
and amusements of our children. The time is
certainly not far distant when Geography will be
taught by a game at cards; Chemistry by set
conversations
upon the constituents of our edibles,
and Natural Philosophy developed in nursery
rhymes, that we may imbibe it with our lullabies.
On the morning in question, as merry a set of
boisterous lads kicked up the dust in the old
warehouse
,
as ever fought over a game of marbles, or
laughed through one of leap-frog. And while the
merry urchins, whom we have taken under our
special protection, were thus enjoying a glorious
holyday, their elders and superiors were moved
by the same impulses. The mansion of the
Governor itself was in visible commotion;
servants
swelling with importance, aped the grandeur
of their masters' looks, while they ran from room
to room on their various duties. A provincial
band of music was stationed under the windows,
uniting their sweet sounds to the Babel-like
uproar
,
in the well known tune of Over the waters
to Charley.
There was one little green spotupon the common
inviting the contemplative mind to pleasing
reveries
.
Here a few of the humbler maidens of
the city were adorning the overhanging bushes
with gay garlands of flowers, preparatory to the
evening dance, which they contemplated
celebrating
in imitation of their superiors, who were to
move in more stately measures at the mansion of
the Governor.
The household of Gideon Fairfax was likewise
earlier than usual on the alert, and he being one of
the council of the Colony, came in also for a share
of the honours noised forth under the windows of
the most distinguished Cavaliers.
Breakfast had been some time waiting at the
table, and the fondly indulged daughter had been
repeatedly summoned, but still she came not.
This excited the more surprise in the minds of
her parents, as they supposed, that on this
eventful morning, of all others in the year, she
would be up with the lark. The truth was, that
after retiring at such an unusual hour of the
night, or rather morningher slumbers were
disturbed
between sleeping and waking, by shadowy
dreams of yelling savages, chivalrous youths, and
mighty giants.
At length, however, she appeared, but instead
of bounding into the room with gay and elastic
steps, and more buoyant spirits, in happy
anticipation
of the promised enjoyments of the day, her
movements were slow and heavyher eyes red
and swollen, and her whole appearance indicative
of languor and dejection. Her fond parents were
instantly at her sideeach taking a hand as she
walked into the room, and striving to learn from
the fancied invalid the nature of her sufferings.
She assured them that she had nothing to complain
of but want of rest, and with this they were the
more readily satisfied, as towards morning there
had indeed been much firing of guns, and other
demonstrations of loyalty. Her parents being
thus satisfied, that her account of the matter was
the true one, Virginia was suffered to assume her
place at the head of the tablea place she had
for some time occupied on account of the delicate
state of her mother's health. Meanwhile the
anxious parents assumed their own places, and
endeavoured to beguile their daughter's languor
by allusions to the merry sounds, and gay group
without, not forgetting the assembly at the
Governor's
;
and it is more than probable that they
would have succeeded, as few spirited and
blooming
beauties of sixteen can long listen unmoved to
such details, had not Virginia, raising her half
cheerful face at that moment to a large mirror
which hung opposite, caught the reflection of a
person in whose welfare she took a lively interest,
standing in one corner of the room, and partly
behind her chair, with a countenance and attitude
which expressed the deepest misery. This was
no other that Wyanokee, her own little Indian
attendant
,
who officiated near the person of her
mistress, in a medium capacity between friend
and servant; the mistress only requiring the
companion
,
and the maid spontaneously offering the
services due both from affection and gratitude.
The figure of Wyanokee was diminutive, but like
most of the aboriginal females, exquisitely
proportioned
,
and graceful, after the fashion of nature's
finest schooling. Her face was oval and between
a brown and yellow colour, yet there was a vital
tinge occasionally illuminating this predominant
dark ground, which bespoke the refined female,
in language intelligible to all, and far more
eloquently
than the tongue. Her hair was jet black,
and folded upon her small round head after the
fashion of the Europeans; and her brilliant teeth
exhibited a striking contrast to the dark shades of
her skin, and darker sparkling eyes. The
delicately
penciled brows, arched beautifully over a
countenance strikingly feminine and lady-like;
and the general expression was that calm sadness
which has been remarked as characteristic of the
domesticated aborigines from that day to the
present
.
Her dress was essentially after the fashion
of the whites of that day, just retaining sufficient
of the Indian costume, however, to set off her
slight but graceful figure to the best advantage.
The exquisite proportions of her finely shaped foot
and ankle were displayed in a closely fitting deer
skin moccasin, studded around the eyelet holes,
and wrought in curious, but not unpleasing figures,
with party-coloured beads and porcupine quills,
Around her neck, and falling upon her gently
swelling bosom, were many ingeniously wrought
ornaments of wampum and silverand around
her wrists, bracelets of the same materials.
Wyanokee
was of the Chickahominy tribe, and had
been taken prisoner after the murder of her
parents
by one of the neighbouring tribes, who at
the time were at war with the Chickahominies.
Nathaniel Bacon saw her in one of his hunting
excursions, and struck with her native beauty, and
pleading countenance, redeemed her from
captivity
at the expense of a string of blue beads.
From thence he brought her to Jamestown, to
remain
until some opportunity should occur of
restoring her to her tribe. Her parents having
been slain, however, as we have already said, and
much time necessarily having elapsed before such
opportunity occurred, Virginia took advantage of
it, and by mild and affectionate treatment,
endeavoured
to win her to herself. A mutual and
peculiar
attachment was the consequence, so that when
the opportunity actually occurred, Wyanokee
refused
to return to the almost extinct tribe of her
fathers. Two years had now elapsed since her
introduction into the Fairfax family, during which
time Virginia, an assiduous pupil herself, became
in her turn instructress to her little protege.
Already had she learned many of the little
feminine
arts and accomplishments of civilized life,
and made considerable proficiency in the English
languagewhich, however, she never employed
except in private to her instructress, or on some
urgent occasion. Half the young Cavaliers in
Jamestown would have been willing devotees at
the shrine of Wyanokee's beauty, after the corrupt
fashions of the parent court and country. But
such celebrity was not suited to the taste or
ambition
of the Indian maiden. Whenever the little
errands of her patroness led her to the shops of
the city, instead of encouraging the forward and
impudent gallantries of the young profligates, she
would trip along like a frightened partridge
always turning a deaf ear to their flatteries, and
keeping her eyes fixed upon the earth, in the
most modest, natural and simple guise.
Notwithstanding
her habitual indifference to the
flatteries
of her many admirers, there was one youth
whose very step upon the door sill her practised ear
could detect. Not that her deliverer had ever taken
advantage of her gratitude to himher ignorance
of civilized refinements, or her dependent
situation
,
to poison her mind with the deceitful
flatteries
too common with his comrades of that day.
The passion was perhaps the growth of time and
reflection and the effect of gratitude, as the little
Indian maiden became capable of instituting
comparisons between his conduct towards herself
and that of the young Cavaliers, whose assiduities
have been already mentioned. Certain it is, that
if it had been from some sudden impulse in their
earlier intercourse, the customs of her race would
have fully borne her out in declaring her passion to
its object at once. At the time of which we
write, however, this feeling was a profound secret
within her own bosom, as she hoped and believed;
and the more Virginia impressed upon her mind
the necessity of reserve and modesty in her
intercourse
with the other sex, the more jealous she
became in concealing the passion that possessed
her heart. Nevertheless, it influenced all her
after life, and gave a touching interest to the
progress
of her moral and intellectual development.
Some few of her Indian peculiarities were still
retained by Wyanokee; her gesticulation was far
more powerful and expressive than her small
compass
of language, and the ordinary indifference of
her race to passing and exciting themes, was yet
preserved by her. Her gentle mistress could
indeed
work upon her sensibilities through the
medium
of her affection and gratitude, like a skilful
musician upon a finely toned instrument, but the
master key was still wanting even to her. There
was one peculiarity of her race not quite so
agreeable
or inoffensive as those already mentioned
namely, the silence and celerity of her movements;
sometimes she would appear to Virginia in the
middle of the night with the imagined abruptness
of an unearthly spirit. Often would the fair
maiden
awake from her slumbers and find her
stooping
over her couchwith the saddest and most
intense interest expressed in her countenance
and again she would glide through the silent
apartments
of the spacious mansion with a movement
Vol. I. 7
so shadowy and noiseless, that it seemed almost
impossible to be effected by a substantial being.
When Virginia raised her eyes from the
breakfast-table
,
and beheld Wyanokee's mute despair, as
exhibited in the opposite mirror, her former
nervous
alarm and agitation instantly returned.
She was entirely at a loss to account for the
unusual
feeling exhibited by her attendant, except by
connecting it in some way with her late nocturnal
adventures. And it was a fearful supposition
which flashed through her mind, that Wyanokee
was acquainted with her last night's undertaking;
yet at the same time ignorant of her motives.
Hurrying mechanically through the meal, she rose,
and taking the hand of the young Indian, was
about to retire; but at that moment Nathaniel
Bacon
rode up to the door, his charger covered with
dust and foam; leaping from his back and
throwing
the rein to an attendant, he entered the room
at the very moment when the two maidens were
about to make their exit. Under the peculiar
circumstances
of the case perhaps no one could have
entered more mal-appropos. Mr. Fairfax himself
and Bacon had parted, at the termination of their
last interview, with excited and unpleasant feelings,
both having lost command of temper. Virginia
had last seen him under circumstances also which
in themselves were calculated to excite no very
pleasing reminiscences; but considering the
precise
attitude in which she stood at that moment
with regard to Wyanokee, the interview promised
to be still more embarrassing. Nor was the
promise
falsifiedthe salutations of the gentlemen
were cold, formal, and embarrassing to both parties,
while the two maidens stood on the eve of
departure
,
each labouring under her own peculiar
difficulties
.
Virginia felt as if all the adventures of
the preceding night stood revealed to her parents,
without any of the justificatory motives which had
satisfied her own mind for embarking in them
while her attendant looked to her as if she too
was labouring under a weight of surreptitious
knowledge. Mrs. Fairfax was the only one of the
party who preserved self-possession enough to
welcome their young friend, after so long an
absence
,
in intelligible language.
With the peculiar tact of the cultivated female
mind she judiciously led the conversation to such
subjects of universal interest at the time, as to
induce
her husband and the young Cavalier to forget
their late unpleasant difference, and Virginia to
resume
her seat at the table, where she busied
herself
in helping the visiter to his breakfast. It was
singular enough too, as Virginia no doubt thought,
that one of these subjects should have direct
reference
to some personages who had so lately and
so intently occupied her own thoughtsnamely
the Roundheads and Independents. Frank
Beverly
it seems had already blown abroad the
meeting
of these persons in secret conclave, as
mentioned
in the first chapter. The meal being concluded,
Bacon again sprang upon his horse and hurried
forward to the portico of the Berkley Arms, in
which were now displayed no very equivocal
evidences
of loyalty, from the master of the house
and his numerous guests, who thronged its area
upon his approach. All the
elite
of the Cavalier
youth were there in a perfect throng.
No sooner had Bacon alighted and made his
way into the throng, than the tumultuous
discussion
of the youths was hushed into silence.
This was not so much owing to any sternness in the
dignity of the youth as to the peculiar nature of
the discussion which was going on between Dudley
and Beverly, and their several partizans, at the very
moment of his entrance. The tumblers of julip
were held in suspense, while heavy bets were
offered
,
and about to be taken, upon the disputed
question whether the very person who so suddenly
appeared among them would be present at the
celebration. No sooner had he set foot on the
premises, however, than the fat landlord came
waddling
up, grasping the hand of our hero in one of
his own, while in the other he presented him with
a goblet of the national beverage.
A pledge! a pledge! now resounded from
several
quarters of the well filled Tap. It may well
be supposed that the suspected one had no very
great relish for julip after breakfast, but knowing
the importance of such trifles on an occasion like the
present, and under all the peculiar circumstances
in which he was placed he took the cup, and
elevating
it, saidHere's to the merry king Charles,
who shall be king but Charley.
Bravely done, shouted the hostand huzzah
for Bacon, shouted his own immediate partisans,
many of whom belonged to a volunteer military
company of which he was the commander, and
whom to see was the very object of his visit to
the Arms. Taking Dudley therefore by the arm,
and calling to others of the corps, he invited them
to a private interview in another apartment. As
Bacon passed Frank Beverly a mutual but cold
salutation was exchangeddignified and polite on
the part of the former, and cold, haughty and
sneering
on that of the latterthe ungracious feeling
not at all lessened, it is probable, by the pointed
exclusion
of Beverly and his partisans from the
private
meeting just alluded to.
Although this was Bacon's first appearance in
public, since his abrupt departure from the house
of his friend and patron, it was not the first visit
he had paid to the hotel, where he and his
partisans
now held their meeting. He had privately
visited the landlord on the preceding evening,
previous
to the adventures related in the last chapter,
for some purposes connected with the present
meeting
of his friends, but which he was by no means
willing should be generally known. At that visit
he was informed by the landlord of the mis,
chievous plot laid by his rival to deprive him of
the pleasure of Virginia's hand during the
approaching
7*
festivities at the Mansion of the
Governor
,
and his first intention was to counteract their
machinations. But so intensely had his mind been
engaged with the adventures of the preceding
evening
,
that all minor interests escaped his recollection.
It was the object of his visit on this morning, to
remedy that oversight; but so cold and formal was
his reception by Mr. Fairfax, and so embarrassed
was that of his daughter, that he gave up the scheme
for the present, leaving the house with any thing
but pleasant emotions. Indeed, from the various
combinations of parties and factions, he saw his
own position becoming hourly more embarrassing
and difficult, and still more so from the neutral
position in which he was thrownpartly from the
mystery connected with his origin, and partly
from his connexion with the Recluse. But let
the Independents on the one hand, and the
Cavaliers
on the other, plot and counterplot as they
might, his course was clearly taken in his own
mind. None of the doubts as to what cause
he should espouse, which had been hinted at by
some of the personages of our narrative, really
existed
in his mind. His course was plain, manly,
upright, and straight forward. Nevertheless, as
has been seen, he had not thus far entirely escaped
suspicion. But trusting to the uprightness of his
intentions, he took his measures on this eventful
morning with a single eye to the public peace
and the cause of truth, justice and humanity. It
was to promote these great ends, that he now
assembled
the members of the military company of
which he was the commander. Upon what service
they were to be engaged, will appear in the
succeeding
chapters.
CHAPTER VII.
While
Bacon and his partisans were deliberating
in one of the upper rooms of the Berkley Arms,
and Beverly, Ludwell and their friends, still kept
up their potations in the Tap below, all of a
sudden the bells ceased to chime, and the cannons
to roar, and the various other demonstrations of
noisy mirth that pervaded the city, were hushed
into silence. A corresponding stillness instantly
prevailed throughout both the assembled parties,
for a moment, in order to ascertain if possible the
cause of this interruption to the public rejoicings.
No one in either being able to explain the
matter, both parties at the same moment rushed
tumultuously into the street. They beheld men,
women, and children, thronging in the direction
of the public square, and naturally fell into the
current, and were borne on its tide into the very
centre of attraction. Here they found several
oxcarts
standing in the street, in the beds of which
were stretched the dead bodies of eight Indians
fearfully mangled, and one with his head entirely
severed from the body. Twenty voices at once
were interrogating the gaping negroes who bestrode
the cattle, but no other satisfaction could be gained
from them than a mute reference to their master;
a little busy important man, who resided on the
main land, and was now holding forth with great
energy and amplitude of expression, touching his
various adventures of the morning, to a crowd of
eager loungers gathered around him, as if to
appropriate
his wonderful disclosure entirely to
themselves.
He stated that he had found the dead bodies
upon the banks of the river, where there were still
many evidences of a desperate conflict of both
horse and foot. That the ground was covered
with blood, and that one party must have been
driven into the river, and drowned, as he had been
enabled to trace them by their footmarks to the
very edge of the water.
It will be readily imagined by the reader that
Nathaniel Bacon was no unmoved spectator of
this scene, or of the various conjectural
explanations
that were now given in his hearing, of
a transaction in which he had been such a principal
actor, and of which he could have given such an
authentic history. He was rather rejoiced than
otherwise, that the little planter of the main
seemed
so much disposed to indulge his imagination,
as a discovery of his own part in the matter, and
of Virginia's delicate position on the occasion,
was thereby rendered less probable. But his self
congratulations were too hasty; for scarcely had he
revolved these things in his mind, before a sudden
rush of the crowd towards some new object of
surprise arrested his attention. This was no other
than Brian O'Reily, bearing into the crowd upon
his back the dead body of Jamie Jamieson, and
followed by his wife, who to her bruises and
misfortunes
had applied the comfort of whiskey in
great profusion. O'Reily, it seemed, had fully
sympathised with the widowed lady, for his
motions
were any thing but accordant with the
solemnity
of the occasion. Bacon could scarce suppress
a smile as he caught a glimpse of this group through
the crowd. His first object, however, was to
catch O'Reily's eye, and make him understand, if
possible by a look, that he was to volunteer no
evidence in the case. He had no sooner
succeeded
in gaining the notice of his attendant, than the
latter applied his finger slyly to his lip, looking
another way at the same time, and thus indicating
that he understood the policy to be pursued, and
that he was not so much intoxicated as he thought
proper to seem. With this doubtful assurance
Bacon was compelled to rest satisfied, walking
about the square all the while in visible agitation.
The corpse of the fisherman being laid out in
the market-place, the officer, whose duty it was,
proceeded to summon an inquest to inquire into
the manner and cause of his death. The first
witness summoned before this tribunal, was, of
course, the wife of the deceased. She testified
that a party of savages had on the preceding night
entered their house, and after having cruelly
murdered
her husband, beaten herself, and bound her
limbs with cords, had carried away all their fishing
nets. That having placed these in a canoe, they laid
her in it also, and paddled across the riverwhere
they were met by another party of savages, about
fifty in number, as she supposed, and while they
were busily engaged in dividing the spoil, a
gigantic
man, with a face flaming like fire, and
a sword as long as a fishing pole, had suddenly
fallen upon the murderers, and quickly put them
to flight, or the sword. That having thus
conquered
the whole horde, he had placed her in the
boat again, and brought her to her own house,
where he left her, and where she remained alone
until morning, when she was found by Mr. Brian
O'Reily, who happened to be coming that way.
Improbable as some parts of this story were, it
met with a ready credence from nearly the whole
of the multitude; no tale, having any relation to
the Recluse, being so marvellous that they would
not readily believe it. But in no one of the
assembled
listeners did it excite greater surprise
than in Bacon himself. It is true, that he readily
recognised in the whole invention the joint
influence
of whiskey, and O'Reily's ingenuity, but
even to these he had not supposed that he should
be indebted for such downright falsehoods in his
behalf. Mrs. Jamieson, too, seemed firmly to
believe
all that she had testified. Under these
circumstances
he did not feel himself called upon to
set the matter right at the expense of Virginia's
feelings, and the inevitable defeat of the measures in
which he was that very morning deeply engaged.
How the Irishman was to manage his part of the
narrative when called upon, as he certainly would
be, and that so speedily that no time would be
allowed
to exchange a word with his master, Bacon
could not divine. He knew right well that
O'Reily was gifted with a strong tendency to the
most outrageous and even ridiculous exaggeration,
and that he would carry through whatever he
should undertake to say, with wonderful
shrewdness
and imperturbable confidence; but how he
was to make his story agree with that which he
had put into the mouth of Mrs. Jamieson, and
at the same time explain the wound upon his
own face, and the contusion upon his head,
without
being guilty of some direct and palpable
falsehood
,
was more than his master could imagine.
At length Brian O'Reily was called to state what
he knew touching the death of the fisherman.
The first question propounded by the officer was,
Well, O'Reily, tell the jury how, and when
you came to the house of the deceased.
Oh! thin, and I'm bothered to know whether
I got there by land or wather, and faix, I'm after
b'leiven it was naither uv them.
How then did you get there, if you went
neither by land nor water?
An by the vestments, may be I wouldn't be
far wrang, if I said it was the crathur that took
me there, seein I can't deny it iny way, your
haner.
You saw no one strike or maltreat the
deceased
.
It would be but ill manners in me to be
conthradictin
your haner.
You are sure you did not strike him yourself.
As sure as two tin-pinniesDivil burn the
man that Brian O'Reily ever ill used when he was
downmuch less when he was dead, your haner.
(crossing himself.)
How then came that cut upon the corner of
your mouth?
Oh! murther, and is it these your haner's
axing
after? and he ingeniously placed his finger
upon
a smaller wound made by his bottle on the
previous night. Yes, O'Reily, we wish you to
state how you came by those wounds.
Oh! but I'm bowld to show your haner, seein
its you that axed mesure here's the wapon that
kilt me all out! and as he spoke, he pulled out
his broken necked bottle and handed it to his
catechist.
I see it has blood upon it, O'Reily, and this
may explain the cut on your mouth, but how came
that contusion on your temple?
Be dad but I run aginst a good big shelaleigh,
an it broke me head so it didsorra much head I
had left at that same recknin, for the crather.
You ran against a club, O'Reily? Was it
growing in the ground or was it in the hands of an
enemy?
Vol. I. 8
It might be growin, your haner, or it might be
in the hands of the great inimy himself, for all
that Brian O'Reily knowssure your haner isn't
very particular in examinin the tixture of the
timber
that knocks you down. It might be a
door-post
or
may be the gate of the foortas the
thimber grows as thick here as paraties, and this
gate was always too small for me when I had a
dhrap of the whiskey.
You ran against the gate-post, or the facings
of Jamieson's door, then?
By the five crasses, an I've done that same
many's the timebarrin always that it would be
ill manners in me to conthradict your haner if I
hadn't.
You saw nothing then of the treacherous and
thieving savages on the night of Jamieson's
murder
?
Oh then but I'm puzzled now intirely. By
the holy father, I saw a power of sights on that
same night. The whiskey was clane too strong
for me. I saw all sorts of yeller nagres, and men
widout shadows, and flamin counthenances, and the
fire sparklin from the very eyes of me by the same
token. Divil a word of a lie's in that iny way.
But you saw no person strike or maltreat this
man who lies dead here?
Divil the one, your haner! Brian O'Reily's
the boy that wouldn't see foul-play to man nor
baste. I never saw Jamie, till I saw him streteched
all out as you see him there.
You do not know then but that you may have
encountered the murderers in your own drunken
travels?
Faix and you may say that, your haner,
widout
a word of a lie in it; it bothers me intirely
to tell what I did see. An, by the five crasses, if
it wasn't for the wapon you've got in your hand
and poor Jamie that I brought here on my back
and this thump upon my head, I should say it
was all a dhrame clane out.
Well, you may go, O'Reily. I believe you
know little of what happened to yourself or any
one else last night.
An that's thrue for you iny way; many thanks
to your haner for your kindness and civility, said
O'Reily, as he left the crowd, slily tipping a wink
of triumph to his master.
Bacon certainly began to breathe more freely
towards the conclusion, as having edged in with the
crowd, he heard O'Reily's ingenious parries of the
official's thrusts. But his trials were not yet over,
for scarcely had he followed his attendant with his
eye out of the crowd, before Mr. Fairfax stepped
up to the officer and whispered something in his ear.
In a few moments after a deputy was seen leading
Wyanokee into the market-placea look of the most
profound dejection, still visible through her fright,
at being brought into the presence of such a
multitude
.
She testified, that two of the Indians slain were
her nearest kinsmen. That the one with his
head severed from the body, was old King Fisher;
and, upon examination, the blue feathers of his
patronymic
bird were found still sticking in the
matted
tuft of hair upon his crown. She farther stated
that he was her father's only brother, and that
another of the slain was his sonthe only two
remaining
male relatives she had in the world.
That all these savages were of the Chickahominy
tribe; and that there were not more than two
hundred warriors left of all that brave and
powerful
nation which had once thronged the banks
of the Chickahominy river. And here the little
Indian maiden seemed almost suffocated with
overpowering
emotions, as the memory of former days
came gushing over her heart. No tear relieved
her swelling emotions, but ever and anon she cast
her eyes over the mangled bodies of her kinsmen,
and once or twice turned with looks more rapid
and of darker meaning towards Bacon. The
general
expression of her countenance, however, was
one of profound and overwhelming sadness. Her
soul seemed fully capable of realizing the
melancholy
destiny which awaited all the nations of the
aborigines then inhabiting the country, from the sea
board to the blue mountains,
[2]
[2]
The Indians possessed no knowledge of any of the tribes
beyond
.
and whose fiat was
fast bearing her race from the loved places which
had known them so long. It was doubtless in her
mind a poor compensation for the destruction of
her native tribe and their contemporaries, that she
herself had been reclaimed from the happy
ignorance
of savage, to the more painful knowledge of
civilized life.
She was asked if she knew of the visit of these
unfortunate men on the preceding night. Her
eye furtively ran over the eager faces gathered
around, until it fell upon that of Bacon, when a
momentary flash of some internal impulse
illumined
her countenance. It might be vengeance, or
the hatred of unrequited passionbut let the cause
be what it might, it glimmered with a demoniacal
fire but for an instant, and then, like the expiring
taper in the socket after its last flash, sunk for ever.
The sadness of past and coming years seemed
concentrated in the despair of one moment. She
waived her hand and shook her head in silence,
thus indicating that she could say no morethat
human endurance had been stretched to its utmost
verge. Walking deliberately out of the crowd
until she came to the trunkless head of the last of
the Chickahominy chiefs, she bent over the
mutilated
remains for a moment in unutterable sorrow,
and then throwing her eyes to heaven, dark in
despair
,
she stooped to pluck one of the blue feathers
from the scalp, and then with sad and lingering
steps, proceeded to her home.
All were impressed with involuntary respect for
the bereaved maiden, and even the hardened
officer
suffered her to depart without having finished
his examination. Sufficient, however, had been
gleaned for the jury to bring in a verdict of
murder
8 *
by the hands of some of the Chickahominy
tribe of savages. This tribe of Indians inhabited
a small town called Orapacks, on the banks of the
river which gave its name to the nation. They
formed a part of the grand confederation which had
first been united under Powhatan, and afterwards his
successor, Opechancanough; the latter of whom so
unfortunately fell, while a prisoner at Jamestown,
by the hands of a dastardly soldier, who took his life
in revenge for some petty wrong, real or imaginary.
The depredation related in the foregoing pages,
and the unfortunate result to so many of its
perpetrators
,
was the first interruption to the general
peace which Sir William Berkley had been enabled
to secure for the colony, after various sanguinary
massacres and conflicts, with the numerous tribes
composing the empire of Virginia, as it was
sometimes
called, and reaching from the Peninsula to
the present seat of Richmond.
It may be well, perhaps, to state that a process
had been despatched, for form's sake, to summon
the Recluse, but it was returned as similar
messages
had always been beforehe was
non est
inventus
.
The dead bodies were now removed,that of
Jamieson to the more consecrated ground around
the church, and those of the Indians to a sort of
Potter's-field or general burying ground, such as
every city has possessed from the time of Judas
Iscariot to the present day.
The necessary and justifiable sacrifice of some half
a dozen savages was, at that time, too common a
circumstance in Jamestown, long to affect the
gayeties
of the day. Accordingly the afternoon found
the daughters and wives of the hardy citizens
gayly tripping it over the green common, to which
we have already introduced the reader, inspired by
the music of two sable musicians, who rattled and
scraped defiance to all untoward interruptions
whatsoever. The town was full of strangers from
the neighbouring plantations, together with many
members of the House of Burgesses from
surrounding
counties, who had arrived in preparation for
the meeting of that body, summoned to be held on
the third succeeding day. Many of these dignified
personages had collected on the green, to witness
the enjoyment of the humbler citizens and their
wives and daughters.
A merry set of joyful lads and lasses were
whirling
through the giddy dance; when all at once a
savage yell abruptly struck upon the ear, the music
ceased, the youths stood still in the circle, while
some of the maidens fled toward the public square,
and others sought the protection of their fathers,
husbands, or lovers. Consternation was visible in
the boldest countenances. The transactions of the
morning had unstrung the nerves of the females,
and urged the sterner sex to thoughts of war, which
had lain dormant since the general peace and
the death of Opechancanough. But soon a jingle
of little bells was heard, and the next moment the
multitude burst into a loud laugh, and
simultaneously
cast their eyes up to a tall tree which
overhung
the green, and upon which was seen a
painted
savage, descending with great agility; he soon
leaped into the middle of the area, where the dance
had been in progress, and commenced shuffing
away at a most indefatigable rate, the fiddlers
striking
at the same moment into the humour of this
strange visiter, and he himself dexterously rattling
a number of little bones which he held between his
fingersthe bells all the while continuing to jingle,
and producing the strangest effect upon the ear.
His face was painted in the ordinary warrior guise,
his head shaved close to the cranium, save a lock
upon the crown, to which hung a tuft of scarlet
feathershis person was grotesquely ornamented
with beads, bells and buttons in great profusion,
interspersed with hundreds of red feathers, from
which he took his name. He was called Red
Feather Jack, and was remarkably fond of the
music and all the ordinary diversions of the whites.
In this respect he was the most remarkable Indian
of his daythat race having been peculiar for the
haughty and dignified contempt with which they
looked upon the amusements of their civilized
neighbours. He was known to be as desperate in
battle as he was light hearted and merry at the
sports of the white man, and had never been
known guilty of any kind of treachery, and was a
universal favourite at Jamestown among all the
young people of both sexes. It may be readily
imagined, therefore, that a shout of Red Feather
Jack, which was instantly raised by the assembled
throng, brought no slight accession to their
numbers
.
The amusement thus afforded was kept up,
intermingled with dances of their own, to which
Jack beat time with his loudest bells, until the hour
had arrived for the commencement of the more
imposing
and aristocratic ceremonies and amusements
at the gubernatorial mansion.
Red Feather Jack was believed by many to be
an admirer of Wyanokee's, though of a different
tribe. He had once, on an occasion nearly similar
to the one just related, offered to lead her to the
dance, but the more refined maiden looked upon
him with ineffable scorn and contempt, produced as
much, doubtless, by his undignified and unnational
habits, as by what she considered his inferior rank
and understanding. After the cessation of the
various sports upon the greenin the warehouse,
and throughout the town, Jack was taken to the
Berkley Arms, where his merry perfomances were
kept up until a late hour of the night, to the great
amusement of the loungers and the disappointed
youths who had vainly aspired to a participation
in the celebration of the cavaliers.
There was one peculiar circumstance attending
this day's celebration which became generally the
subject of after remark. Not a sign of festivity or
rejoieing was visible at the Cross Keys. Its
master
sat a solitary spectator in his own door,
apparently
regarding the passing levities with sovereign
contempt. This of course did not escape without
many comments from the more jovial landlord of
the Arms. It was likewise remarkable that
none of the Independents were visible on this
general holyday, and this was the more singular as
many of the humbler followers of the late Lord
Protector had been sold into temporary bondage,
and of course might be supposed eager to enjoy
one day's cessation from labour, even if they did
not care to join the humbler citizens in their
demonstrations
of loyalty.
CHAPTER VIII.
As the sun went down upon the boisterous
revellers
in the ancient city, and closed the
festivities
of the day among the plebeians, the aristocracy
of the vice-regal court began to roll along the
streets in their carriages, and surround the door
of the stout old knight who represented the person
of his royal master in the colony. The members
of the Council and of the house of Burgesses, with
their wives and daughters, and all other citizens
and sojourners of distinction were among the
number
.
Now came the crash of carriagesswearing
of footmencracking of whips, rattling of wheels
clattering of steps, and the pompous
announcement
of the man in office, as each party was
marshalled
into the long suite of apartments brilliantly
lighted for the occasion. At the head of the
largest
room stood Sir William and Lady Berkley.
The old knight was dressed in a blue velvet
doublet
,
which being slashed below the belt or
waistband
,
protruded out all round so as to show
the yellow silk linings of the aforesaid garment,
fringing and ornamenting the waist. His breeches
were of pink satin, and were cut in what was called
at that day
[3]
[3]
See Holmes.
the petticoats; they were tied to
the large mouthed silk hose with gay ribands, and
the lining of the breeches being longer than the
garment itself, formed a sort of ornament for the
overhanging hose; immediately over this row of
knotted ribands ornamenting the knee, his breeches
hung in ample folds. The sleeves of his doublet
reached nearly to the elbow, and from the end of
these the shirt was so fashioned as to bulge out in
large flowing plaits to his ruffled wrists. His
stockings
were of white silk, and shoes ornamented with
a profusion of ribands, knotted and bound into the
shape of flowers. On one shoulder hung a short
mantle, reaching to the haunches and falling in
rich folds over one side of his person. Lady
Berkley
appeared for the first time without her
farthingale
,
but still retained its cotemporary, the French
hood. In place of the starched ruff, she wore the
graceful and flowing collar, falling in folds and
terminated
in rich pointed lace round the upper half
of the bust; she wore a stomacher indeed, but
greatly modified from the long strait jacket
fashion of the preceding reign.
A slight degree of pomp and formality
characterized
the profound inclination of the knight's
magisterial
person, as some guest of distinction was from
time to time announced, while his lady performed
her part of the ceremony in exact accordance with
the stately habits of her lord, but softened by a
native blandness of manner and sweetness of
disposition
.
She was a lady in the most refined and
polished acceptation of the term. They were both
just sufficiently advanced in years to add the
dignity
of age to that resulting from their station, and
command respect from those who moved within
their sphere. The ladies began now to re-appear,
after the momentary retouch of the toilet, and
arrange
themselves round the apartment apparently
appropriated to the dance, from a band of
musicians
stationed some six feet above the floor in a
temporary orchestra. The first touch upon the
string of the leader's kit was magicalthe chords
of every young female heart in the room vibrated
in unison. No letting down of one string and
raising
of another was required to bring them to
concert
pitch; like the blooded charger in the field,
in whose veins the first clang of the trumpet sends
the vital stream glistening to the very eye-balls,
their gayly decorated persons were at once
glowing
with animation; their eyes sparkling and their
bosoms heaving with impatience, joy, and
anticipated
triumph. But when the bow of an evident
master was drawn over the strings of his rusty
cremona in a long signal sweep, every heart
palpitated
in eagerness. The eyes of the gentlemen
wandered over the multitude of youthful and
lovely
faces beaming with a delighted expression, and
all were keenly alive to the coming pleasures of
the dance. But there was a precedence in the
arrangement
of the first set which we must by no
means neglect. Virginia Fairfax, by right of birth
and consanguinity to the governor, invariably
assumed
her aunt's place at the head of the set.
Vol. I. 9
The blooming Hebe issued forth from the
impenetrable
ranks of her compeers with the
blushing
grace and beauty of a nymphher hand was
slightly extended as though its owner were
conscious
that scores of the opposite ranks would have
perilled life and fortune for its possession. She
was clad in simple white; not a colour marring
the chaste and perfect purity of her attire, save the
transparent shadow of a crimson tint which rose
and fell in vivid flashes over her complexion with
the rapidity of thought. Near her stood a youth,
his finely formed person set off to the best
advantage
by the gay and tasteful fashion of his time,
and his dark hazel eye, brilliant with the
momentary
fire of excitement. Instinctively he moved
forward to receive the outstretched and now
trembling
little hand, but scarcely had he gained it
before
a competitor appeared upon the field, of not
less personal and far more aristocratic pretension.
With your leave, sir, said Frank Beverly, with
a profound inclination of his finely dressed person,
as he took the hand which Bacon, in the abstraction
of the moment, was about to usurp. The latter
retired
in the most undisguised mortification; his rival
moving to the head of the set with all the grace and
ease of self-possession, rank, and consciousness of
right in the present instanc.
Sir William himself bent his dignity to enjoy
this scene, the most evident satisfaction beaming
upon his countenance as he cast an intelligent glance
toward his lady.
Our heroine had been too finely schooled in the
etiquette and manners of the ball-room, to allow
the most penetrating observer any means of
ascertaining
whether the incident just related was as
pleasing to her as to her partner. Bacon's
mortification
was not long visible, for with a desperate
sort of boldness, quite foreign to his general
demeanour
,
he crossed the room and approached a
young lady whose beauty shone conspicuous amid
all the gay throng by which she was surrounded.
Harriet Harrison was the daughter of one of the
proudest and most wealthy families in the colony.
They moved in the front ranks of those who
radiated
around the fashionable orbit of which the
Governor and his family were the principal
luminaries
,
and were esteemed by them as among their
most honoured friends and supporters. Harriet
was the intimate friend of Virginia Fairfax, and,
after her mother, the most esteemed repository of
her confidence. Though an idea of rivalry in any
shape or form had never entered their young and
guileless hearts, the youthful Cavaliers who floated
upon the same fashionable tide, had frequently
placed them in this attitude in their private
discussions
of the various personal and mental
attractions
of the maidens, each in her turn proving the
reigning favourite, as their respective admirers
happened to possess the supremacy over the minds
of their companions. She was near the same age
with Virginia, and undoubtedly possessed
attractions
of the most captivating quality, both in mind
and person, yet they were finely contrasted with
those of her friend. Harriet's complexion was
brunetteher hair dark and shining as the raven's
plumageher eye black, keen and sparkling, her
finely pencilled brows beautifully overshadowing
the native archness of her countenance, and her
mouth always expressive of amiable feelings, just
sufficiently characterized perhaps by a dash of
innocent
humour and coquetry; or rather that
coquetry
which is the result of archness and humour
as distinguished from premeditated design. Her
figure was slight but finely proportioned. As
Bacon approached this laughing little belle, his
boldness visibly diminished beneath her
sparkling
eye, and his petition for her hand was uttered
with the most courtly and deferential humility.
The brunette east a significant glance toward her
friend at the head of the set, and then with
promptitude
accepted the offered partner, her intelligent
and sparkling countenance turning towards Charles
Dudley, who stood near, with a speaking archness,
which conveyed as plainly as it could have been
in words, her perfect understanding of the
byplay
which was going on at the expense of his
friend. The set being completed, the music now
struck up its enlivening notes, and the various
contending
passions and emotions of those engaged
were soon lost for the time in the giddy whirl of
excitement which succeeded. Every countenance
was clad in joy and hilarityBacon himself
seeming
to forget, in the secret pleasure created by the
occasional touch of Virginia's hand, that he
himself
was not the honoured partner. Nor was the
exhilirating effect of the dance confined to those
who partook in the exercisethe young enjoyed
it present, the old by retrospection. The latter
lived over again the gay and brilliant dreams of
their own youth, and were what they beheld.
The music perhaps touched upon some long
forgotten
associations of other days and other friends,
when and with whom they had mingled in the
merry dance under circumstances like the present.
These hallowed and blessed associations were not
unmixed with melancholy, but it was of the softest
and most soothing kind; the tide of feeling flowed
over the heart to the cadences of the music, rising
and swelling like the waves of the subsiding storm,
and irresistibly inviting to mental calm and
repose
.
The elder matrons sat under its influence
their eyes half closed in a sort of pleasing
abstraction
while
a gentle and subdued smile of mixed
emotions played upon their lips. They lived
again in the persons of their gay and happy
daughters
,
and with no more selfish wish than to see
their offspring following quietly in their own
footsteps
.
The formality which had somewhat
characterized
the opening ceremonies was entirely banished
it could not live in the atmosphere of music and
the dance. Sir William and his compeers in
9*
dignity seemed early to be sensible of this, for
no sooner had the motion of hands round
commenced
,
than he collected his forces, and retreated
to the card room, where, from the excitement of
the game and wine, they endeavoured to
compensate
themselves for their want of the more
sentimental
retrospects of their ladies.
Conversation, which till now had flagged under
the withering influence of etiquette, burst forth in
all the vivacity of unrestrained and unsophisticated
nature. The eyes of Harriet Harrison sparkled
like gems, as she and Virginia laughed and chatted
together, when they occasionally met in the figures
of the dance. But with all Virginia's hilarity,
an acute observer might have perceived a shade
more than once passing over the sunshine of her
countenance; whether owing to some vague
presentiment
of coming evilto better defined
apprehensions
from those events which had so lately
passed under her eyesto the mysterious
injunctions
of the Recluse, or to some not altogether
satisfactory arrangements of the dance, we shall
leave the sagacity of the reader to determine.
Certain it is, however, that she underwent no
little badinage from her lively friend and
confidant
.
A certain emphatic declination in the notes of
the leader, which all the initiated will understand,
warned those in possession of the floor, that there
is an order of rotation in happiness on these
joyful
occasions, a cadence, any thing but musical to
those happily and mutually suited in partners,
while to those not so fortunately coupled, it was a
joyful relief. Each gentleman led his partner to
her seat, which she had scarcely taken, perhaps,
if one of the favoured few, before new applications
for the honour of her hand were laid at her feet.
Bacon had no sooner escorted Harriet to her place,
than turning to her friend he again put in his
claim in more formal parlance than his former
instinctive aspirations, but again he was doomed
to disappointment; Philip Ludwell on this
occasion
,
with a smirking smile upon his countenance,
claiming a prior engagement. Bacon scowled upon
him with mingled scorn and rage, as he turned
upon his heel and besought the honour of the first
hand within his reach. But if he was disappointed,
his friend Dudley seemed more fortunate, for at
the same moment that the former led out his
partner, he encountered the latter escorting the
pretty Harrietand certainly no one in the room
claimed a larger portion of his sympathy. But
he was struck with the change in the
countenance
of the lively brunette in the very short time
which had elapsed between the two sets. During
the first, there was a free, untramelled, mischievous
expression in her countenance, which was now
merged in one of partial embarrassment. The
guileless and confiding air with which she had
looked into the face of her former partner, was
now exchanged for one of consciousness, as if the
lively little belle expected retributive justice from
her friends for her own previous badinage. The
unpractised Dudley interpreted these appearances
any thing but favourably to his own ardent hopes.
Bacon was more deeply studied in the workings
of the human face divine, especially when
feeling
no personal interest in their meaning, and he
therefore amused himself in his ungrateful
situation
,
by watching the changes of his friend's arch
little mistress. He doubtless considered it a
beautiful and interesting development of character,
to see this lively little rompso lately overflowing
with vivacity and animal spiritsall at once
transformed
into the sensitive, sedate, and downcast
maiden. He was certainly not less amused to
perceive that these two interesting young
personages
were unconsciously playing at cross purposes.
First the gentleman became cold and moody at
the reserve exhibited by his mistress, which did
undoubtedly exist, but from which his jealous
anxiety made him draw a most erroneous
conclusion
;
while she, on the other hand, resented this
apparently ungrateful return for a partiality which
her own consciousness induced her to believe was
perceptible to its object; indeed this very fear of
his knowledge was perhaps the moving impulse
of her own wayward conduct. The resentment
occasioned by his apparent coldness, and assumed
indifference, produced a corresponding feeling in
her bosom, and thus they mutually acted and
reacted
upon each other, departing farther and
farther
from a mutual understanding at every renewed
attempt, until at the close of the set, Dudley
retired
,
as he imagined, irreconcilably offended,
folding
his arms upon his breast, and looking the very
picture of love in despair. While in this mood
Bacon approached him, and tapped him on the
shoulder, saying, Hah, Charles, would'st drown
thyself? Thou dost not set thy life at a pin's fee
I'll warrant me. Why, what would'st thou have,
man? Thou would'st not have her forward and
pert enough to run unbidden into thy arms?
Run into my arms, forsooth! I think she was
nearer running into thine own.
Tut man, does thy knowledge of the sex
extend
no farther? Dost not know thou art
quarrelling
with the light of thine own eyes? Art thou
not yet acquainted with the windings and apparent
inconsistencies of the female heart? I say
apparent
,
because when the
primum mobile
is once
understood, all these little perversities of lovers'
quarrels are beautifully consistent, and always
traceable to the one great original cause. Once
gain an insight of this leading motive, and you will
admire where you now condemnyou will
attribute
to maidenly modesty and proper reserve,
what you now censure as perverse and whimsical.
I understand you not, Sir Professor.
No, because you are interested in the matter.
You cannot truly place the small end of the
telescope
to your eye, and see yourself at the other.
You cannot stand, for instance, as I stand, and see
yourself as I see you. But study the subject a
little before you give way to the identical petulant
humours with which you would quarrel in your
mistress.
And how long is it, pray, Sir Sage, since you
took the beam from your own eye. If mine
deceived
me not, I saw you but a little while since
swelling with all the offended dignity of majesty
itselfmerely because some more fortunate swain
had previously secured the hand of the Governor's
fair niece.
You are as far wrong in my affairs, Charles,
as you were just now in your own. You seem
peculiarly
predisposed to-night, to see only the
surface
of things. Suppose that some half a dozen
of those butterflies who are now congregating
round Lady Berkley, were to form a plot by
which you were to be deprived of the hand of that
lady whom you most desired to lead to the dance?
Nay, more, suppose that you considered it all
important
to your interests that you should possess
the hand on this particular night, and that you
should be thwarted by such a contrivance of
sub
vice-royalty!
What would you do? Would you
content yourself with spending your rage upon
your own lips between your teeth?
No, by heavens, I would tweak the nose of a
small sprig of royalty itself.
What, under the circumstances and
responsibilities
that environ us to-night?
No! not to-night certainly; there is no hurry
in the businesshis nasal organ will be as
tangible
a week hence as now, I suppose; but who is
it that has done this deed? I see you have many
rivals.
Frank Beverly, to be sure.
I supposed as much.
You see, continued Bacon, that I have
now removed the mote from my own eye, and
that you did in my case exactly what you did in
your ownyou looked only at the surface. But
really, Charles, between ourselves, I begin to
entertain
some fears that they will at last affect
Virginia
with their own aristocratic notions and
pretensions
,
for the absence of which we have so
often praised her. I have seen a strange unusual
something stealing over her countenance whenever
I have approached her of late, which I do not like.
She evidently struggles with it herself, but it has
obtained the mastery in every instance, so far.
Think you they will succeed at last?
I know not, my friend! but step with me
into the entrya word in your ear. The parties
stepped just behind the easings to the door of the
room in which they had been dancing, so as to
occupy a small entry-way between the two
largest
apartments of the mansion, and there Dudley
continued in an under tone.
Do you think they will dare
the deed
tonight
?
As sure as there is truth in that strange old
manand he has never yet deceived me!
Tis well! and are all things prepared for their
reception?
They are! As for myself, never did such
occasion
come more opportunely. I will raise a
bloody monument to perpetuate the events of this
night upon more than one memory in yonder gay
assembly! And since the thought strikes me,
Dudley, tis pity I disturbed the savage moroseness
which was just stealing over you; however I shall
retain a
quantum sufficit
for us both!
At that moment they were about to return to
the party which they had left, when Dudley
elevating
his finger, said, Hist!and Bacon heard
his own name pronounced, just on the other side of
the partition against which they were leaning.
The voice was Ludwell's. Can you tell me
Beverly
,
said he, the reason why Bacon does not
wear the love lock!
Yes, I can, nature stamped him for a
Roundhead
and Crop-ear at his birth. Have you not
observed how obstinately his curling locks are
matted to his head? I'll warrant me if the truth
could be known, his father was as pestilent a
Rumper as ever sung a psalm on horseback.
Bacon heard no more; he was seized with the
most ungovernable rage, and the utmost
endeavours
and remonstrances of his friend could
scarcely
prevent him from bursting in upon the
speakers
.
In his endeavours to effect this object he
forced his person partly in front of the doorway,
just sufficiently to perceive that Virginia sat near,
for whom, he doubted not these observations were
intended. Again he became nearly
unmarrageable
,
until Dudley said to him in a harsh tone.
Rash man, would you sacrifice the whole colony
for the purpose of chastising a piece of unmannerly
insolence upon the spur of the moment, when you
can as well do it to-morrow? Nay, it is the more
manly course of the two.
Bacon by a powerful effort seemed to master his
feelings, and compressing his lips, and folding his
arms so as entirely to deceive his companion, he
marched deliberately into the room, as if he
intended
to cross to the opposite side. But when not
more than three paces from the door, he wheeled
suddenly round and addressed Beverly. This
is no place for a personal rencounter, Sir Slanderer,
and I will no farther break through the rules of
good breeding than to hurl defiance in your teeth,
and even this much I would not do, only that the
defiance may go abroad with the calumny; and
with these words he flung his glove in the face of
him to whom they were addressed. Beverly was
taken entirely by surprise; and for some moments
did not seem to realize the extent of the insult,
and the greater personal indignity which had been
offered to him. He was not long, however, in
comprehending the nature of the case, and
deliberately
stooping to pick up the glove he answered,
This, as you have better said than acted, is no
Vol. I. 10
place to quarrel, but I accept your gage, and dearly
shall it be redeemed on your part.
During this short but pertinent dialogue,
Virginia
screamed and ran to the protection of her
father
and uncle, followed by the other ladies in that
part of the room. A crowd instantly collected
round each of the parties to hear their statements
of the case. But Sir William, always prompt and
energetic, ordered the orchestra to strike up and
the dance to be resumed, which had ceased for
the purpose of affording refreshment. A mere
boy's quarrel, said the old Knight with smiling
visage, and the dance was resumed, as if nothing
unusual had occurred.
General joy and hilarity were soon restored, for
though the serenity and happiness of several
important
personages of our narrative might have been
disturbed, there were still plenty of those left who
were both light of heart and nimble of foot. The
dance was again going round, wine circulating, wit
sparkling, and merry faces and loud voices in all
quarters, when a sudden explosion like the discharge
of a broadside from a line of battle ship, seemed to
shake the very foundations of the earth; windows
rattled and fellplastering came tumbling down
and ladies screamed and leaped from the casements,
while others were borne off fainting to their friends.
Bacon seized Virginia and Harriet, one under each
arm, and bore them to a carriage, while Mr.
Fairfax and Governor Berkley forced their ladies
into the same vehicle, ordering the driver to speed
for his life to the residence of the former. A
bright red light in the midst of a dark column of
smoke was now seen to ascend from behind the
Governor's house. The powder magazine had
been fired by the Cromwellians who were now in
open revolt against the government. The schemes
which they had been so long meditating, and which
Bacon so truly anticipated, had now arrived at the
crisisthe struggle was commenced which was to
test whether a few scores of misguided but brave
zealots were to triumph over the constituted
authorities
of the land, as they had before done in
England.
CHAPTER IX.
The
night was dark and lowering, and masses
of heavy clouds enveloped the city, a bright red
column of fire ever and anon shot fitfully up from
the smouldering ruins of the magazine, tipping the
clouds with a crimson tinge, and illuminating the
city to the light of noonday, and again suddenly
giving place to volumes of thick sulphureous smoke
which involved the surrounding objects in tenfold
darkness. Drums were heard beating to arms
trumpets sounding the chargefifes piercing the
airbeils ringing the alarmmuskets and
petronels
discharged in quick succession, swords
clashing
,
women shrieking, and men were seen running
hither and thither in all the tumult of popular
commotion
.
Bacon had no sooner lifted his
frightened
proteges into the carriage, than rushing into
the back court, he found Dudley at the head of their
youthful corps already desperately engaged with
the Roundheads. He immediately threw
himself
into the thickest of the fight. With all their
desperate valour, however, the two young officers
were quickly sensible that they had entirely
miscalculated
the number and appointments of their
enemies. In vain they endeavoured to repulse the
hardy veterans who forced their way to the doors
and windows of the gubernatorial mansion. The
assailants moved to their work in a solid phalanx,
that veteran soldier Worley, conspicuous at their
head, and literally hewing down all opposition.
One line after another of the valiant and high born
youths fell before the murderous weapons of the
insurgents. In vain did Bacon and Dudley, and
Beverly and Ludwell, all now united in a common
cause, enact prodigies of valour; their impetuous
lunges fell powerless upon the iron frames of their
opponents. Crowds of citizens now rushed against
the insurgents some armed with swords, others
with scythe blades, others again with bludgeons,
and the rest with such means of destruction as they
could seize in the street as they hurried to the
contest
.
The accession of strength to the cause of the
government was as yet of little avail, Bacon and
his followers being driven to the walls, while the
insurgents were protected on each side by a high
wooden fence or barricade. Tables, chairs and
bedsteads were hurled upon the heads of the
besiegers
,
and the lower windows were throaged with
eager
citizens, throwing their hastily seized weapons
upon the heads of the foe in a vain effort to come
within reach. The Cromwellians were now
likewise
receiving momentary reinforcements of those
who leapt the high fences, and filled up the
vacancies
in the rear, as the front ranks fell in the
desperate
rencounter with the youths and citizens. To
whom the victory would fall could not long prove
doubtful, situated as they now were; this Sir William
10*
Berkley and his kinsman Fairfax had no doubt
perceived early in the engagement, for a shout
from a multitude without the enclosure, in the
midst of which might be heard the voice of Brian
O'Reily, now announced the presence of the
Governor
.
The welcome sound was speedily and
cheerily
answered by the sinking youths within, who
took courage at the approach of succour, and fought
with renewed spirit. The wooden barricade was
now seen to heave and shake, with every motion
and creak of which O'Reily shouted in chorus,
until
at length the whole yielded and fell with a loud
crash. A rush of citizens quickly filled up the
breach, and poured their blows into the flank of the
Roundheads, who now changing their front charged
upon their new assailants, at the head of whom
were the Governor and Gideon Fairfax. The two
old Cavaliers laid about them in a style worthy of
their best and most chivalrous days, and the
citizens
as stoutly supported them although but
poorly armed and equipped for such a
rencounter
.
By this change of front the gallant little
corps which had so long maintained its ground,
was now in some measure relieved, and no
longer
subject to the murderous strokes of the
ironhanded
Cromwellians. By the order of Bacon
they now poured their fire into the flank of the
enemy, and by this double annoyance to their
phalanx
,
would doubtless have speedily terminated the
conflict, but the friends of the Insurgents without,
taking example by the manuvre of the governor
and his party, now broke down the barricade on
the other side, and rushed in their turn to the scene
of conflict. As this new reinforcement were
pushing
through the court to jointheir friends, in
storming
the first breach, a loud explosion from Sir
William's
quarter was heard, followed by the groans
and shrieks of a whole phalanx of the old and new
assailants
,
in whose ranks a perfect lane was cut by this
discharge of grape shot through the very centre of
their column. A rush was now instantly made for
the possession of the cannon, and as the citizens
poured through the governor's house and the
Roundheads
through the new breach in the party-wall, a
deadly scuffle ensued, which became more and more
ferocious and sanguinary as each party received
fresh accessions from their friends without. And
though the Cavaliers and their supporters
outnumbered
their enemies, the latter had decidedly the
advantage
in equipment, strength and discipline;
more especially in the hand-to-hand mode of
warfare
which now became necessary from the numbers
crowded into so small a space. But there was
another advantage which they possessedthey had
but one commander, the veteran Worley, while
the Cavaliers and citizens of the town were at one
time commanded by Bacon, and at another by Sir
William Berkley.
Bacon perceiving the effect of this circumstance,
singled out and attacked the opposite leader in
person, determined, if he lost his life in the
unequal
conflict, to make the attempt at least to place
the two parties on a more equal footing. But
Worley quickly detected his aim, and being a not
less expert swordsman than his antagonist, took
advantage of an impetuous thrust, and quickly
brought him to the grapple of close quarters. One
excelled in strength, and the other in activity,
but nothwithstanding the latter, superior powers
of endurance would soon have ended the duel
unfavourably
for our hero, had not a blow from
behind
brought his powerful enemy to the ground.
Before Bacon discovered O'Reily, he was well
convinced that the bludgeon which had interfered
so opportunely in his behalf, was wielded by no
tyro at the weapon. However, he lost but few
seconds, either upon his assailant or deliverer, but
quickly directed his attention to matters of more
absorbing importance in the direction of cannon.
Meantime O'Reily seized the opportunity afforded
by the engrossing nature of the conflict, in the
quarter just mentioned, and stooping down he took
one of Worley's feet under each arm, using his legs
as shafts, and dragged him off to a horse stall hard
by, where having deposited the insensible veteran
upon the straw, he turned the key and consigned
it to his pouch.
The battle now consisted almost entirely of
numerous
desperate individual conflicts, each citizen
as he arrived singling out some hated Roundhead
neighbour, and he in his turn as anxious to vent
the party and personal hatred which had been so
long festering within his bosom. Sir William
Berkley perceiving that their veteran foes had a
decided advantage in the position now occupied
by the parties respectively, quickly devised a
scheme, in concert with Mr. Fairfax, by which,
while the Governor kept the enemy engaged over
the cannon, the latter should take a score of sturdy
citizens, and rushing in, regardless of consequences,
drag this sole apparent cause of contention into
the public square, and thus change the scene of
action to a more open position, where the superior
bodily strength of the insurgents could no longer
avail them. The measure was executed with great
spirit and promptitude, and succeeded beyond
their most sanguine expectations; for no sooner
had the citizens commenced dragging the piece at
a brisk trot, than both parties tumultuously
pressed
round its wheels, and thus unconsciously were
brought into a fair field of action. Bacon, as soon
as he saw the design of the movement, wheeled
his hardy youths through the Governor's house,
and formed a line at the critical moment when the
confused combatants arrived fighting over the gun:
thus affording a rallying point for the friends of
order and the government. The governmental
troops immediately formed upon the line already
partly established by Bacon and his corps, and thus
the gun was at length brought to bear for a time
upon
the opposing ranks. The light which had
hitherto
fitfully gleamed upon the strife, was now
sinking
after long intervals, and emitting that unsteady
and wavering flame which announces rapidly
approaching
extinction. A few rounds of musketry
and one or two discharges from the small
fieldpiece
,
and the arena of conflict was shrouded in
impenetrable darkness, save from the
momentary
glare which preceded the explosions. The
Cromwellians, locking their column more
compactly
together, rushed in a solid body upon the
newly formed line of the citizens. So sudden and
so impetuous was this movement, and so skilfully
executed, that the brave but ill disciplined
combatants
,
against whom it was directed, gave way
before the solid phalanx of the enemy, leaving the
long disputed fieldpiece surrounded by the
Insurgents
.
They immediately turned its muzzle upon
its late owners, and were about charging it with
the usual silence and promptitude of their
movements
,
when a bright light from a burning torch
was seen forcing its way almost undisputed through
their ranks. The Cromwellians stood aside for its
passage with an irresolute sort of tardiness,
produced
by a doubt whether the bearer were a friend
or an enemy. But they were not left long in
suspense, for he had no sooner arrived at this
point, now forming the line between the
contending
parties, than he sprang upon the carriage of
the gun, holding his torch aloft, so as to shed
a glaring light upon the assembled multitude of
both parties, who stood now for a moment of truce,
in wonder at the strange and gigantic figure before
them.
Hold! said he in a loud authoritative voice,
and waiving his hand with a commanding gesture
over the ranks of the Roundheads who crowded
round him. Where is your commander, Worley?
He is slain, answered twenty voices.
His blood be upon his own head. Where is
he who commandeth in his stead?
Here am I, said a short black visaged
thickset
man. Here am I, Ananias Proudfit, whom
the Lord hath commissioned this night to take
away the wicked from the land, and to root out
the Amalekite, and the Jebusite, and the Perizzite,
and the Hittite, and the Girgashite and the
Amorite
.
And are not this council and this wicked
Governor
justly comparable to the five Kings who took
shelter in the cave of Makkeda, who were
Peace, brawler, peace, thundered the gigantic
umpire, and cease to pervert the word of God
to thy murderous and unholy purposes. Take
warning by the fate of thy predecessor. Thou
would'st not listen to a more safe and peaceable
admonition, administered in humility and good
faith. Now I tell thee that if thou art still deaf,
this good sword shall eleave thy hardened skull,
and he drew his formidable weapon and
brandished
it over the torch. Hah! sayest thou so,
said the enraged Proudfit, aiming a deadly blow at
the gigantic figure towering above him, but which
the stranger struck aside with the ease of a wary
and practised swordsman, and in the next moment
as he had promised, drove his ponderous weapon
into the skull of his assailant. Then hurling his
torch into the advancing throng of the
Independents
,
he brandished the huge glittering blade in
fearful circles around the besieged gun, and
quickly
cleared a space for its more dexterous and
effectual
employment.
The fight was now renewed in all quarters, but
evidently to greater disadvantage on the part of the
Insurgents, than they yet had to contend with.
The loss of their commander a second time, even
in the ordinary course of warfare, would doubtless
have disheartened them, but the circumstances
under
which the last had fallenthe superstitious
reverence in which they were accustomed to hold
the Recluseall contributed to damp their ardour,
to say nothing of the bloody barricade he had
already
piled around his person. They were now,
too, in a comparatively open field, where the
greater
numbers of their enemies could avail much, and
where no opportunity was afforded for the fatal
grapple which had so well served the rebels in the
earlier stages of the conflict. They were assailed
from all points of the square at the same moment,
while the Recluse, in the very heart of their ranks,
was literally hewing them down like weeds and
cumberers of the ground. No quarter was asked or
giventhey had staked their all upon the success
of their enterprise, and seemed determined, long
after all hope of success in their first project must
have failed, to leave a bloody monument to their
foolhardy courage, if not to their wisdom and
forethought
.
Nathaniel Bacon, exhausted by the loss
of blood from wounds received in the desperate
repulse of the insurgents during the early part of
the engagement, and feeling his tremendous
responsibility
for his inadequate preparations, no
longer so onerous or so urgent upon himself, fell
upon the field, and was borne to the house of his
early friend and patron.
With the powerful aid of the Recluse, and the
accumulating reinforcements from the loyal
citizens
of the town, the remainder of the gallant but
misguided zealots were soon either cut down,
captured
,
or put to flight. The slain of the Cavalier
party
were laid out in the State House, while those of
the opposite faction were deposited in the tobacco
warehouse, so lately the scene of youthful revels.
The wounded were removed to the houses of
their friends and relations throughout the city, and
in a short time as profound silence reigned along
its deserted streets as if no one had arisen to
disturb
its peace. Not an individual could be found
who had seen the Recluse after the termination of
the struggle. The slain were carefully examined,
but no such huge proportions as his lay stretched
in death, among the gory trophies of his prowess.
The veteran soldiers, so many of whom had
fallen
,
while others were confined within the jail of the
colony, were a remnant of Cromwell's soldiers who
had been sent from the parent country, on account
of their restless and dangerous propensities, some
of them had been sold into temporary bondage,
while others established themselves in business or
planting on their own account. They had formed
Vol. I. 11
the desperate resolution of rising upon the
governor
and his guests while seated over their wine,
supposing that, in the promiscuous massacre which
they had intended to perpetrate, all the
councillors
,
and leading men of the colony would be
swept away, and themselves thereby enabled to
revolutionize the government.
The Recluse had doubtless been vainly urged to
join their desperate faction, and it would appear
that they had either depended upon their threats
of vengeance as a sufficient warrant for his fidelity,
or trusted to his supposed predilection for their
cause, and hatred against the authorities then at
the head of colonial affairs. Nor does it appear
that he did openly and boldly betray them. Bacon
had by some means or other of his own, pryed so
far into the secret of the incipient rebellion as to
learn who were the prominent leadersby the
suggestion
of the Recluse, obtained through the agency
of Virginia, he had found access to the ear of one
Berkenhead, an influential man among them, who,
influenced by gold and liberal promises, betrayed
so much of the conspirators' designs as enabled
Bacon
to adopt the preparati ons of which we have just
seen the result. And though they were of
themselves
totally inadequate, yet they served the
purpose
of keeping the murderers at bay, until time
was afforded for the intervention of the citizens,
and thus had preserved the lives of the Governor and
his Council, together with those of many members
of the House of Burgesses. The Assembly, which
convened three days afterward, unanimously voted
three thousand weight of tobacco to the traitor
Berkenhead, and passed sundry pious resolutions
of thanks to the Almighty for their deliverance,
besides setting the day apart as one of
thanksgiving
for ever after.
The ancient city presented a strange and
desolate
appearance on the succeeding morning, in the
neighbourhood of the public square. Houses were
deserted by their tenants, windows shattered,
palings
pulled down, the ground stained with blood;
guns, petronels, swords, hats, and missiles of
various
descriptions lay scattered about in strange
confusion.
At length the drowsy citizens were awakened
to the importance of the day. A court of inquiry
was assembled for the purpose of investigating the
conspiracy which had so nearly proved fatal to the
existing order of things on the previous night.
The prisoners were brought from the jail to the
Court House in irons, and all the witnesses
supposed
to know any thing of the matter, were in
readiness. Nathaniel Bacon was the first called,
but Mr. Fairfax came forward and stated that his
wounds were so much more dangerous than had
previously been supposed, that the surgeon
strictly
enjoined quiet and repose, and recommended
if possible to postpone taking his deposition
for the present. As the testimony was ample
and satisfactory without his attendance, the
examination
of course proceeded. Berkenhead's
deposition
was essentially what we have already more
succinetly stated in explanation of the insurrection,
and most of the other witnesses testified only to
what the reader has already seen or surmised. There
was one witness, however, whose testimony was
so novel and amusing, amidst the general scene of
confusion and bloodshed, that we must by no means
neglect it. Brian O'Reily was called in his turn
to give evidence on behalf of the crown on a charge
of treason against the prisoners at the bar.
Well, O'Reily, said the examining officer,
please to tell the court what you know of the
treasonable practices of any of the prisoners at the
bar.
Be the twelve Apostles and St. Patrick into
the bargain, I caught one iv them in the very act.
What act did you see, O'Reily, and which of
these men was the perpetrator?
Faix it was just trason itself I caught him at;
sure if I hadn't brought his head acquainted wid
my shelaleigh, he'd iv murthered one of the king's
officers iny wayyoung master Bacon.
Well, tell us which of these men it was, and
any thing you know concerning the getting up of
this rebellion.
The man's not there at all at allhe's at
another
bar, and has been this ten hours gone.
He's at the bar of God, you mean?
I mane no sich thing, axing your honour's
pardon
for conthradictin you. Here's the key that's
turned an 'im; besides, didn't I slape by the door
all night wid nobody for company but a small dhrop
iv whiskey, and didn't I spake to him this morning
through the key hole, and didn't he coax and
palaver
wid me to let him out, and didn't he come
over me wid his wife and nine childre, one at the
breast, barrin that I knew it was a dd lie at that
same recknin, savin your presence, an didn't he
fret about bein cooped up in sich a place all night
wid nothin to ate an the same to dhrink, barrin
the hay that was in the rack, an didn't I answer
him from the contints iv the book, sayin that
many a betther man than him had been born and
brought up in a manger, (crossing himself) an didn't
he call me all sorts iv hathen names; indeed an
he didthe best iv them was cut-throat and
horsethaif
,
only they were in the Habrew language, an
didn't I tell him he was a Judaite, an a wolf in
sheep's clothin, an that he hated the very name iv
Bacon. and may be he didn't call me a dam'd
papist? An didn't I tell him he'd live to see his
own funeral iny way? an didn't he answer me all
about popes and bulls and papists? Oh! get away
wid your blarney, says I, you're safe now as the
Governor's old bull wid the short tail and the
shambles on two of his legs, only I tould him he'd
perhaps be likein the darbies on his hands instead
of his trotters.
And who was this, Brian, that you held this
long discourse with through a key hole? You're
giving us another of your drunken dreams I fear?
Divil a word iv a lie's in it, your haner, hav'nt
11*
I just come from the stable door, and didn't I set
ould growler, the bull dog to watch by him till I
came backsure he cant come over him wid his
blarney about the wife and the nine childerO be
gorra I'm so tender hearted, it was a clane
temptation
to me.
Who was it had the nine children?
Auld Nick fly away wid the nine he's got iv
them; didn't I tell your haner it was all blarney to
move the tinder feelings of Brian O'Reily?
Who was it then, you were talking to through
the key hole?
An 'is it his name your haner's axing after all
this time? couldn't you just say so at wanst, an
not throw me out wid the story all thegither? It's
the Divil's own aid-the-camp I'm thinkin. It's the
man that makes swords all the time he's makin
horse shoes, they call him Worley I'm thinkin.
Worley! is it possible? have you seen him
this morning?
Be the contints iv the book but I saw him
not an hour gone, through the key hole; he was
stanin up to hay like the Governor's horse, but his
appetite seemed to uv left him intirely.
Can you show the officers where he is?
I can do that same, I'm bould to say; didn't I
tell your haner it's the key I had was turned an
im?
And what is it the key of, O'Reily?
Faix it's the key to the Governor's stable.
(This answer produced a loud laugh from the
spectators
.)
Divel a word o lie's in it.
Well, O'Reily, the officers are waiting on you;
only prove to us that this is not another of your
drunken reveries, and it shall turn out better for
you than you now expect. Since it has been
ascertained
that this man Worley was not to be found
among the slain, the Governor has issued his
proclamation
,
offering two hundred pounds for his
apprehension
,
dead or alive.
Oh! said O`Reily, as he was going out of
the door, but I'm afeard you'll find him rather in a
state iv thribulation, I did some killen an im
myself
:
Oh wasn't that a beauty iv a shelaleigh?
Only to think of two hundred pounds; faix if I
get it but I'll have it set in brass.
The officers in attendance, with Brian at their
head, soon emerged from the Governor's stable
amidst the shouts and cheers of the multitude. The
unfortunate Roundhead commander was brought
into court, suffering severely from thirst, and the
effects of the contusion, produced by the violence
of O'Reily's blow.
We will not detain the reader over revolting
portions of the trial either now or hereafter; suffice
it to say, therefore, in brief, that O'Reily received
the interest of two hundred pounds ever afterwards,
for his capture of the Rebel Chief. Four of the
ringleaders at the second, and final trial were
condemned
and speedily executed, and the others
recommended to mercy. Thus was terminated
this sanguinary conflict, the last convulsive throe
of the Independent faction in the British
dominions
of North America.
As our tale is no farther directly connected with
this ill-advised and hopeless insurrection, we
proceed
in the next chapter with the direct thread of
our narrative, the principal personages of which
were so directly concerned in the bloody affair just
related, that we could not pass it over with any
kind of regard to historical accuracy.
CHAPTER X.
During
the whole of the day succeeding the
insurrection, our hero lay in the most precarious
and dangerous state; and the violent inflammatory
action produced by several large sabre wounds so
much unsettled his reason, that the surgeon was
compelled still farther to deplete his already
exhausted
frame. Towards night his mind recovered
its powers, but his strength was still gone, and he
lay upon his couch in all the helplessness of
infantile
impotency; and toward evening, exhausted by
the previous night of turmoil and strife, succeeded
by a day of feverish restlessness, he at length fell
asleep.
There was one never-wearying eye that
watched
the fitful slumbers of the invalid. Conscious,
perhaps, that Bacon could never be more to her
than a friend and protector, Wyanokee delighted
in rendering him those quiet, but constant and
indispensable services which his situation required.
Not a change of his ever-varying countenance, as
the workings of a diseased and excited imagination,
were from time to time portrayed upon his pale
and already attenuated features, escaped her, while
her own beautiful and expressive countenance,
vividly
displayed, in rapid and corresponding
changes
,
her sympathy with the sleeping sufferer. If
any one approached the door, her keen glance
immediately
arrested the intruder, her finger upon
her lip, and a frown upon her brow, in her
powerful
and national pantomimic token of silence.
If the eye of the sleeper opened for an instant in
bewildered amazement at the difference between
the real scene before him, and the one from which
in sleeping fancy he had just escaped; her wild
and imaginative susceptibilities were instantly on
the alert.
The mind of the aboriginal, even when partially
cultivated, is overcome with superstitious
reverence
and awe, in the presence of one under the
excitement of a diseased imagination. Such had
been the state of feeling with Wyanokee during the
whole of Bacon's mental hallucinations
throughout
the day, and now as she watched at his
bedside
,
during his uneasy slumbers, her keen
perceptions
were tremulously alive to each
successive
demonstration. There was one member of the
family, however, who entered and departed from
the room unchallengedVirginia! At this moment
she enteredher own tender sympathies wrought
upon by all the late harassing events; although
differing in their developments and cause in some
respects, they were in no wise inferior in degree to
those of her protege. She moved with noiseless
step and suppressed respiration until she stood
over the couch of the wounded youth. Long and
feelingly she gazed upon the sharp and pallid
features; there was naught of passion in that gaze
it was pure and heavenly in its origin, as in its
motive. Her moistened eye, with a movement
almost peculiar to the sick room, or the funeral
chamber, turned slowly upon her attendant. No
melting and sympathizing tear softened the
brilliant
and penetrating eye which met her gaze;
there was excitement, deep excitement, but not
the mellowed emotion of regulated sympathy; in
Wyanokee, the imagination controlled the heart
in Virginia, the heart subdued and softened the
imagination.
There was something touchingly beautiful in the
moral development of these two young and
innocent
hearts. There was a mutual instinctive
understanding of each, with regard to the position
of the other, in relation to the wounded youth
before
them; yet it had never been admitted even to
their own consciousness, because they had never
analyzed their own feelings, and circumstances as
yet had never openly betrayed them to each other.
As they mutually exchanged glances, something like
an electric thrill passed chilly through their veins,
but it was only for an instant; the reasoning
faculties
of the mind examined it notthey were not
in a situation to examine itimagination
controlled
the whole mental organization of the one, and
the tenderest and purest emotions of the heart that
of the other. Virginia came to relieve the
faithful
and indefatigable Indian maiden, and as the
only practicable means, sent her under some
pretext
to her mother. She now occupied a seat near
the foot of the couch, in full view of the sleeper's
countenance, faintly illuminated by the subdued
rays of a shaded lamp. She had watched the
varying
and magnetic vibration of muscle and nerve for
nearly an hour, when the eyes of the sleeping
youth slowly and wildly opened upon her in a
bewildered stare, and at length he spoke.
The senses are not the only vehicles for
communicating
passing events to the mind, said he,
his voice already hollow and sepulchral from the
previous excitement of the brain. Virginia
understood
him not, but supposed that his mind was
again wandering, but it was not so; his mental
perceptions were preternaturally clear, as they
sometimes are after painful cerebral excitements.
She made him no answer, hoping that he would
again close his eyes to repose. But he continued,
How else can we gain knowledge of things
which have transpired when all the senses are
shut up in profound slumber? Just now I slept
deeply, but not soothingly, and I thought I was
on the brink of destruction, from which none but
you could save me, and that wyanokee persisted
in attempting the rescue, and the more she
struggled
the more irremediable became my difficulties.
At length you appeared upon the scene, leaning
upon your mother's arm, and she carried away
Wyanokee while you redeemed me from
destruction
.
This is indeed no farther true than that you
have taken the place of your attendant, and that
your mild sympathizing countenance is far more
genial to my present weakened state, than her
wild and startling glances. But does it not seem
as if my mental perceptions had caught a glimpse
of passing events without the intervention of the
animal senses?
Virginia put her finger upon her lip and shook
her head, to remind her charge that strict silence
was enjoined. For this there were other motives
acting upon her perturbed feelings besides the
injunction
of the surgeon, had they been wanting.
The invalid closed his eyes, and in a short time
seemed to sleep more calmly and soundly than he
had yet done. It being the portion of the night
through which Virginia had insisted upon watching,
she moved quietly to a couch by the window
looking upon the river and the blue hills beyond,
and threw herself upon it and gazed out at the
enchanting
scene. Her own flower garden lay
beneath
the window, stretching away towards the
river, and ornamented midway with a tasteful little
summer-house designed by herself, and decorated
by the hands of the ingenious youth who now
lay so helpless before her. The air was balmy
and serene, and redolent of the richest perfumes of
fruits and flowers just bursting into maturity with
the advancing summer. Millions of stars
twinkled
in the high cerulean arch of heaven, and were
reflected back from the broad expanse of waters
Vol. I. 12
beneath, with an enchanting brilliancy. The
murmuring waters of the Powhatan rippled alogn
the sandy shore with a melancholy monotony,
indescribably
soothing to her harassed and troubled
mind. The various noises of the busy world around
were one by one sinking into silence.
Occasionally
the profound stillness which succeeded,
disturbed
by the distant bark of a watch-dog, or the
more rural cackling of geese, faded away in the
distance so imperceptibly as to leave the mind at
a loss to know whether they were real sounds, or
those associations with the scene which the
imagination
often conjures up to bewilder us on such
occasions. Her eyes were half closed for a
moment
under these soothing and seducing influences,
and the next, quickly opened to catch the fiery
track of some darting meteor as it winged its way
through the starry heavens, or to follow the
humbler
lights borne through the air by myriads of
fire flies which brilliantly floated upon the
transparent
atmosphere. A wild and startling note from
some beast of prey, as it roamed through the
trackless and unsubdued forests beyond the river,
occasionally struck upon her ear, and ever and
anon she turned her eyes toward her sleeping
charge, and all the painful and harassing feelings
of the last few days returned. It was like
awaking
from a delicious dream, to the stern reality of
some pressing and constantly obtrusive misfortune.
Her previous life had been tranquil and unruffled;
until now her spirits buoyant and elastic.
Suddenly
the scene had changed, and all the unmarked
and unrecorded pleasures of her youthful years
were lost in the cares and troubles of the present.
She imagined herself the most irremediably
wretched
being in existence. So new was unhappiness to
her, that the slight cloud which now hung between
her and the happiness she had enjoyed seemed
fearfully dark and lowering.
But again the soothing influences of the scene
without imperceptibly stole upon her senses, and
she fell into a slumber. Her imagination, now
uncontrolled by the sterner qualities of mind,
mingled the images retained from the stirring
events of the last few days in the most fantastic
forms. She saw her mother enter the garden with
a slow and solemn step, clad in the habiliments of
the grave.
Her form was aerial and graceful, and her
features
supernaturally beautiful and glorious.
Presently
this figure was met by another of colossal
proportions, approaching the summer house from
the opposite end of the garden; his step was grand
and majestic, and his countenance stern and
warlike
.
He was clad in complete armour, and his
mailed heel as it struck the gravel, sent the blood
cold to her heart, and at once convinced her of the
reality of the scene. As the figures met they
paused and seemed to hold communion for a time,
and then pursued their way together; but when
they returned to view, the relations of the parties
were changed, the colossal figure was using the most
violent gesticulation, to which his companion
seemed
to bow her head in meekness and submission,
but not in conviction. At this the other suddenly
sprang forward, seized his victim, and was about
to leap the garden walls when an attempt to scream
dispelled the illusion. Virginia opened her eyes
and glanced around the room to assure herself of
the reality of the scene before her. The wounded
youth still slept soundly, and the lamp still threw
its flickering shadows on the wall. By a slower
and more cautious movement of the eyes she next
examined the garden without; all was still and
quiet as the grave, and gazing long and
abstractedly
upon the little arbour she again gave way to
the exhaustion of her physical powers, and again
the same figures rose upon her fancy. Now all
doubt of their reality was discarded from the very
circumstance of the former's having proved a
delusion
.
She knew the other was a dream, but this
she felt was truth, and she even went so far as to
reason in her mind upon the strange coincidence
of the dream, and the present real scene. The
gigantic figure was now clad in the gray garb of
the Recluse, his limbs manacled with chains, while
her mother knelt apart in the attitude of deep and
unutterable wo. A crowd was gathered round as
if to witness a public execution; soldiers and
citizens
,
knights and nobles mingled in the confused
throng. The criminal was kneeling upon his
coffin
,
the cap was drawn over his face, and the fatal
word was given! She awoke with the sound of
firearms still ringing in her ears, and the piercing
shrieks of the female figure thrilling through her
veins.
It may be readily imagined that her startled
perceptions
were by no means tranquillized on
perceiving
,
as she opened her eyes, the shadows of moving
figures upon the wall before her. In order to see
from whom these reflections came she must turn her
head and look in the direction of the opposite wall,
but for her life she dared not move! Terror
chained
her to the couch. At length the shadows
moved
towards the door! By a desperate effort she
turned her head in that direction, and to her
amazement
beheld her mother dressed in white, exactly
as she had seen her in her dream, slowly and
steadily
leaving the apartment. She clasped her hand
to her forehead and endeavoured to recall her
bewildered
senses. The confused images of her
slumbering
and waking perceptions were so
inextricably
mingled together that for a time she was
utterly
at a loss to know whether the whole was real
or a dream. Certainly the actors were the same,
and the impressions continuous. She had not long
lain in this bewilderment when she heard the door
leading into the garden, just beneath her window,
softly opened, and her mother in a few moments
walked down the avenue in the very direction she
had before seen her take.
Her eyes were intently riveted upon the
movements
of her parent, until they were hid from her
view by the intervening trees and shrubbery.
12 *
But she removed them notthey were still fixed
upon the spot where she had last seen her, until
her white robes emerged here and there from the
foliage, when her eyes instinctively followed her,
straining her already weakened organs to catch the
slightest change of position, and seemingly
desirous
to penetrate the sombre shadows of the night,
whenever the figure upon which she gazed was
lost to view. At length the door again softly
opened beneath her window; and she saw the figure
no more. But a very few moments elapsed,
however
,
before another appeared upon the scene, of
far more gigantic proportions and questionable
business
at that place and hour. It was the same
figure which she had before seen associated with
the one which had just departed; and now that she
really saw them in flesh and blood, she was more
than ever at a loss to know which and how many
of her visions of the night were real and which
illusory.
The one now before her eyes was clad in his
usual, half puritanical, half military tunic, and as
usual he was fully armed, but the weapons hung
quietly by his side; his arms were folded upon
his breast, and his whole carriage and demeanour
was subdued, sad, and melancholy. He stood
leaning
against the vine-clad column of the arbour,
with his eyes intently fixed upon the spot where
the preoccupant of the scene had disappeared. His
chest heaved with emotion, which ever and anon
found vent in laboured respirations of unspeakable
misery.
At this moment a fierce watch-dog sprung at the
intruder with savage ferocity, and to one less
accustomed
to danger in all its shapes, would
doubtless
have proved a formidable foe; but in an instant
a heavy blow from his iron sheathed sabre laid the
animal struggling at his feet. He stood leaning
upon his weapon for an instant, and then moved
slowly away until he came near the river, when he
laid his hand upon the palisade running along the
foot of the garden, and leapt upon the beach like
a youth of twenty. In a short time Virginia saw
his boat upon the water, his gigantic form rising
and bending to his work with desperate and
reckless
efforts, the frail bark gliding over the smooth
waters, like a thing of life, until it faded away
in the distance to a mere speck.
Her eye followed the receding object as it
became
more and more indistinct, until a mere
undefined
point was left upon the retina, her own
voluntary powers sinking more deeply in repose
from the intentness with which she pursued the
single object.
How long she slept she knew not, but when
she awoke the horizontal rays of the rising sun
were beaming through the parted curtains, and the
misty drapery from the river was rolling over the
hills, and pouring through the intervening valleys
in thousands of fantastic forms, weaving, here a
rich festoon round the summit of one blue hill,
and there spreading out a curtain of mellow tints
before another.
The cool and invigorating morning breeze from
the river, joined to the effects of her last
refreshing
and uninterrupted sleep, completely
dispelled
the shadowy illusions of the night, and she
arose comparatively cheerful and happy. She
was frightened when she cast her eyes upon the
couch of the sufferer and found him awake, to
think how much and how long she had neglected
him. There was one indefatigable and untiring
nurse watching by the bedside, however! She
had stolen in unperceived during the night, and
now sat upon an humble seat at the foot of the
couch; her eye as brilliant as if it was not subject
to the ordinary fatigues of humanity. The
invalid
too had slept soundly, and awakened this
morning
refreshed and invigorated, and with all his
inflammatory symptoms much abated.
With all these cheering influences around her,
Virginia's countenance would have been soon clad
in her wonted smiles, had it not been for an
unbidden
scene which every now and then was
conjured
up before her imagination, in which those
near and dear to her were principal actors. But
these, painful and inexplicable as they seemed to
her, were far from being well defined in her own
mind. For her life, she could not separate the
real evidences of her drowsy senses from the
vivid images of her imagination. She was firmly
impressed, however, with the belief, that some
parts of them were true and real transactions! She
firmly believed that she had seen her mother and
the Recluse during the nightnot together
certainly
,
but near the same spot and in quick
succession
;
and she as firmly believed that she had seen
the latter disable the watch-dog, mount over the
palisade, and hurry away in his boat. So much was
indeed true; her mother had actually visited the
wounded youth during the night, and she had
actually
walked in the garden, and the Recluse was
actually there, but no meeting took place, except
in the imagination of the worn-out maiden.
She entered the breakfast room with these
various
impressions, real and imaginary, curiously
mingled and confused, and bearing upon her own
countenance an expression of embarrassment not
less surprising to her mother, who was the first
person she encountered. Twenty times she was
on the point of asking her mother whether she had
walked in the garden during the night, but as often
a strange embarrassment came over her, resulting
partly from what she thought she had seen, and
partly from words dropped by the Recluse in her
hearingthe whole confused, unarranged and
undigested
the
latter perhaps being entirely
unrecognised
by her consciousness, but still operating
imperceptibly
upon her conduct. She was not a
little astonished, therefore, when her mother came
directly to the point occupying her own thoughts
at the moment, saying, as she approached her, and
affectionately smoothed down the clustering
ringlets
upon her brow. You slept upon your post
last night, my dear daughter? Nayno excuses
there needs none. You wanted rest, little less
than he whom you watched.
I did not sleep so soundly as you imagine, my
dear mother; I saw you, methought, either sleeping
or waking, and to speak truly, I scarcely know
which state I was in; and as she spoke she cast a
searching glance at her mother, but her
countenance
was calm and unruffled as she replied,
You must have been sleeping, my dear Virginia;
I stooped over you and kissed your cheek as you
slept.
And did you not walk in the garden?
Yes I did! is it possible you saw me and
spoke not?
I did see you, dear mother, but I was afraid to
speak.
Afraid to speak! Oh! you were afraid of
waking Nathaniel?
No! no! I was frightened at the appearance
of your companion in the garden.
My companion in the garden! my poor child,
you must indeed have dreamed; I had no
companion
in the garden.
Mr. Fairfax coming in at this moment, Virginia
hastily took her chair at the head of the table, and
busily commenced her duties at the table, her
thoughts all the while occupied upon any thing
else.
What a strange being is that Recluse, said
Mr. Fairfax, with apparent
non chalance
, have
you ever seen him, my dear? addressing his wife.
Virginia dropped the plate she was in the act of
handing to her father and was seized with, to her
parents, the most unaccountable embarrassment.
She endeavoured to make some excuse in order, as
she supposed, to hide her mother's inevitable
confusion
.
But the latter calmly replied, No, my
dear, I have never seen him. I have always had
some curiosity to behold him, but now that he has
proved himself such a public benefactor, I shall
not be satisfied till the wish is gratified.
Nathaniel
had before excited us much by his account of
him, but now I suppose the whole city will be
eager to pay him their respects.
Virginia stared at her mother during this speech
in the most undisguised astonishment, until she
saw the calm serenity of her countenancethe
expression of truth and sincerity, which had never
deceived her, so strongly portrayed there, when
she was again lost in bewilderment, which lasted
throughout the meal. Her parents, however, were
too much engaged with their own subject of
discourse
to observe her unusual abstraction, and the
meal therefore and the dialogue came to a close
without any farther development pertaining to
our narrative.
CHAPTER XI.
The eager pack from couples freed,
Dash through the bush, the briar, the brake,
While answering hound, and horn, and steed,
The mountain echoes startling wake.
The Wild Huntsman
A FEW days after the events recorded in the
last chapter, the denizens of the ancient city were
roused betimes by the sounds of the hunter's horn,
the echoing chorus of the eager hounds, and the
neighing of the fiery steeds, as they were led forth
to the gallant pastime of the chase. The river
and overhanging hills were enveloped in an
impenetrable
veil of mist, and the dew settled in a
snowy cloud, upon the hair and castors of the
Cavaliers as they issued from their doors, rubbing
their eyes and preparing to mount the mettled
coursers which pawed the earth and blew thick
volumes of smoke from their expanded nostrils.
These preparations for the enlivening sports of
the field were not confined to a small number of
the civic youth, or to the keener sportsmen among
their eldersall the gentry of the town and colony,
with few exceptions, were assembled on the
occasion
.
Sir William Berkley wih his numerous guests,
Gideon Fairfax, with his fellows of the Council,
the members of the House of Burgesses, now
principally
occupying the hotel of the Berkley
Arms, Frank Beverly, Philip Ludwell, Charles
Dudley, with the Harrisons, the Powells, &c. all
now came curvetting into the public square, dressed
in their gay hunting jerkens and neat foraging
caps, some with bugles swinging from their
shoulders
,
and others with firearms suspended at their
backs.
A stately gray-headed old negro, known by the
cognomen of Congo, was in command of some half
score of more youthful footmen of his own colour,
in the livery of the Governor, each of whom held
the leashes of a pair of hounds.
These, from time to time as old Congo wound a
skilful blast upon his bugle, opened a deafening
chorus, which echoed through the surrounding
forests, and awakened from their slumbers the
drowsy citizens of the town. Many a damsel
peeped from her lattice to catch a glimpse of the
gay Cavaliers as they wheeled into the place of
rendezvous in parties of tens and twenties, all noisy
and boisterous; some with the anticipation of the
promised sports, and others from the more
artificial
stimulus of a morning julip. The sound of
Congo's bugle had reverberated through the silent
streets in signal blasts to the grooms of the gentry
at a much earlier hour of the morning, so that
many of the high-born damsels inhabiting the
purlieus
Vol. I. 13
of this little court, were also on the alert.
Among these our heroine, awakened by the
echoing
chorus of the hunter's horn, was already
dressed and smiling from her window, like one of
her own sweet flowers, upon the gay young
Cavaliers
,
as they passed in review before her.
In an adjoining window was another inhabitant
of the same mansion, roused by the same cheering
notes, but he smiled not upon the joyous throng as
they gathered around the spot occupied by Congo
and his canine favourites, nor yet upon those of
the gay youths who rode up and touched their
beavers respectfully to the smiling maiden as they
singly or in pairs cantered away over the bridge
in pursuit of their day's sport. It was Bacon! his
head bandaged and his countenance pale and wan
from his late illness and loss of blood.
Nevertheless he was dressed, and as eager for
the sport as any youth among them, but exhausted
nature negatived his feeble efforts and longing
aspirations
,
and he had seated himself at the window
in sullen disappointment. This latter feeling was
in nowise subdued by the sight of Frank Beverly,
already recovered from his slight wounds, dressed
in a scarlet jerken and hunting cap, a bugle over
his shoulder, and mounted upon a noble animal
apparently
as eager to display his fine proportions as
his master. The thundering clatter of the
chargers'
heels as this numerous cavalcade now passed
in long succession over the bridge before the
gazing
citizens, thus untimely awakened from their
slumbers, at length began to die away in silence,
broken at intervals by the measured tramp of an
occasional party of the more staid, older and
less eager Cavaliers, pursuing the main body at
a pace more suited to their age; or by the gallop
of some slumbering sluggard hastening to overtake
his more punctual comrades of the chase. Now
and then a note from the bugle of some overjoyous
youth, as he entered the forest, brought a frown
upon the brow of old Congo, whose look was
turned in silent appeal against these irregular
proceedings
,
to his master, who rode apart in earnest
conversation with Mr. Fairfax. While our
sportsmen
are thus joyously moving on their way to the
appointed spot, we will pursue the thread of the
dialogue between the two dignitaries just alluded
to, as it had reference to the leading personages of
our story.
Nay, treat not my apprehensions lightly,
Fairfax
;
is not that youth who leans so disconsolately
out of your window this morning, a proper knight
to catch the errant fancies of a girl of sixteen?
said Sir William.
He is indeed a right well-favoured boy,
replied
Mr. Fairfax, and one calculated to win his
way to a colder heart than that of a maiden near
his own age. Was he not the means of your own
preservation, Sir William, from the knives of
yonder murderous fanatics cooped up in the jail
of the city?
Ay! said his companion, drily, I grant
him to be all that you say he is; but does not that
enforce more powerfully what I have been saying?
Ought you not under such circumstances, to
acquaint
him with the necessity of his finding another
house than your's for his home, where your
daughter
is constantly before his eyes, and what is more
important, where he is constantly before her's, not
only with the attractions of his own well-favoured
person, but in the interesting character of her
father's
and her uncle's preserver?
If the poor youth had ever presumed upon
his position in my family, to make advances to
my daughter, then indeed there might be some
propriety in the course you recommend, Sir
William
.
But I have observed him closely since our
last conversation on this subject, and I am satisfied
that there is nothing more than fraternal affection
between them.
It is very difficult, Fairfax, for the parties
themselves to draw an exact line, where the one
kind of affection ends, and the other begins; the
gradation from mere brotherly regard to love is
so very imperceptible, that the very persons in
whom it takes place are often unconscious of it,
until accident or warning from others forces it
upon their apprehension.
But where is the necessity of examining into
these fine distinctions now, Sir William? Where
is the point of the matter.
To that it was my purpose to come presently,
but you are always so impetuous and sanguine, if
you will permit me to say so, that I have found it
difficult to discuss this matter in your presence,
with all the coolness and deliberation which ought
to attend the negotiation of an alliance between
the kinsman of his majesty's representative in the
Colony, and the daughter of his nearest relative
the heiress probably of both their fortunes.
But has not the match between Virginia and
Frank been a settled matter for years?
Ay, truly, Fairfax, and I am rejoiced that
you remember it; but was it not also agreed, for
wise purposes, that the parties themselves should
know nothing of the contract until Frank became
of age?
True, and what then?
That time has been passed some months.
Indeed!
Ay, and what is more important to the
happiness
of the young pair, Frank himself has
moved
in the business without any prompting from me.
This, you know, was what we desired, and the
very end for which the matter was kept from their
knowledge.
He has then proposed himself to Virginia, and
she has doubtless accepted him! All right, all
right, Sir William. I always told you it would
turn out just in this way. Every thing turns out
for the best. You see the advantage of leaving
the young people to themselves.
13 *
Yes, yes, it has all turned out very happily
in your sanguine imagination; but you run away
with the matter without hearing me out.
Did you not say it was all settled? I certainly
understood you so!
No, I said nothing like it. I said that my
young kinsman had moved in the business
without
my prompting; and I intended to say, if you
had permitted me, that he had authorized me, this
day, to make a formal tender of his hand and
fortune
to your daughter, through you; which I
now do.
Well, why did you not say so at first, Sir
William
,
and there could have been no trouble about the
matter. Instead of that, you read me a long lecture
about the danger of harbouring handsome young
fellows
in my house generally, concluding in
particular
with a recapitulation of the various debts of
gratitude due from me and my family, and yourself,
to poor Bacon. But as far as I am concerned, I give
my hearty consent to the proposed union, and you
may so assure Frank from me, and tell him that he
has nothing more to do, but to appear as every way
worthy in the eyes of Virginia as he does in mine.
There, you see, you are coming in your own
immethodical and precipitate way, to the very
point with which I set out. I was merely
hazarding
a few observations upon the various
prepossessing
qualities of your protege, and expressing some
fears of the intercourse subsisting between him
and your daughter, with a view to put you on
your guard at once. This was not done with a
view to read you a lecture, as you are pleased to
say, but from the best grounded apprehensions that
things were not proceeding well for our scheme.
Is there any ground for the fears you mention?
There is, Fairfax! Lady Berkley has often
of late mentioned her apprehensions to me, that
there is a growing and mutual attachment between
your ward and your daughter. Frank has
observed
the same thing, and indeed the very
proposals
I have just had the honour of making to
you, have probably resulted from a desire on his
part to bring the matter to an eclaircissement at
once.
I will speak to Virginia and her mother on the
subject, and my word for it, my daughter will
show you that she knows what is due to her
birth and standing in society. But as to turning
Nathaniel out of my house! I could as soon turn
Virginia herself out. Poor boy, he has a farm of
his own, it is true, but my house has always been
a home to him, and it always shall be, as long as
he continues worthy, and I continue the head
of it.
Ay, that farm! There was another ill-advised
piece of generosity; not content with bringing up
a foundling like your own son, you must purchase
him a farm and stock it.
Indeed, Governor, you give me credit for
much more generosity than I have exercised.
I
purchased him no farm, or if I did, it was merely
as his agent and guardian. He furnished the
means himself.
That was very strange! Very strange indeed,
that a youth without occupation, and without any
visible fortune, should purchase and stock one of
the most valuable plantations in the colony.
As they arrived at this point in their discourse,
they had ascended to the top of one of the highest
hills within many miles of the city. Here they
found the sportsmen who had preceded them,
closely grouped together, and all talking at once,
while Old Cong, (as he was familiarly called by
the youths,) was engaged in slipping the leashes.
One pair after another of the fleet animals snuffed
the air for a moment, and then bounded down the
slope of the hill, carrying their noses close to the
earth, and eagerly questing backward and forward
through the shrubbery; sometimes retracing their
steps to the very point from which they started.
At length one of the foremost of the pack opened
a shrill note as he ran, indicative to the
uninitiated
,
only of eagerness and impatience in the pursuit
of the game, but Old Congo's experienced eye
instantly
brightened up, as with head erect, he
uttered
a sharp shrill whoop, and mounting his fleet
courser, he shot down the hill with the fleetness of
the wind, making the woods echo with his merry
hip halloo
, as he cheered them on. By this time
the pack were following the leader in the devious
trail on which he was now warm; the whole chorus
sometimes opening in joyous and eager concert as
they came upon the scent, just from the impress of
sly Reynard's feet, and then again relapsing into
silence. These intervals in the cheerful cry
announced
the doubt which as yet existed, whether
the trail upon which they had struck was any
thing more than the devious windings made by
the game on emerging from his den, for the
purpose
,
as the negroes stoutly affirmed, of throwing
his pursuers out. It seemed indeed as if such had
been the intention of the cunning animal, for a plan
of the intricate mazes which the pack were threading,
if laid down upon paper, would very much
resemble
a complicated problem in Euclid, or the track
of a ship upon a voyage of discovery in unknown
seas. Meanwhile Old Congo was in the thickest
of them; now cursing one refractory member, and
again cheering a favourite. The Cavaliers stood
in groupsone foot in the stirrup and a hand on
the pummel of the saddle, or smoothing down the
curling mane of their impatient chargers. At
length the problem was solved, and the hounds
were seen coursing in a circle round the brow of
the hill, a continuous yelp from the leader, and an
answering chorus from the pack, announcing to
the waiting gentry, that the game was up. They
instantly mounted, and were presently flying over
the uneven ground at a speed and with a reckless,
yet skilful horsemanship, which bade defiance to all
the perils of the chase. Here one lost his cap by
the limb of a tree; there another measured his
length upon the ground by the stumble of his
charger; the main party speeding apace, regardless
of all, save the fox and his pursuers.
The chase, like misfortune, is a wonderful
leveller of distinctions. Foremost in the field
were the proud Sir William and the keener
Fairfax
;
one upon either side of Congo, whooping and
yelling in unison, and all distinctions forgotten
for the moment, but the speed and bottom of their
coursers; the countenances of the three alike
expressive
of concentrated eagerness in the sport.
To a spectator on the summit of the hill, the scene
was not wanting in picturesque and striking
features
.
The sun was just peeping over the blue
hills, and lifting the vapours from the valleys
beneath
,
in all the variegated and beauteous tints of
the rainbow, as they arose in majestic masses and
encircled the summits of the cliffs. The cool and
invigorating breeze of a young summer morn,
as it was wafted through the romantic dales and
glens, came loaded with the richest sweets of forest
and of flower. And when the music of the hounds
was softened in the distance to a faint harmonious
swell upon the air, the feathered tribes, luxuriant in
beauty, warbled forth their richest strains of nature's
melody as they hopped from twig to twig, flashing
their brilliant colours in dazzling contrast to the
pendant dew-drops glittering in the sunbeams.
On the other hand the rays fell in broad sheets of
light upon the tranquil waters of the noble
Powhatan
,
as seen through the deep green foliage of
the woodland vista. The city too was dimly
visible in the distance, its towering columns of
smoke shooting high up towards heaven through
the clear calm air, and expanding into fleecy waves
as they were lost or scattered in the higher regions
of the atmosphere. These morning glories of a
southern sunrise were, however, lost upon our
sportsmen, who now came sweeping round the
base of the hill from the opposite side, the horses
covered with foam, and riders making the welkin
ring again with their shouts of gladness and
excitement
.
The dignity of station and of birth,
affairs
of state, and all other considerations foreign to
the business of the time, were utterly forgotten and
abandoned, while their late proud possessors vied
with the youngest and the humblest in seizing the
pleasures of the chase. The horses seemed in the
distance as if their bodies were moving through
the air, a foot and a half nearer the ground than
they were wont, their legs nearly invisible; while
their riders bent over their necks as if impatient
even of this headlong speed.
Hitherto the hounds as usual, when in pursuit
of the fox, had moved in the figure of a rude circle,
never departing to any great distance from the
point whence they had started, but moving round
and round the hill; and there was every
appearance
that the chase would be thus continued until
the game was either fairly run down, or had gained
the shelter of his hole.
In the present instance, however, an unexpected
reprieve was granted to the hard pressed animal.
The dogs, as they came round the brow of the
hill for the third or fourth time, struck off
abruptly
from their regular circuit; the foremost
chargers were reined up, and in a short time the
whole cavalcade was brought to a stand at the
point where the dogs had quitted the track.
The cause of this interruption to the sport was
readily understood by the experienced Cavaliers.
A buck had crossed between the dogs and the fox,
and the former, contrary to their usual discipline
and stanchness, broke off to follow the newest
scent. Many were the imprecations hurled at the
head of Old Congo and his deputies for this
misconduct
of their charge, the consequence, as was
affirmed, of their having been set upon the trail of
a buck on the previous Sabbath. It was now,
however, too late to remedy the evil, as Congo's
bugle itself was not sufficient to recall the eager pack.
Firearms were immediately unslung from the
shoulders of such as bore them, and Mr. Fairfax,
as the keenest sportsman, leading the way, nearly
half of the youths were quickly seen following
him up the opposite hill. Sir William Berkley and
such of the company as had already been worn
out, retraced their steps to the picturesque point
from which they had set out, and which has
already
been described.
Here some of the footmen, retained for the
purpose, speedily constructed a rude table under
an umbrageous tree, upon which was laid out a
tempting display of cold viands, wines and strong
waters. Horses were now tied to the surrounding
trees, and their riders threw themselves upon the
sward to repose their wearied limbs, and regale
their longing eyes upon the good things which
only awaited the return of their comrades. This
delay seemed likely, however, to prove rather
tedious
to the longing appetites of the former, who
had not as yet broken their fast.
Full two hours had elapsed, and yet no token
came of hounds or huntsmen. The patience even
of the formal and ceremonious Sir William began
to flag, and he forthwith ordered the bugles to
sound a recall from the highest spot in the
neighbourhood
.
In vain the reverberating blasts
reechoed
from hill to hill, and from river to cliff; in
vain they paused to listen for the music of the
hounds or an answering signal from the keener
sportsmen. After repeated trials the patience of
the Governor gave way, and having set apart a
share of the provision for their comrades, they
fell upon the tempting display with knife and
dagger
.
Cups of horn, and silver flagons were
speedily
produced, and in a short time their absent
compeers were almost forgotten in the general
destruction of cold capons, tongue and ham.
Towards the conclusion of the repast, the
absent
sportsmen began to drop in singly and at
Vol. I. 14
intervals. The bridles of their foaming horses
were thrown to the grooms, and they fell upon
the wine and fowls like famished soldiers, after a
long day's march. Then came a panting hound,
crouching beneath the legs of a horse, with his
tongue hanging from his mouth; then another,
and another, until they had all obeyed the
summons
of the bugle.
None of the huntsmen who had returned as yet,
had been in at the death; but it was supposed that
Mr. Fairfax, the only one now missing, had been
more fortunate, as the hounds that came in last
were covered with blood. He was momentarily
expected, but they listened in vain for the sound
of his horn. Old Congo was despatched over the
hills to summon him with his bugle, but he
likewise
returned without any tidings of the absent
Cavalier, and without having heard any answering
notes to those of his own horn. Hours were spent
in waiting for him, at first occupied by the younger
Cavaliers in various games and athletic sports, but
as the day waned apace, and still no news of him
arrived, uneasiness began to engross the minds of
his associates.
By the orders of the Governor, the whole
Cavalcade
spread themselves, and scoured the forests
for miles in the direction he had been seen to take,
but no answer was returned to their shouts and
bugles, and no token of his presence and safety
was discovered. Occasionally two parties were
brought together by a supposed answer from his
bugle, but it was found to be only the reply of one
scouring party to another.
After a long and fruitless search, they resolved
to hasten to the city, in hopes that he had reached
his home by some other route, and in case this
supposition should prove fallacious it was resolved
that the whole male population should be called out
to the search. The distance was accomplished with
a speed and recklessness quite equal to that with
which they had performed it in the morning, but
with feelings very different. A general and gloomy
silence pervaded their ranks. Gideon Fairfax was
one of the most universally popular Cavaliers in
the Colony; he was generous, hospitable, and
sincere
,
with his equals, and humane and affable to
his inferiors. His own slaves idolized him, and
would have readily perilled life and limb in
defence
either of his person or his reputation.
When the cavalcade arrived at the bridge, their
painful suspense and anxiety were little relieved
by perceiving an immense crowd assembled round
the house of Mr. Fairfax. That some accident
must have befallen him they had too good reason
now to apprehend, else what could have drawn
the multitude together? The arrival of a
successful
huntsman, was an affair of too frequent
occurrence
at Jamestown to excite the present visible
commotion. The returning and anxious Cavaliers
were soon met by the eager throng, who pressed
around them in crowds, each party demanding of the
other news respecting their absent fellow-citizen.
The assemblage of the crowd around the house
was soon explained by the appearance of his
favourite
charger, upon which he had set out in the
morning, so full of health, vigour and animation.
He was held in the midst of the assemblage, his
head-gear broken, the saddle bloody, and his sides
dripping with mud and water, as if he had just
crossed through the river. In this condition he
had presented himself at the stable door where he
was usually kept, without his rider, and this was
all they knew in the city concerning the fate of
the missing horseman. This was enough to excite
the most distracting fears in the minds of his own
family, and the worst apprehensions in those of
his immediate friends and more humble admirers.
Horses and men were speedily volunteered for
the purpose of scouring the whole forest in the
direction of the chase. Many of the Cavaliers
barely dismounted from one horse to mount
another
;
and in a very few minutes, hundreds of
citizens, some on horseback and others on foot,
had assembled. While they were thus speedily
collecting their forces, a scream from some
washerwomen
on the bank of the river, quickly drew
the crowd in that direction. Men, women and
children
rushed to the spot with feelings of anxiety
and alarm, wrought to the highest pitch. They
were not left long in doubt, for a boat was just
nearing the shore, in which were two men
rowing
,
while another supported upon his lap the
head of the still living but wounded Cavalier.
CHAPTER XII.
Mr.
Fairfax
was borne to his own dwelling
upon a litter, amidst the universal regrets and
lamentations
of the people. The condition of his
own immediate family may be more easily
imagined
than described. The most heart-rending
shrieks pierced the air when it was announced to
the female part of it that the amiable and generous
head of their house had been basely shot,by
whom he knew not, nor could he form a
conjecture
.
The deed was perpetrated a few moments
after he had himself shot the buck. He
immediately
fell from his horse and was for a time
perfectly
unconscious of his condition. When he
revived
he found his horse gone and himself so
weakened from loss of blood that he was unable to
stand. His only resource was his trumpet, upon
which he made repeated efforts to summon his
companions, but even the sound of his horn was so
feeble that it could not have been heard more than
a few rods from the spot. While he was in this
helpless condition he chanced to discover three men
fishing at the base of the river bank, whom he
attempted
to summon to his aid, but the sound of the
water prevented them from hearing him. With
14*
great difficulty and suffering he was at length
enabled
to crawl down the hill to such a distance that
he might be heard, and was thence borne to the
city in their boat, as the reader has already been
informed.
The surgeon, after examining his wound,
pronounced
it to be of the most alarming character,
and assured Bacon, apart from the family, that he
had little hopes for the life of his patron, who after
the exhaustion of his painful journey and the
succeeding
intense pain caused by the probing of his
wounds had fallen into a deep sleep.
Sometime during the morning which has been
described in the preceding chapter, and while the
hunting party were yet enjoying themselves
undisturbed
by any untoward accident, Bacon had
invited
Virginia to accompany him in his first stroll
through the garden since his illness. She
complied
with more alacrity than had been usual with
her of late, hoping that the refreshing sweets of a
summer morning and the cheering sight of birds
and flowers, would dispel the gloomy misanthropy
which had settled upon his countenance, since his
disappointment at not being able to join the chase.
After a silent promenade through the shady
walks, they seated themselves in the little summer
house already mentioned, and Bacon thus broke the
embarrassing silence.
Virginia, the current of events seems to be
hurrying us on to a painful crisis! It is impossible
for me to shut my eyes to such of them at least, as
relate more particularly to myself. My position
in the society in which I now move, is daily
becoming
more painful to me. I am constantly
subjected
to the impertinence of those who imagine
that they have, or perhaps really have, some reason
to complain of the protection and countenance
afforded
to me by your noble father.
Trust then, Nathaniel, to his and our continued
confidence and esteem, and less to the morbid
sensibility
which disturbs you, and all will soon be
well again.
Not so, Virginia. If we were in a little
community
by ourselves, I could indeed give my
whole mind and soul to such enjoyments as the
society of your family has already afforded to
me, forgetting all the world besides, and never
listening
for a moment to ambitious hopes and
aspiring
thoughts. But in this proud and aristocratic
circle, I must soon be either more or less than
I am at present.
Why must you be more or less than you are,
Nathaniel? said Virginia, with unaffected and
bewitching
naivet
.
Is it possible, Virginia, that you do not see
the reason why? Have you witnessed the fierce
struggles contending at my heart and never formed
a surmise as to the real cause?
Except the morbid sensitiveness to which I
have already alluded, and its very insufficient cause,
I declare that I know of none.
Is it possible. Good Heavens! and must I at
last break through the restraints which I had
imposed
upon myself? Must I trample upon the
generous hospitality of the father to lay my heart
open before his daughter? Her countenance
underwent
an instantaneous change, and while he
continued, her eyes fell beneath his ardent gaze,
and her head sank upon her bosom in confusion.
I will indeed trust to the flattering delusion
which hope whispers in my ear, that perhaps your
father himself knows enough of me and of my
origin
to absolve me from these restraints. It must
be so, Virginiaelse he had never trusted a heart,
young and susceptible like mine, to the constant
influence
of beauty like yours, and he took her
unresisting
hand, joined with such perfect
innocence
and such childlike simplicity as never till
this moment to be conscious of its power. Oh,
Virginia
,
I would fain believe that he foresaw and
approved
of the result which he could not but
anticipate
.
What he approves will his daughter's voice
confirm?No answer! Will you not vouchsafe one
little word to keep my sinking hopes alive!You
are offended; your countenance speaks the
language
which your tongue is unaccustomed to utter!
What should I say? answered Virginia;
would you have me promise a return of love
whose indulgence is dependent on contingency?
Is it kind, is it proper to urge me upon this
subject
under existing circumstances?
By heavens, Virginia, there shall be no
contingeney
of my making! I have crossed the
Rubicon, and you shall have the knowledge as
you have had possession of my whole soul from
the days of our infancy. 'Tis yours, Virginia,
wholly yours; soul, mind and heart, all yours.
Mould them as you will, reject me if you must,
they are still yours. I swear never to profane
the shrine of this first and only love by offering
them up on any other. They are offered now,
because my destiny so wills it. We are the
creatures of circumstances. I have vainly
struggled
against the overwhelming tide which has
borne me to this point. I am goaded onward by
insultbeset with menaces, and torn by the storms
of such a passion as never man before
encountered
.
Can you, dear Virginia, vouchsafe to me
some measure of relief from these distracting
emotions? Say that you would have been mine
under other circumstances! Say that you will
never wed that proud and imperious Beverly!
Say any thing, Virginia, which shall calm the
tumults of my bosom, and feed my hopes for the
future. While he thus spoke, the blushing
maiden was evidently labouring under emotions
little less powerful than his own. Her previous
air of offended feminine dignity was fast melting
into sympathy, with the impassioned feelings of
the excited youth. She felt for his peculiar griefs
and cares, and shared his warmer sentiments. The
youth perceived the softening mood, and continued.
Speak, I pray you, Virginia, I am in your hands.
Speak me into existence, or banish me from your
presence!
I do not know, Nathaniel, said Virginia, after
many attempts to give utterance to her thoughts,
whether it is proper at all times to speak the truth,
but I will not deceive you now. There does indeed
seem to be a peculiar concurrence of
circumstances
around us, and more perhaps than you are
yourself aware of. I did not intend to deceive
you, or lead you astray; when I told you a few
moments since that I knew nothing of any other
struggle than that arising from your own excited
feelings, I spoke the truth, but perhaps not the
entire truth; and as she spoke, a lovely blush
suffused her neck and downeast face; I knew
of other struggles indeed, but not your's,
Nathaniel
.
Were they your's, Virginia, and of the same
nature? say they were, and heaven bless for ever
the tongue that utters it.
That you have to ask, does more honour to
my discretion, than I have ascribed to it myself
of late. I have had painful fears that I should have
little to tell on an occasion like the present, should
it ever come, with my father's approbation. And
if I have now overstepped the bounds of that
proviso
,
it was in the hope of calming your troubled
spirits, and preventing a catastrophe upon which I
have looked with dreadful anticipation, since the
night of the insurrection.
And will you indeed be mine?
I will, Nathaniel, whenever you gain my
father's approbation; but without it, never.
At this moment the garden gate was heard to
creak upon its hinges, (most unmusically to
Bacon's
ears,) and Harriet Harrison came tripping
over beds and flowers, all out of breath, her
cheeks glowing with the heightened colour of
exercise
,
and her eyes sparkling with mischief just
ready to explode.
Oh, Virginia! Virginia! such news! was
her first exclamation; But shall I tell it before
Mr. Bacon?
Yes, if it is of the usual kind.
Well, upon your own head be the
consequences
.
I have accidentally overheard such a secret!
You must know that your Aunt Berkley has been
at our house this morning, and I overheard her
tell my mother that there was to be a great
wedding
immediately, and that I was to be one of the
brides-maids. What! no tell-tale guilty blush?
Well, who do you think is to be the bride-groom,
and who the bride?
Indeed, Harriet, I cannot even guess.
The blissful man, then, is Beverlybut can
you name his bride?
I should not go far hence for an answer, if you
had not announced your nomination for a
secondary
office.
O fie, fie, Virginia, I did not think you could
play the hypocrite so well. I will tell you who
it is then, but you must not breathe it even to the
winds, nor you, Mr. Bacon. It is a sly arch
little damsel, about your age and figure, by name
Virginia Fairfax! And with these words, she
burst into a loud laugh, pointing to her companion
with her finger, and then tripped away again
towards
the gate without waiting to see the effect of
her communication; but stopping with the gate in
her hand, she criedBut remember, Virginia,
Charles Dudley is not to stand up with me; we
don't speak now. And then she flew away, her
hat hanging by the riband round her neck, and her
raven ringlets flying loose around her temples.
Virginia sat as one without life or motion, her face
deadly pale, and her eye preternaturally clear and
glassy, but without a tear. Her respiration was
hurried and oppressed, and her countenance
expressive
of high and noble resolves in the midst of
the keenest mental suffering. She knew whence
her aunt obtained her information, and in its
communication
to others in the confidence of the
Governor
,
before she had been consulted, she saw the
tyrannical determination of that arbitrary old man
to consummate this hated union without the least
regard to her wishes or her feelings.
As these convictions flashed upon her mind, they
called up firm and resolute determinations, even in
her gentle bosom! she was stung into resistance
by the tyrannical and high handed measures of her
uncle, and resolved to resist upon the threshold.
Bacon's physical frame was not so steady, or his
nerves in his present mood so well strung by high
resolves of independent action. He too saw by
whom the blow was aimed, and upon whose head
it would principally fall, and he trembled for the
consequences to his gentle companion. He did not
know the strength of her independent mind, and
the endurance and fortitude with which she would
carry her purposes into execution. He knew her
to be gentle and kind and superlatively lovely, but
as yet she had endured no trials,her courage and
fortitude had been put to no test. The very
amiable
qualities which had won his affections, served
only to increase his doubts as to her capacity to
resist and endure what he too plainly saw awaited
her. He had yet to learn that these are almost
always found united in the female bosom with a
signal power of steady and calm resistance to
oppression
.
To this resolution had Virginia arrived,
when his more turbulent and masculine emotions
burst from his tongue as he seized her hand;
Swear to me, Virginia, before high Heaven, that
you will never marry this proud heir of wealth,
and worldly honours.
Upon one condition.
Name it! if it is possible, it is done.
That you from this moment give up all idea
of a meeting with Frank Beverly, which I know
has only thus long been delayed by your wounds
and illness. He dropped her hand and writhed
upon his seat in agonythe cold perspiration
bursting
from his pale forehead, as he covered it with
Vol. I. 15
his hands. But presently standing up he
exclaimed
,
Great God! and can you ask this of me,
Virginia
?
Is my honour of so little value to you, that
you can ask me to betray it? You heard the insult!
You saw the dagger aimed in the dark! Ay, and
saw it strike upon a bare and wounded nerve!
Shall I not resist? Is an assassin to thrust the point
of his steel into the very apple of my eye, and
meet with no resistance? Instinct itself would
strike back the cowardly blow. Another might
forego the measure of his revenge for an ordinary
insult, but placed as I am, an elevated mark for
impertinence and malignity to shoot at, with
nothing
but my single arm to defend me; no line of
noble and heroic ancestors to support my
pretensions
,
and my rank in the community; no living
relations to give the lie to his calumnies! Standing
alone amidst a host of powerful enemies, shall I be
stricken down by a cowardly maligner, and never
turn to strike one blow for my good name, my
mother's
honour, my father's memory, and my own
standing in society? No, no, Virginia; you cannot,
you will not, require me to promise this. One
evidence I must and will give to the calumniator,
that I come of no churl's blood.
But, Nathaniel, did you not resent and thus
return his injury upon the spot?
Ay, truly, I did hurl defiance in the craven's
teeth, but that only throws the demand for
satisfaction
upon his shoulders, so that when it is made,
I may at once atone for his, and take ample
reparation
for my own deep wrongs.
Promise me, then, that you will but act with
Frank henceforth on the defensive? Remember
he is my kinsman.
I do promise; and now promise me in your
turn never to marry this kinsman, unless I give my
consent, or you should be absolved from your
obligation
by my death, or some other irremediable
barrier.
I promise, Nathaniel.
Scarcely had the words issued from her lips,
when the clanking of stirrups and clattering of
a horse's hoofs at full speed, were heard outside the
garden wall.
Into what a state of consternation and dismay
the family was thrown by the appearance of the
bloody and panting charger at his stable door
without his master, the reader may already have
imagined.
CHAPTER XIII.
It
was the hour of midnight; the softened rays
of a shaded lamp threw a flickering and uncertain
light upon the paraphernalia of the sick chamber,
as our hero sat a solitary watcher at the side of
the wounded Cavalier. The long and apparently
profound sleep into which the invalid had fallen,
completely deceived the females of the family, so
that they were more easily persuaded by
Nathaniel
to leave the charge, during the first half of the
night, to his sole care. He had for a long time
sat a sad and silent beholder of the unconscious
sleeper, watching with breathless eagerness every
change of muscle, as some sharp and inward pain
vibrated in horrible contortions upon the
countenance
of the wounded Cavalier. In one of these
he started suddenly up in the bed, his eyes glaring
wildly upon his unrecognised attendant in utter
amazement. First looking into his face and then
to the bandages around his own person, he fell
back on his coucha grim and frightful smile of
remembrance and recognition playing for a
moment
upon his features, as he placed his cold hand
within that of Bacon, which had been softly laid
upon his breast to soothe his startled perceptions.
Nathaniel, said he, his voice already hollow
and thrilling, My hour is come! It is useless
to disguise it. I feel and know it to be so,
whatever
the surgeon may pretend. You need not
place your finger upon your lip; I owe to you a
duty which I must perform while yet I may. You
have often importuned me, and sometimes
impatiently
,
which I did not enough, perhaps,
consider
to be natural to your situation, but you must
forgive meyou have often importuned me upon
the subject of your origin. If I had possessed
any full or satisfactory knowledge on the subject,
you may be sure I would not long have
detained
it from you. Indeed, I was little less
anxious
than yourself to place you upon an equal
footing in every respect with your associates.
Here a smile of inward satisfaction beamed upon
his auditor's countenance, unobserved, however,
by the speaker, as he continued: There were
some reasons too, connected with the history of
my own family, which prevented me from
divulging
what little I did know of your's. If
I have erred, for this too you must forgive me.
The wrong shall now be repaired. You have
now been a member of my household for fifteen
or sixteen years.
One cold and rainy day our sympathies were
excited, by seeing an athletic young Irishman in
the street, near our door, carrying upon his back
a well dressed boy, apparently six or seven years
of age. The child was crying most piteously with
15*
cold and hunger. We called in the Irishman, and
after furnishing him and his little charge with food,
inquired whose child it was, and whither he was
taking it. He answered, in his own expressive
language, that he did not know to whom the child
belonged, nor whither he was taking it. That it
had beeen a fellow passenger with him across the
ocean, until they were shipwrecked at the mouth
of the river, outside of the Capes. That a
woman
who had two boys near the same age, either
of her own, or under her protection, he did not
know which, had most earnestly prayed him to
take one of them upon his back, as he was
preparing
to swim to the beach. He did so, and
succeeded
in landing with his charge in perfect safety.
What became of the woman and the other child
he never knew, as shortly after the waves broke
over the vessel, and she went to pieces. Many
of the passengers and crew, however, had been
saved and were scattered about through the
neighbouring
plantations, driven to seek employment
by the urgency of their immediate wants.
Whether
the woman and the child were among the
number he could not learn, as those who were
saved had necessarily landed at distant points upon
the shore. He brought the child to Jamestown in
hopes that it would be recognised, and if not, that
some humane person would take charge of it. His
hopes had thus far proved fruitless, as to the first
expectation, but we undertook cheerfully the latter
task, and likewise gave employment to the
kindhearted
Hibernian. I caused it to be made as
generally
known through the Colony, as our limited
means of communication would permit, that such
a child was in our possession, particularly
describing
his person and clothes, but all in vain.
I also caused search to be made for the woman
with the other child, through the southern
plantations
,
but no tidings of them were ever heard,
and we naturally concluded that they had gone
down with the vessel.
Some months after the little stranger had been
thus domiciliated among us, I one day received
an anonymous letter, which stated that the writer
knew who were the parents of the child, but for
important reasons of a political nature, he could
not then divulge their names or history. He
stated so many circumstances connected with the
shipwreck, and described so exactly the child,
that we were compelled to believe him. This
letter was followed by others at various intervals,
from that time to the present, often enclosing drafts
for large sums to be drawn for in England, for the
benefit of the child. I need scarcely tell you that
the child was yourselfand your preserver, Brian
O'Reily. The name by which you are called is
the nearest that we could come to that by which,
both yourself and Brian stated, you were known
on board the vessel. The money enclosed for
your benefit, has been suffered to accumulate until
the late purchase of the plantation at the falls, of
which you are now in possession. Around your
neck, at the time of your arrival, was a small
trinket, enclosing the hair of two individuals,
curiously interwoven, and on its outside were
some initials corresponding with your own name,
and the date of a marriage. This, together with
the letters I have mentioned, you will find in the
left hand drawer of the secretary which stands in
the corner of my library. After opening the
outside door, you will perceive the key hanging
beside the drawer. These letters were never
shown, nor the contents mentioned to my wife,
for a reason which I am now about to explain to
you, if my strength will permit, and which will
also unfold to you the cause of my reluctance to
communicate with you on this subject.
When I first saw Emily in England, she was a
young and beautiful widow. Early in life a
mutual attachment was formed between her and
the son of a neighbouring gentleman, in rather
more humble circumstances than the father of my
Emily. In consequence of this disparity in the
fortunes and standing of the two families, their
attachment was kept a profound secret between
themselves, until the youth having joined the
army of the Commonwealth, they eloped. This
was their last and only resort, because her father
was as determined a Loyalist as his was
indefatigable
in the cause of the Independents and
Roundheads
.
For two whole years she followed the
perilous fortunes of her husband, now become a
distinguished officer, during which time she gave
birth to a son. For a season she resided with her
infant at a retired farm-house, in a distant part of
the country from the scene of strife; but her
husband
becoming impatient of her absence, directed
her to procure a nurse for her boy and again
partake
of his hazardous fortunes. Her child was
accordingly
left in the charge of the nurse, and she set
out to join her husband. On the eve of meeting
him, as she supposed, she was met by the news of
a desperate engagement, in which the party
opposed
to her husband had been victorious, and very
shortly afterward, she was herself, with her
attendants
,
overtaken in the highway, and captured by
a party commanded by one of her own brothers.
He immediately sent her under a strong escort to
her father's house, not however before she had
time to learn from some of the prisoners taken in
the engagement, the heart-rending news of the
death of her husband. She gained these sad
tidings from one of his comrades, who saw him
receive
the wound and fall at his side.
She found her father so exasperated against her
that she dared not even mention to him or her
brothers the existence of her child, lest they
should take some desperate means to separate them
for ever. For a time, therefore, she contented
herself
with such clandestine communications with
her nurse as the perilous nature of the times
permitted
.
At length the sum of her afflictions was
consummated by the death of her infant, the
account
of which was brought to her by the nurse
in person.
When I first saw her, these many and severe
misfortunes had been somewhat softened down in
the lapse of years. She was still a melancholy
being, however, but I belonging to her father's
party, and being of a gay and volatile turn of mind,
and much pleased with her beauty and amiable
temperament, offered to bring her out to America
as my wife, whither the success of the Protector's
arms was then driving so many of the Nobles
and Cavaliers of England, and where I already
had a sister married to the then late, and now
present Governor of Virginia. After candidly
stating all the foregoing circumstances, she agreed
to accept my hand. And we were accordingly
married and sailed for the Capes of Virginia. You
will perceive, upon a perusal of the anonymous
letters, that the writer displays a most intimate
knowledge of all the foregoing particulars of our
family history. The design, as you will doubtless
perceive, was to operate upon our superstitious
feelings, by this mysterious display of knowledge,
in matters so carefully guarded from the world.
This was not at all necessary, because we had
already adopted, and treated you as one of our
own family. Nevertheless he partially
succeeded
with me. I confess to you that it has
always
appeared to me one of the strangest
circumstances
that ever came under my knowledge, that
any living person should be acquainted with the
facts contained in those letters. I have made the
most strenuous and unceasing efforts to discover
their author, by means of the European drafts, but
all to no purpose. You will now readily
comprehend
the reason, why I did not communicate
with Emily on this subject. It would only have
been opening old wounds afresh, and would
probably
have excited her more sensitive feelings to
a painful state of anxiety and suspense. The
same reasons which influenced my conduct in this
respect, will doubtless operate upon your own
judgment
when I am gone. In the same drawer is a
will, by which you will perceive, when it is
properly
authenticated, that I have left to you, in
conjunction with others, the most sacred of all
human
trusts. You will find yourself associated in
the management of my affairs, with persons whom
I know at the time to be uncongenial with you in
your general feelings, but upon this one subject
you will all be influenced by one desire.
Governor
Berkley and Mr. Harrison will never thwart
you in the active management, which I have left
principally in trust to you.
I have now rapidly sketched what you will
better
understand from the papers themselves, and I
have finished none too soon, as I am admonished
by the return of these cutting pains.
After another agonizing paroxysm, he fell again
into one of those death-like slumbers, which often
fill up the intervals of suffering after a mortal
wound.
When Bacon perceived that he slept profoundly,
he at once gave way to the restless anxiety to see
the papers, by which he was consumed. Eagerly,
but softly, he sought the library, opened the doors
of the high old fashioned black walnut secretary,
with its Lion's claws for feet, and his grisly beard
and shining teeth, conspicuous from every brass
ornament with which it was adorned.
[4]
[4]
Some idea of the rude state of the mechanic arts of the period
may be formed by those who have seen the antiquated chair, in
which the speaker of the Virginia house of delegates sits to this
day. There are many specimens too of ancient furniture still
preserved
in the older Counties of Virginia.
He returned to his post and opened the package
of papers with a trembling anxiety, and intense
interest, similar to what one might be supposed to
feel who was about to unseal the book of fate.
He had no sooner cast his eye upon the
handwriting
,
than the package fell from his grasp in
the most evident disappointment. Until this
moment
he had indulged a vague undefined hope that
from a single glance at the characters, he should at
once possess a clue to unravel the whole mystery.
His mind had instantly settled upon one peculiar
and remarkable individual in the Colony, as the
only one likely to possess such knowledge, and
from the interest which that person had always
manifested in his fate, he had almost persuaded
himself
that he would prove to be the writer. With
his handwriting and the peculiarly dignified and
stately character of his language, he had long been
familiar. The first few lines over which his eye
glanced rapidly and eagerly, convinced him of his
error; neither the characters nor the language were
his. Nevertheless they possessed sufficient
interest
,
after the momentary disappointment had
passed
away, to induce him to grasp the magain and once
more commence their perusal. In this occupation
he was soon so completely absorbed as to be
unconscious
of the time which elapsed, the situation
and circumstances in which he was placed as
regarded
himself, as well as the wounded Cavalier,
who lay in the same apartment. In unfolding one
of the papers the came upon the gold trinket
mentioned
by his benefactor. Here again was a new
subject
of intense interest. This, said he to
himself
,
was worn by my mother and was placed
around my neck at our last parting. Here was
a fragment of her tresses precisely similar in
character
and colour to his own, interwoven with the
darker shades of those of his father. Here too
was the date of their marriage and the initials of
their names agreeing sufficiently well with his own
supposed age. These were all subjects of earnest
contemplation to the excited imagination of a youth
rendered morbidly sensitive on the subject of his
birth and parentage, by many painful occurrences
with his aristocratic young associates, and still more
by recent developments with the idol of his
affections
.
The trinket was laid down and the
manuscript
Vol. I. 16
resumed, of whose contents as much as is
important to our narrative has already been
communicated
to the reader. The characters in which
it was written, were successively compared in his
mind to those of every person in the Colony who
handled the pen. In that day it was not hard
to remember who they were from their great
number
,
chirography having been an art with which
the Cavaliers were less familiar than with the use
of the small and broad sword. Not a scribe in the
country wrote in characters similar to the one
he held in his hand, so far as he could recollect.
He thought they resembled those of Governor
Berkley more than of any other, yet that sturdy
old knight had invariably frowned so much on his
attempts to assume the place and standing in
society
to which his education and intelligence
entitled
him, that he could not believe him concerned
in benefiting him, even as an agent.
The Recluse was the only individual upon whom
his mind ould rest as the probable author,
notwithstanding
the variance of the writing. Yet against
this conclusion there were many powerful
arguments
.
The first that suggested itself to his mind
was the money. Could he command such large
sums? And if he could, was it possible with his
known habits and peculiarities, not to mention his
occasional abberration, to arrange complicated
pecuniary
affairs in Europe? Then again, if he was the
writer, why were these communications continued
after he had himself arrived at years of discretion?
Every reason seemed to favour the idea that he
himself would have been chosen as the depository
of these communications, had the Recluse been the
man, especially when he reflected that he was at
that very time possessed of more of his confidence
than any other person in the Colony. The papers
were perused and re-perused, and the locket
turned
over and over listlessly in his fingers, while a
shade of deep sadness and disappointment settled
upon his countenance.
From this unpleasing revery he was suddenly
aroused by the groans of the wounded sufferer,
who now awoke in the greatest agony. When
Bacon came to his bed-side a melancholy change
was visible in his countenance. He was making
his last struggle with the grim monster. He was
however enabled to express a desire that his family
should be called, but when they arrived, he could
not give utterance to his ideas. He took first
the hand of his wife, and next that of his
daughter, and successively resigned them into
those of his young executor. This, under the
existing circumstances of the moment, attracted
no particular attention, but was the subject of
many an after-thought and remark. A few
convulsive
struggles followed, and then the generous
and noble spirit of the Cavalier deserted its prison
house.
We will not attempt to describe the
heart-rending
scene which ensued. Suffice it to say, that
after a decent and respectful delay, (far more than
is allowed in our day,) the much loved and much
lamented Mr. Fairfax was borne to the grave,
amidst the lamentations and regrets of the whole
assembled gentry of the Colony. The long line of
mournful pageantry moved in slow and
melancholy
steps to the sound of a solemn dirge through the
streets of the ancient city, and after the usual sad,
but appropriate rites of the established church, the
corpse was deposited in the burying ground, which
to this day preserves the crumbling ruins of many
monuments of the ancient Cavaliers.
CHAPTER XIV.
It
was some weeks after the funeral of Gideon
Fairfax, that Bacon, attracted by the genial warmth
of a summer day, sauntered out for the first time,
in company with his friend Dudley, to seek the
usual
rendezvous
of the young Cavaliers.
Scarcely
were they seated in the Tap of the Arms,
before Philip Ludwell hastily entered, touched
his castor formally to Bacon and Dudley, and
handed to the former a note, fastened with a
silken cord, and sealed with the arms of the House
of Berkley. Bacon cut the cord and read the note,
without changing countenance, and then handed
it to Dudley, who had no sooner perused its
contents
,
than they both arose, retired to a private
room, and called for pen, ink and paper. The
latter soon returned with an answer, sealed in like
manner, and handed it to Ludwell, who again
formally bowing retired. The first ran thus:
Jamestown,
June , 16.
To Nathaniel Bacon, Esq.
Sir
I seize the first moment of your
appearance
in public, restored to health, to demand the
satisfaction due for the grievous insult put upon
me, on the night of the Anniversary Celebration,
16*
in presence of the assembled gentry of the Colony.
All proper arrangements will be made by my
friend Ludwell, who will also await your answer.
I have the honour to be your most obedient
servant
,
Francis Beverly
.
Bacon's answer was no less courteous and
explicit.
Berkley Arms,
June , 16.
To Francis Beverly, Esq.
Sir
Your note by the hands of Mr. Ludwell
was this moment received. Your challenge is
accepted
.
To-morrow morning at sunrise I will
meet you. The length of my weapon will be
furnished by my friend Dudley, who will convey
this to Mr. Ludwell, as well as make all other
arrangements on my behalf. I have the honour
to be, yours, &c.
Nathaniel Bacon
.
The following morning at sunrise, two parties of
Cavaliers landed from their boats at a secluded
inlet
,
on the southern extremity of Hog Island,
immediately
opposite the city, but screened from
view by the depth of the overshadowing forest. A
surgeon with his assistant soon followed.
The two parties exchanged formal but courtly
salutations, and immediately proceeded to the
business of their meeting. A level grass-plot,
firm under the pressure of the foot, and sufficiently
cleared for the purpose, had long been set apart
as the battle ground on similar occasions, and was
now easily found.
When all the parties were arrived at this spot,
the seconds proceeded to measure the swords in
presence of their principals. This of course was
a mere formality required by the usages of the
times, as the length of the weapons was already
known and settled between themselves.
The two young Cavaliers about to engage in
deadly strife, were perhaps as nearly matched in
skill and courage as any that could be found in
the Colony. Both were in the daily practice of
the foils, as a matter of education no less than of
amusement. Both were impetuous by nature, and
rash in their actions, and both came upon the field
longing for vengeance in requital of wrongs which
each supposed he had received at the hands of the
other.
Beverely was in the enjoyment of ruddy health,
and buoyant animal impulses, but his antagonist
was pale, thin, and evidently labouring under
depression
of spirits, as well as feebleness of body.
To a hasty and superficial observer, this state of
the parties would have seemed decidedly
unfavourable
to the latter; but it is very questionable
whether the high health and robust strength of
Beverly were not more than counterbalanced by
the subdued but steady composure evinced by his
antagonist, the result of long confinement and
depletion
.
With a slight inclination of the head in formal
salutation, each advanced a foot and crossed his
blade with that of his antagonist. The eyes of
each were instantly riveted upon his enemy, with
the steady and deadly ferocity of two wild beasts
of prey. The pause continued a few moments, as
if each were striving to measure the hatred of the
other; a few rapid and skilful thrusts and parries
were exchanged, and then another interval of
suspense
and inactivity ensued. The next effort was
longer and more fiercely contested, and the
intentions
of each in this uncomplicated warfare were
more readily distinguished. Beverly was at each
successive trial becoming more and more ferocious,
while his antagonist was as evidently acting on
the defensive, if not attempting to disarm him.
This now apparent intention of the latter, might be
the necessary result of his present comparative
debility
,
of policyaiming to take advantage of his
opponent's
impetuosity, or of his promise to Virginia.
But from whatever cause it sprung, Dudley thought
it a most hazardous experiment to depend upon
disarming so skilful a swordsman, and was
accordingly
under the most lively apprehensions for the
fate of his friend. These were not however of
long continuance, for at the next onset, Beverly,
forgetting himself for a moment, as he impetuously
flashed his weapon in deadly and rapid thrusts,
cried, Ha, Sir Bastard, have at your coward's
heart. In the next instant Bacon's sword pierced
his bodyhis eyes glared wildly for an instant,
his sword fell from his powerless hand, and as
Bacon
Withdrew the weapon, Beverly uttered a
groan and fell prostrate upon the earth.
Bacon stood listlessly wiping his sword-blade
upon his handkerchief, his eyes abstractedly fixed
upon the fallen youth, like one without thought or
reason, or rather so deeply buried in thought as to
be almost unconscious of the scene before him.
His thoughts were upon his promise to Virginia,
to act only upon the defensive. This he had
interpreted
far more literally than the fair girl
herself
had designed, and it was his intention so to
act throughout the struggle, had not his patience
and forbearance been overcome by the taunting
exclamation of his adversary, just preceding the
last fatal onset.
All the circumstances passed rapidly through
his mind, until his meditations settled into the
most poignant regret; not a little aggravated when
Beverly opened his eyes, and held up his hand to
Bacon, feebly exclaming, Bacon, forgive me; I
wronged you both first and last. I see it now
when it is too late, but it is never too late to ask
forgiveness for an injury. Bacon grasped his
hand, and flung himself prostrate at his side in an
instant. Before God, Beverly, it was not my
intention
,
when I came to the field, to do this deed;
my whole effort at first was to disarm you.
Forgiveness
lies with you, not with me. I have done
you an irreparable injury, yours was but the
result
of thoughtless impetuosity, for which I as
freely forgive you, as it was hastily and heedlessly
offered. May God forgive us both.
The surgeon and his assistant now interfered in
the prosecution of their professional duties. While
these were in progress, all parties were silent in
breathless attention; not a change of the doctor's
countenance escaped them. At length he arose,
and deliberately wiping and replacing his
instruments
in their case, walked thoughtfully some
paces from the wounded youth.
Bacon dared not follow to ask the fate of his
patient
,
but Dudley, with breathless eagerness pursued
his footsteps, and demanded to know in few words
his fate. Life or death, Doctor? he hastily
exclaimed
,
as if he expected an answer in like short
and expressive terms.
Ours is not one of the exact sciences as to
prognostication
,
said Dr. Roland. The wound
extends
from the anterior part of the thorax.
Dont tell me about the thorax, doctor, tell me
whether there is life or death?
The pleura and the right lobe of the lungs have
been wounded, consequently there will be great
inflammation
succeeding, both from the pleuretic and
pulmonary excitement. These are the
unchangeable
laws of the animal economy, and will not yield
were the son of Charles himself lying before us.
O damn the animal economy. Can't you say
in one word, life or death?
No, I cannot, Master Dudley. All I can say at
present is, that it is my hope and belief, if properly
managed, that he will not die from the hemorrhage,
and that his chance of life depends upon his
weathering out the inflammation mentioned.
There is a reasonable hope then! Thank you,
doctor, thank you; may God send that his life be
spared. Uttering this fervent ejaculation he
joined
his companions, who now held a consultation as
to the most judicious plan of removing the
wounded
youth. One proposed that he should remain
at a cottage upon the island; but the surgeon
decided
that he might be removed in a boat to the
city as easily as he could be carried to the cottage.
He was accordingly extended upon a rude litter,
and deposited in the most convenient boat, upon
such a bed as they could hastily construct of cloaks
and bushes.
They had scarcely emerged from the shrubbery
overhanging the margin of the river, when a
rustling
noise was heard, similar to that made by the
flight of a large flock of birds, and in the next
instant
a shower of Indian arrows fell harmless in
the water, succeeded by an astounding yell of
twenty or more savages, indistinctly seen through
the dense fog rising from the stream. Their light
bark canoes, of variegated colours, could scarcely
be distinguished as they rode upon the waves like
huge aquatic birds. The savage warriors were
standing perfectly erect, notwithstanding the
motion
of the waves and the vigorous exertions of those
squaws who officiated at the oar and helm. Bows
were already strung in their hands, and they were
again in the act of leveling them upon the party,
when Bacon, seizing a duck gun from the bottom
of the boat, fired into the midst of the foremost
canoe. Three huge painted warriors leaped into the
water and yelled and struggled for an instant
before
they sunk to rise no more. Another discharge
of arrows, and another shot from Bacon's weapon,
with like success, considerably damped the ardour
of the pursuit. Bacon and his party had in the
mean time urged the boat containing Beverly and
the surgeon far ahead and out of reach of their
missiles
,
while they protected their retreat. Having
suffered the enemy to come within striking distance,
he was now enabled to see that they were
Chickahominies
,
and readily comprehended their motives.
He was himself the object of their pursuit. They
had watched his movements for the purpose of
avenging the death of their chief and his followers.
So prompt and efficient, however, was the defence
of the party sought, that after a few harmless
flights of arrows, and a few returns from the
fire-arms
of the white party, they hastily retreated, and
in a short time their canoes were only seen like
distant
speeks on the circumscribved horizon, as they
scudded away before the rising volumes of vapour
for fear the dawning day should betray them and
their hostile attitude to the notice of the citizens.
As Bacon and Dudley stepped upon the shore in
front of the palisade, the other party having
landed
and disappeared before their arrival, they stood
to gaze over the water for an instant to ascertain
whether any of the savages yet lingered upon the
scene. The fog was rapidly rising from the water,
so that their line of vision was uninterrupted for
some distance over the bay between the islands.
They could just perceive their late enemies
doubling the southern point of the island upon
which they stood, and were about to retire,
supposing
all further apprehension from that quarter
at an end, when they discovered the dim outlines
of some one upon the southern end of the island,
making signals with a white handkerchief. They
immediately and silently moved along the shore,
under cover of the palisade, until they came
within
such a distance of the object which had attracted
their attention, that they could discern who it was
themselves, at the same time remaining
undiscovered
.
It was Wyanokee! Her appearance at this
early hour and solitary place, and her equivocal
employment, produced the greatest astonishment
and mortification in the mind of Bacon. Until
this moment he would have pledged his life for
her truth and fidelity. Ever since the encounter
with the Indians, he had been wondering in his
own mind, how they had pursued him so exactly
to the secret place of their rendezvous. Now he
recollected that Wyanokee had passed through the
gallery of the State House on the preceding
evening
,
where Dudley and himself were practising.
She might have overhead some of their
conversation
.
Her presence at such a place had excited a
momentary surprise at the time, but it all passed
Vol. I. 17
over, under the usual idea that Wyanokee was
every where. She often glided about like a spirit,
yet no one knew whither she was going, or the
purpose of her movements. Can it be possible,
said Bacon to himself, that Wyanokee has been
treacherous?
All these corroborating circumstances, together
with her present attitude, answered in the
affirmative
.
Notwithstanding the strong conviction of
this unwelcome fact which now settled on his mind,
he could not believe her deliberately bent on his
destruction. He had seen her exhibit many noble
traits of character in trying situations. Besides,
she was somewhat under his protection, and we
are always inclined to love those whom we have
served. She was also Virginia's pupil, and the
latter
was proud of her as such, and he himself had felt
a sort of complacency at the progress of the
maiden
under her tuition. His imagination had often
dwelt upon her imaginary perfections, as so many
reflected beauties from Virginia's guileless heart
and cultivated mind. No, he could not believe
her thus meanly treacherous. Some native
impulse
must have been roused, some secret spring
of her long hidden and dormant nature, must have
been touched. Her savage ideas of patriotism had
fired her to revenge the death of her nation's chief.
Notwithstanding these palliating suggestions
which rose in his mind on the doubtful attitude
in which he had detected her, his reflections were
by no means pleasing, as he locked his arm in
Dudley's, and retired from the shore. Every
thing seemed to him to conspire against his
happiness
.
First, there was the old and ever present
cause of solicitude in relation to his own origin,
the doubtful nature of which had been the remote
cause of the unhappy rencounter of the morning.
Then there was the new attitude in which he was
placed towards Virginia, by the death of her
father, together with the tantalizing, partial
revelations
of the anonymous letters and gold locket,
which that event had thrown into his possession,
with the thousand surmises, half formed hopes,
and resolutions resulting from them. Upon the
whole, however, he could not but feel, in the midst
of these various depressing circumstances, that his
chance for success in an application for the hand
of Virginia was greater with the widowed lady of
the murdered Fairfax than it would have been
were he alive. He knew the high position in
which he stood in that lady's favour. He knew
her contempt for worldly show, pomp and
circumstance
he
had always known it, but now he
knew something of the cause in the revelations of
her own history. He knew that she had boldly
indulged the first predilections of her own young
heart at the expense of her father's and her brother's
favour; and his hopes were strong, that when he
should present himself before her in something of
a like attitude, as an applicant for the hand of her
fair daughter, her own recollections would rise up
before her in his favour. That there would be
difficulties
to surmount, and prejudices to subdue, he
knew full well. That Sir William Berkley would
exert his power to the utmost, to prevent such a
consummation
he also knew; but the consent of Mrs.
Fairfax once gained, he resolved to brave the
opposition
if he could not subdue the prejudices of
the Governor.
The unhappy business of the morning would in
all probability hasten the contending elements to a
crisis. The Governor would soon know of the
meeting and its result; he would in all probability
inquire into the cause of the quarrel, and his
shrewd insight into the motives of human action
would very soon discover that there were hidden
impulses operating, which caused the insult to be
given, and kindred ones in the opposite party
which rendered the offence so much the more
heinous
and unpardonable. In short, he would discover
that there was a lady at the bottom of the whole
affair; and that this lady was his own fair niece;
and that the two gentlemen who had just
contended
in deadly strife, were rivals for the possession
of her favour. Such being the process of
reasoning
in the Governor's mind, Bacon knew him too
well to suppose that he would delay the matter
long before he endeavoured to bring it to a
conclusion
.
Indeed he believed (and the reader knows
how truly) that his excellency already saw the
advantages
of the connexion as vividly as his nephew
apprehended the sterling qualities of the lady.
Such being the case, the result of the morning's
meeting, if it did not prove fatal to his rival's life,
would in all probability precipitate the matter at
once to an issue. The Governor would no sooner
ascertain that Beverly was out of danger than he
would take the business in his own hands, and how
he would manage it, and what means he would take
to accomplish his ends, Bacon's personal
experience
in other matters fully taught him. He
resolved
therefore to be beforehand with him, to
present his own claims first, to attempt to
conciliate
the lady of his late patron, before her ear had
been poisoned by the violent abuse which he knew
would be heaped upon him, as well as by contempt
for his origin. But could he imbrue his hand in
the blood of his rival and then present it for
acceptance
?
Could he precipitate his claims before
the family in their present melancholy state?
These were the subjects of his reflection, as the
two youths entered the gates of the city,and here
another difficulty arose; if he should immediately
present himself before the family, the news of the
meeting having preceded him, even without
broaching
the subject before alluded to, would not the
feelings excited in the mind of Virginia and her
mother be unfavourable to his claims? Then again,
should he leave rumour with her hundred tongues
to explain to the maiden the reasons which had
induced
him to accept the challenge from her
kinsman
,
would not his cause be still more prejudiced?
Finally, therefore, after taking all these things into
consideration, he came to the conclusion that it
17*
was best to wait some favourable news from his
wounded rival before presenting himself, or in case
of the worst result, to absent himself from the city
altogether for a time.
Accordingly the youths bent their footsteps to
Dudley's lodgings, there to await intelligence
concerning
Beverly. It is hardly necessary to
remind
the reader that duelling in that day, so far
from being considered criminal, was the sole test
to which all differences between gentlemen were
submitted. The influence of the custom has been
handed down, variously modified by the
circumstances
of the times, from one generation to
another
,
until it has reached our own.
CHAPTER XV.
For
more than a week Frank Beverly lay in
the most precarious state, and more than once
during
that period his friends were summoned to his
bed-side, expecting every moment to be his last.
Bacon, torn and racked with suspense, moved
about the house of his late patron like one
distracted
.
He had already made his peace with
Virginia, by explaining to her the unequivocal and
unconditional demand for satisfaction made upon
him by Beverly, as well as the unjustifiable taunt
upon the field, by which he had been driven from his
defensive attitude. But even her society failed in
its usual attractions, while Beverly remained in
danger. Doctor Roland, with all his technical
formality
,
was as indefatigable in his attentions as he
was oracular and mysterious in his announcements
from hour to hour, and day to day, concerning the
state of his patient. These, reported to his master
from the lips of Brien O'Reily, would form no
unamusing
subject for the reader, were not our
attention
called to the more important personages and
graver incidents of our narrative.
As Bacon had surmised, Sir William Berkley
was not long in understanding the real cause of
the quarrel; he had himself heard partial reports
of the affront and its cause on the night of its
occurrence
.
As Bacon had also expected, he
seemed
to await the fate of his young kinsman, before
he took any farther steps towards promoting the
alliance between him and Virginia. This
however
did not prevent him from giving way to the
most ungovernable rage at Frank's condescension
in meeting an adventurer, the son of no one knew
whom.
At length the invalid was unequivocally
pronounced
to be out of danger, by Dr. Roland
himself
.
The Governor had no sooner received the
information, than he despatched a footman with
his most respectful compliments to Mrs. Fairfax,
and requested the pleasure of an hour's
conversation
with her, on the most important business; in
answer to which, a message was returned to the
Governor, that she would be pleased to see him, at
any moment which might suit his convenience.
That time soon arrived, and the formal old
gentleman
,
after many apologies for the untimely
intrusion
upon the privacy of her sorrows, and
condolence
for their cause, thus introduced the subject
to which he solicited her attention.
It was perhaps not known to you, Madam,
that your late lamented husband and myself had
long since formed a prospective arrangement, by
which we hoped to dispose of our fortunes in such
a manner as to add honour and dignity to our
families
,
at the same time that we should preserve
them united, and confer happiness upon our
nearest
relatives and presumptive heirs. His will, as
I understand, has not yet been authenticated, but
doubtless when it is so you will find that he has
provided for the fulfilment of this design.
I do not fully comprehend your Excellency.
I mean, madam, that we contemplated uniting
in marriage, your fair daughter and my young
kinsman, Beverly; by this means I will be enabled
to entail my fortune on their male descendants,
which will meet all my desires concerning my
niece, at the same time that it will be doing no
injustice
to my young relative.
The plan seems ingeniously contrived, Sir
William, to prevent future heart-burnings
concerning
the disposal of your estate; but were the young
people to know nothing of the arrangement?
The knowledge of it was kept from them, at
the suggestion of your late lamented husband, in
order that they might imbibe no prejudices against
the scheme as they grew up, but rather be thrown
into each other's way, as the time for its
consummation
approached, and thus perhaps discover its
propriety themselves. This has in part proved
true, for on the very day of the unfortunate
accident
which deprived your house of its inestimable
head, I had the honour to lay Frank's proposals
before him.
Sir WilliamI do not know my daughter's
sentiments on the subject,the fulfilment of the
scheme will depend entirely on her feelings.
With due deference, madam, would it not be
more politic to treat the matter as already, and
long since settled, between her father and myself,
and sacredly sealed by his death?
I must be plain and candid with your
Excellency
I
have no desire to use policy in the affair;
if my daughter gives her free and hearty consent,
you have mine; but if the match is repugnant to
her feelings we will drop the subject, with many
thanks to your Excellency for your kind purposes,
and to Mr. Beverly for the intended honour.
Virginia was now called in; but while the
servant
performed that duty, Sir William replied,
I am exceedingly mortified, madam, that you
seem to place the fulfilment of this long-treasured
scheme upon a contingency so light.
Do you then consider a young lady's being
permitted to have a voice in choosing her partner
for life, a light contingency, Sir William?
I think, madam, that her parents are more
capable of making a selection which will confer
honour upon them and her, than she can possibly
be. Our best families would soon arrive at a very
plebeian level, were every female descendant to be
permitted to indulge her love sick fancies, instead
of consulting the interest and honour of her house.
But it may be that this discussion is useless in the
present instance. Here, madam, comes your
daughter
,
who will decide.
Virginia entered, pale and trembling with alarm
and vague presentiments of evil; her hands were
crossed upon her breast, and her eyes downcast.
After making a reverential courtesy to the
Governor
,
she instinctively stood before him, awaiting
his commands as one upon trial. However harsh
the Governor's opinions to the mother, policy
dictated a very different course toward the
daughter
;
he accordingly led her to a seat beside
himself
,
and with the most bland and courteous
manner
,
thus addressed her,
I come, my niece, as an ambassador from poor
Frank, with full powers to ask of your mother
this fair hand in marriage; and I must take the
same opportunity to declare the happiness it would
give Lady Berkley and myself, to receive you into
our mansion as the wife of our kinsman, and the
daughter of our affections.
The mildness and the unusual condescension of
her formal uncle completely threw Virginia from
the stately and unequivocal answer which she had
meditated when first summoned; for it will be
recollected
that she had already had an intimation
of his intentions. She could do no less than feel
grateful for his own undoubted affection, and she
felt it extremely difficult properly to express this
feeling, connected as it must be with the
overthrow
of his dearest hopes. After the most painful
embarrassment, she was enabled to answer: To
you, my dear uncle, I have always felt grateful
for the more than paternal affection which you
have shown to me, and I must feel not less
so for the motives which prompted you to
undertake the present mission; but with all my
affection for yourself and desire to please you, and
all my gratitude to Mr. Beverly for the honour
which he intended me, I must beg leave to decline
his offer.
Wherefore must you decline it, Virginia?
asked Sir William, with the most evident chagrin
and surprise.
Simply because I cannot reciprocate the
affection
which I am informed Mr. Beverly entertains
for me.
You have never made the trial, niece; you
have not taken five minutes to consider the
importance
of the proposition which I have had the
honour to lay before you. Reconsider your hasty
answer; take time to form a mature opinion of the
many advantages which the connexion holds out.
See Frank himself when he recovers, and my word
for it, he will make as many love-sick speeches as
would woo a lady from Charles' court.
It is not necessary, my dear uncle; I have long
meditated upon the subject, having by accident
heard of the proposed union before you were
pleased to communicate it in person.
What is your objection to Frank? It is
certainly
no satisfactory answer, to say you cannot
reciprocate his affection, when you have never
yet given him an opportunity to plead his cause
in person. He is unquestionably as well favoured
a youth in regard to personal attributes, as any in
the Colony, and I flatter myself as well born and
of as bright expectations?
I have no objections to urge, Sir William;
Mr. Beverly is undoubtedly all that you say he is,
but he never can be more to me than he is at
present
;
for this determination I have many reasons
satisfactory to my own sense of propriety, but
which it is neither necessary nor proper for me to
urge. One I will however give you, with the hope
of for ever setting the question at rest. My
affections
are already engaged!
Had a thunderbolt hurled the old Cavalier from
his seat, he could not have been more astounded.
Mrs. Fairfax was scarcely less so. Sir William
glanced from her countenance to that of her
daughter
,
as if he expected the former to overwhelm her
daughter with reproaches, his own anger all the
while displaying itself in the contortions of his
inflamed
and glowing countenance. But seeing her
astonishment subsiding into complacency instead
of anger, his own broke forth
What! bestow your affections unasked? and
upon whom pray!
I have not bestowed them unasked, Sir.
Has any gentleman asked and obtained
permission
of you, to address your daughter? he
inquired, turning to Mrs. Fairfax.
None, Sir.
Who then is the favoured swain? Who has
dared
to interfere in this matter unauthorized by the
Vol. I. 18
consent of your only surviving parent or
myself
?
For him I have neither the right nor the will
to speak. At the proper time he will doubtless
do it for himself, said Virginia, as she arose with
offended dignity to leave the room.
Hear me yet a moment, cried Sir William,
with the most ill disguised efforts to appear calm.
If the person, who has thus intruded into your
family, is of proper birth, connexions, and
expectations
,
and his suit should meet with your mother's
approbation, I of course have no right to interfere.
But remember, should you attempt to form an
alliance
with an individual who would disgrace my
family
,
to which you are nearly connected, I will, if
there be none other to perform the office, with
mine own hands tear him from the very foot of the
altar, and mete to him such a reward as his
temerity
demands.
At this moment the door opened, and Nathaniel
Bacon entered, with an expression of unalloyed
delight upon his countenance. He had just heard
the joyful tidings from the medical attendant of
his rival. He met Virginia face to face, just
within
the sweep of the door, and perceiving no other
object at the moment, attempted gayly to seize
her hand, but no corresponding movement being
perceptible, he paused to examine her countenance,
at the same time glancing at the offended visiter,
whose scowling eyes were fixed upon him.
Virginia's
countenance was like a mirror to reflect her
feelings, and had there been no intelligible
expression
upon the face of the Governor, Bacon would
readily have comprehended the attitude of the
various
parties. These observations, however, were
the work of an instant, for Sir William no sooner
perceived his presence, than he sprung to his feet,
his brow growing darker every moment. He
had entirely misinterpreted Bacon's appearance at
that critical juncture. His suspicions had all along
pointed to him, and he now imagined that his
presence
was the result of preconcerted design. To
what motive, Sir, he cried, am I indebted
for this intrusion? Have you come to
congratulate
me upon the recovery of my young kinsman,
of whom your murderous hand had well nigh
deprived
me?
Bacon wheeled partly upon his heel, as if
endeavouring
to force himself out of the room,
without
answering the choleric old Cavalier, but seeing
Virginia turn her head and cast an indignant glance
at the offender, his own hard schooled feelings
broke forth also. To no particular motive, Sir,
are you indebted for this visit: it was the result of
the purest accident. I knew not that your
Excellency
was in the house, and came into this room
in the ordinary free and unchallenged mode of
intercourse
,
to which the inmates of this most
hospitable
and generous family are accustomed.
Ay, Sir Stripling, and unless I am grossly
deceived, your intercourse has not gone
unchallenged
for nothing.
To what is your Excellency pleased to allude.
Have you not studiously endeavoured to
undermine
the most important family arrangements
of those who cherished and protected your infancy?
Have you not stung the bosom that warmed you
into existence? Have you not been callous to the
claims of gratitude, due alike to the living and the
dead? Have you not attempted to beguile the
only daughter of your patron into a disgraceful
alliance?
Bacon resisted the mild and persuasive
endeavours
of Mrs. Fairfax to lead him from the room,
whence Virginia had already departed, while he
replied, drawing himself up to an erect and
perfectly
composed and dignified attitude,
If your Excellency chooses so far to forget,
what is alike due to your stationto yourself, to
the present company, and to me, as to permit
yourself
to ask such questions, you cannot expect me
so far to forget myself as to answer them! and
with this reply he left the room.
The Governor, after indulging in the most
vehement
bursts of passion, and threats of vengeance
against Bacon, should he dare to connect
himself
with his family, and in vain endeavours to
extort a promise from Mrs. Fairfax, never to give
her consent, left the house in the most towering
and ungovernable rage.
He had scarcely crossed the threshold, before
Bacon returned to the same room, leading Virginia
by the hand, having held a very interesting
conversation
with her in another apartment. Mrs.
Fairfax was sitting apparently absorbed in the
most painful reflections. As the youthful pair
entered
,
a slight clearing away of the clouds which
had gathered upon her countenance might be
perceived
.
They walked deliberately up to where
she sat, and seated themselves one on each side of
her: when Bacon thus spoke
It was not my intention, dear madam, thus to
intrude upon your sorrows, but I may be
pardoned
for presenting myself as a petitioner at your
feet, when another, high in station and dignity,
has thought proper to forget those claims. Had he
confined himself to the legitimate object of his
mission
,
I had perhaps still forborne, but when he has
stepped out of his way rudely to thrust me before
you as the disorganizer of your family
arrangements
,
and as the serpent who has stolen into your
house in order to poison your brightest hopes and
fondest anticipations, I have thought it became me
at once to state to you how far I have offended.
It is true, dear madam, that I have not been
insensible
to the many charms of your daughter's
person and disposition. You have witnessed, I
would fain hope, not unobservantly, the dear
delights
of our first childish intercourse, when our
minds and hearts were drawn together by an
affection
and a congeniality of taste and sentiment
which we supposed, if we thought of it at all, was
purely fraternal; and then when our minds began to
expand, and our affections to assume and to display
18*
their real character, and finally when we came
thoroughly to understand each other and ourselves,
you were not a heedless spectator of these
progressive
changes and developments; and having
seen, I cannot believe that you would have
permitted
this mutual affection to grow to its present
maturity and strength, intending to deny its
sanction
at the last, when the cure might so easily have
been made by nipping the tender flower in the
bud. Speak, I pray you madam! Our fate hangs
upon your words!
I will not pretend to you, my children, that I
have not observed the mutual affection which has
grown up between you from its earliest dawn.
Nor will I disguise from you that it gave me
pleasure
mingled with much pain. Many long and
dreary nights have I lain upon my pillow,
anticipating
what I then supposed would be the fierce
struggles of this moment. I calculated with the
usual short sightedness of mortals, that he who
will ne'er partake in our councils more, would have
been here to decide upon your wishes.
I supposed that his own family pride would first
have been to conquer, then I thought of the fierce
resistance which the greater pride of his kinsman,
Sir William, would offerthe interview of this
morning shows how truly. After all these
painful
misgivings, however, and the maturest
judgment
that I could bestow upon the subject, I came
to the resolution to suffer what seemed the
predestined
current of events to run its course.
Providence
has by a most painful process removed the
only obstacle you had to fear, my children, and
he, had he been alive, would doubtless have finally
given his consent rather than attempt to tear up
forcibly by its roots a passion like yours, the
growth of years and intimate knowledge of each
other. I therefore give you my consent, my
children
,
that you be united in marriage, and the sooner
the better, as the first storm upon its announcement
once over, all these contending passions which drive
you into broils and strife will cease.
As she concluded speaking, Virginia, down
whose cheeks the tears had been rapidly coursing
each other, sunk upon her knees, in which position
she was instantly joined by her now acknowledged
and betrothed lover. Mrs. Fairfax placed her
hands upon their heads, tears bedimming her own
eyes, and blessed them, and then kissed her
daughter
as she was about to leave the room. When she
was gone, Bacon resumed the subject of their
discourse
.
O say, dear Madam, how soon will you
consent to the completion of our happiness? I
address
myself to you in the first instance, in order
that I may use your name in my appeal to your
daughter for an early day.
As soon as you can persuade Virginia to
consent
.
I would seriously and earnestly recommend
two things with regard to your nuptials, the rest I
leave to yourselves, namely, that they take place
as privately as possible, for fear of Sir William's
violence; and secondly, as soon as possible, in
order
that you may anticipate the complete recovery
of young Mr. Beverly.
Oh, madam, may Heaven bless your wisdom
and benevolence. I am now doubly armed, and
will seek your daughter, and I hope soon return
with a favourable answer.
Accordingly he flew out of the room, and in a
few moments she heard him loudly calling her
daughter's name through all the portals of the
house, and rapping at every door, but no Virginia
was to be found. At length, however, he sallied
forth into the garden, when he found her in her
summer-house, apparently in profound study of
some favourite Author's new publication, perhaps
Milton's Paradise Regained. His arguments
fell apparently upon a deaf ear. She continued
to read, regardless of his passionate gesticulations
and burning words. Her cheeks glowed vividly
enough, but she gave no other evidence that she
was conscious of his presence. At length he
seized her hand, and forcibly but gently led her
before her mother, like a culprit, as she
doubtless
felt herself, for her eyes were downeast, and
a crimson blush suffused her neck and temples.
Mrs. Fairfax attempted in vain to assume a grave
and judicial expression. She succeeded, however,
in convincing the young pair that the safety and
the peace of many of their family circle depended
upon their speedy nuptials. It was doubtless for
these reasons alone, that they soon agreed amicably
upon an early day, until which time we will leave
the imagination of the reader to follow the young
pair through flowery beds of roses and tulips, and
the more flowery anticipations of Love's young
dream.
CHAPTER XVI.
The
appointed day at length arrivedit was
ushered in by no cheering omens from without or
within the mansion of Mrs. Fairfax. No warbling
songsters from the feathered tribes perched upon
the window of our heroine, or hopped from
flower
to flower through the graden beneath, to woo
her from her slumbers; and the heavens themselves
gave lowering and sultry evidence of an
approaching
storm. In the east it was misty and unsettled;
while a long curtain of dark frowning clouds,
heavily charged with electric fire, hung in
portentous
masses along the whole line of the western
horizon. The atmosphere was hot and oppressive,
the whole aspect of the weather such as invariably
casts a damp upon the spirits.
Virginia required no sweet serenade to call
her from her slumbers. She was already awake,
as indeed she had been through most of the night.
A feverish dread of undefined approaching evil,
had dimly floated through her excited brain during
her waking hours, and yet more shadowy horrors
disturbed her partial and unrefreshing sleep. Her
morning habiliments were donned earlier than
usual, without the assistance of her Indian
attendant
;
yet she marvelled at her unwonted absence.
She usually slept in an adjoining apartment, and
hither Virginia bent her steps to chide the tardy
maiden for her strange neglect on so important an
occasion. No little surprise was visible in her
countenance, when she found not only the
apartment
untenanted, but that the bed upon which
Wyanokee usually slept, was undisturbed, or that
if used at all, it had been slightly disarranged, only
as if with a deceptive purpose. She repeated her
name throughout the house and garden, but no
answer
was returned. Her voice soon aroused her
mother, who was no less surprised at the
circumstances
related by her daughter. Together they
went to the apartment, and again examined the
bed, which had evidently not been slept in. And
now other appearances struck them, which had
not before attracted their attention. The dress
she had worn on the previous day, hung in a closet
answering the purposes of a wardrobe, together
with the whole of her apparel, the gift of Virginia
or her mother. Not an article could be recollected
of these, which was not there. They seemed,
moreover, to have been studiously arranged so
as to attract attention in this particular. On
the other hand, every garment of Indian fabric
which she had preserved through her captivity,
was gone. The moccasins she had worn on the
previous daythe Indian beads, wampum, and
other ornaments of native origin, were nowhere
to be seen.
All the gifts of Bacon and Mr. Fairfax, some of
which were of gold and silver, were conspicuously
arranged upon a shelf in the same apartment.
Many of these she had hitherto constantly worn
in her ears, and upon her wrists and ankles.
As they were pursuing their researches
Virginia
discovered the window of the room in which
her attendant had always slept, shut down upon
the end of an Indian arrow. She raised the sash
and drew in the missile, in the end of which,
inserted
in a split and bound with a strip of the fibre
of a sinew, was the identical blue feather Wyanokee
had plucked from the gory locks of the slain King
Fisher, the last of the Chickahominy chiefs. The
arrow was pointed in the direction of the nation's
hunting ground. The language of these symbols
Virginia understood but too well; she had too
long made Wyanokee a subject of study, as well as
of instruction, not to understand that the feather
indicated her flight to the dwellings of her tribe.
She also thought she saw many collateral
indications
in the time chosen for her elopementthe
arrangements of her English garments, and more
especially of the gifts she had received from
Bacon
.
She doubted not in her own mind that the
resolution of Wyanokee was in some way
connected
with the approaching ceremony, but she did not
communicate her suspicions to her mother, because
they were as yet not clearly defined in her own
thoughts. They received momentary
corroboration
however, as many circumstances recurred to
her mind, which were trivial in themselves, but
important in connexion with the present
discovery
,
and which have been from time to time
hinted at in the progress of our narrative.
The impression left upon the mind of our
Heroine
by these incidents produced any thing but the
joyous, elastic and happy mood, her young dreams
had always anticipated for her wedding day. There
were many other subjects of apprehension to mar
the pleasures of the time. Governor Berkley had
left her mother's house overflowing with wrath,
and threatening speedy vengeance against her
betrothed
.
Few persons ever became indebted to Sir
William
Berkley in a matter of personal hatred or ill
will, who did not sooner or later find him a hard
and exacting creditor. With all her love for her
uncle she knew his harsh and unyielding nature,
and dreaded his power.
The natural apprehensions of a modest, gentle,
and tenderly educated maiden on her wedding day,
are at all times sufficiently powerful of themselves;
but joined to the unfavourable omens and sources
of anxiety by which Virginia was surrounded,
they were overpowering. Her breakfast remained
before her untouched, notwithstanding her
mother's
endeavours to cheer her drooping spirits.
A short and animated conversation with her
lover, as the day began to wane, partially recalled
her wonted cheerfulness, but when he was gone
she relapsed into her former mood. The aspect
Vol. I. 19
of the heavens seemed to her to grow
momentarily
more portentous. Already the thunder was
heard rolling in the west, and black masses of
threatening clouds were gradually closing in from
every point of the horizon. The wrath of Heaven
itself seemed to our heroine gathering over the
city. This nervous excitement of mind will not
be wondered at when it is remembered that a short
time only had intervened since dark and
mysterious
injunctions had been urged against the marriage,
of which the appointed time was now so near at
hand; and to this must be added the state of alarm
and agitation in which she had since been kept by
insurrections, outrages, personal strifes and deadly
feuds between her friends; and above all, by the
violent and sudden death of her father. In the
short space of a few weeks her once tranquil and
happy existence had been changed into one of
painful
trials and vicissitudes. The night was rapidly
closing in. There hung the bridal garments, and
there stood the tire woman waiting her commands.
At this juncture a carriage drove up to the door,
steps were let down, the knocker sounded, and in
the next moment the gay brides-maid bounded into
the room, arrayed for the occasion. Her
countenance
was radiant with smiles as she entered, but
perceiving her friend's sombre mood she walked
round her sundry times and then raised her hands
and eyes in pretended astonishment, as she
exclaimed
,
Do I mistake! Was it indeed to your
wedding
that I was invited? For shame, Virginia!
shake off these sickly fancies. Come, rouse
yourself
,
and I will be your tire woman. Our family
will soon be here, the carriage has gone back for
them. Will that not move you? Then your
lawful
lord and
Here Virginia rose and placed her hand upon
the lips of the lively girl, yet with a look which
seemed at the same time to intimate no
unwillingness
to be cajoled or rallied from her present
serious
humour.
The wedding was to be kept a profound secret
from all but the invited guests, and those who
were to officiate at the ceremony. The former
consisted only of Mr. Harrison's family, and the
latter of the clergyman of the Established Church,
who officiated at JamestownCharles Dudley who
was to give away the bride, and Harriet as
brides-maid
.
The appointed hour of nine at length arrived.
Assembled in the parlour below, the various
parties
awaited the appearance of the bride.
Carriages
were already at the door; the chapel
lighted
,
and the priest habited in the robes of his
sacred
office.
Bacon, after sundry movements towards the
door at which she was expected to enter, could
subdue his impatience no longer, and at once
mounted
the staircase. He met the two maidens on
their way down; Virginia apparently having
imbibed
some of her friend's spirit and vivacity,
which she so much needed. She placed her hand
timidly but confidingly in that of Bacon as they
entered the room. Both she, and her attendant,
were robed in virgin whiteand certainly never
were dresses more appropriate;they were both
young, innocent, beautiful, and intensely
interesting
,
in the position which they now occupied.
Bacon and Dudley were dressed exactly alike,
and rather in the costume of the preceding, than
of the present reign; the latter not yet having
made its way to Jamestown. They wore doublets
of scarlet velvet, with large loose sleeves slashed
up the front; the collar covered by a falling band
of the richest point lace, with a vandyke edging.
Their breeches were of white silk, and fringed at
the bottom, where they united with their silk
stockings, amidst a profusion of ribands and
ornaments
of lace. Their shoes were ornamented
over the buckle straps, with white bridal roses
wrought in silk. Hanging gallantly upon one
shoulder, they wore the short and graceful blue
cloak of the period: not in such a manner,
however
,
as to conceal in any degree the gay
appearance
of the costume which it completed, but
so as to be thrown aside and resumed at a moment's
notice. This latter article being light and graceful,
and worn more for ornament than use, was always
thrown aside for the military buff coat on
warlike
occasions.
The party, preceded by the priest, entered the
waiting vehicles. Just as they were seated
according
to the order of previous arrangement,
vivid flash of lightning shot athwart the horizon,
succeeded by a crash of thunder loud and fearful,
as if the eternal hills themselves had again been
shattered into chaos. The females drew
themselves
into the corners of the carriage, covering
their eyes, and the gentlemen were silent, while
the God of the Universe, spoke through his
thunders
.
The drive to the church was as short as it was
silent. The priest entered his desk and laid open
the sacred volume, while the various parties
arranged
according to order in a semicircle round the
altar, waited upon his words.
The chapel was dimly lighted, except
immediately
around the parties, in accordance with the
strict privacy of the celebration. Mrs. Fairfax
was as calm and benignant as was consistent with
her usual settled melancholy. Virginia was pale
as a marble statue, her head just sufficiently
inclined
forward to suspend her bridal veil in
graceful
and flowing folds before her exquisitely
formed
figure. Harriet's vivacity was subdued to
respectful
and mute attention. The sound of the
clergyman's voice could just be heard at intervals
between the awful peals of thunder, while the
lurid
flashes contrasting with the feeble rays of the
lamps, rendered the surrounding gloom more
impressive
.
The words which fell from the lips of
the sacred functionary were something like the
following:
Dearly beloved, we are gathered together here
19 *
in the sight of God, and in the face of this
company
,
to join together this Man and this Woman
in holy matrimony; which is an honourable estate
instituted of God in the time of man's innocency,
signifying unto us the mystical union that is
betwixt
Christ and his church; which holy estate
Christ adorned and beautified with his presence and
first miracle that he wrought in Cana of Galilee;
and is commended of Saint Paul to be honourable
among all men; and therefore is not by any to be
enterprised or taken in hand unadvisedly
lightly
,
or wantonlyto satisfy men's carnal lusts and
appetites, like brute beasts that have no
understanding
;
but reverently, discreetly, advisedly,
soberly
,
and in fear of God, duly considering the
causes for which matrimony was ordained.
First, it was ordained for the procreation of
children to be brought up in the fear and nurtare
of the Lord, and to the praise of his holy name.
Secondly, it was ordained for a remedy against
sin, and to avoid fornication, that such persons as
have not the gift of continency might marry and
keep themselves undefiled members of Christ's
body.
Thirdly, it was ordained for the mutual society,
help, and comfort that the one ought to have of
the otherboth in prosperity and adversity.
Into which holy estate, these two persons
present
come now to be joined. Therefore if any man
can show any just cause, why they may not law
fully be joined together, let him now speak, or else
hereafter for ever hold his peace.
A solemn silence prevailed through the dimly
lighted aisles, as the usual pause was allowed for
the answer. At this juneture, and while the small
party around the altar held their breath in mute
astonishment and wonder, the door was rudely
thrust open, and a gigantic figure strode down the
hollow sounding aisle. His heavy footfalls rung
upon Virginia's sensitive organs like the funeral
knell of departed peace. He walked directly
towards
the altar, until he stood immediately behind
the youthful pair about to plight their faith, his
tall figure towering far above their heads.
[5]
[5]
The reader will perceive when the proper time comes for
disclosing from what authentic annals this character is takenthat
we have but described his person as the grave words of History
portrayed him.
Over
his face he held a black mask, as he thus spoke, in
answer to the general challenge of the priest.
Well mayest thou say that now or never is the
time to speak the just cause which interposes to
prevent the consummation of this union. That
cause know I! But its revelation, now rendered
imperative, will be like unto tearing up with
irreverent hands the mysterious secrets of the
charnel house beneath our feet. Oh God, why
could not this duty have been spared to me!
His huge frame shuddered with convulsive
emotion
as he paused and seemed to view from
beneath
his mask his astounded and breathless
auditors
.
The clergyman seized the opportunity to
repeat with solemnity the challenge. If any
man can show any just cause why this youthful pair
may not lawfully be joined together, let him now
speak, or else hereafter for ever hold his peace!
They cannot lawfully be joined together
because
they are the children of the same mother!
The silence of death prevailed throughout the
chapel. Respiration and reflection itself seemed
suspended upon the awful announcement of the
Recluse
,
while he fell back upon one of the seats of
the aisle and covered his face with his hands in
unutterable anguish.
Mrs. Fairfax had been visibly agitated from the
first moment of this startling interruption, by some
more dreadful emotion than the surprise and vague
alarm of those about her, but now desperation
itself
nerved her sinking powers, as she stepped a
pace forward and uttered in a distinct voice. It
is false! proceed with the ceremony.
Harrison
and Dudley instinctively felt for their arms,
the former exclaiming, He is madstaring mad!
be it our business to prevent this irreverent
interruption
!
But the Recluse immediately sprung upon his
feet, throwing his mask upon the floor as he stood
full in front of Mrs. Fairfax, and exclaimed,
pointing
with his index finger to his time-worn
countenance
;
Look thou upon these long forgotten
lineaments, and then upon these (laying his hand
upon Bacon's head) and testify before Heaven and
earth whether I have not spoken truth! a fearful
truth!
The person appealed to stood for some moments
like a statue, her eyes protruding from their
sockets
,
as if a tenant of the grave indeed stood before
herher hand at length slowly rose from her side
and wandered through the vacant air as if she
would have submitted the spectre to the test of
feelingimperfectly measuring the distance
however
between her own person and the object sought,
it fell again powerless by her side. Her lips
moved
as if she were in the act of holding a
conversation
with the being who had addressed her, but no
sound issued from them. The pupils of her eyes
were painfully distended, and their whole
expression
wild and bewildered. At length her chest
began to have convulsively, when she made a
wild and desperate effort to rush upon the object
of her gaze, but fell prostrate on the floor before
she had attained half the distance between them.
As she fell she cried in the most piteous accents,
Charles! Charles! and then swooned away.
Charles Dudley, who had till now assisted Bacon
in supporting his fainting bride, resigned his charge
to Mr. Harrison and ran to Mrs.Fairfax, supposing
himself to be the person thus piteously
apostrophized
.
He took the fallen lady in his arms and
raised her partly from the floor, but no symptoms
of returning animation were visible. While he
thus supported her head upon one knee, kneeling
upon the other, assisted by the clergyman and
friends, and Bacon and Mr. Harrison supporting
Virginia, who was in little better condition, a
tumultuous
crowd rushed in at the door, headed by
Sir William Berkley himself, exclaiming to his
minions, Tear him from the altar! tear the
upstart from the altar.
But as he ran with his drawn sword towards
the pulpit, something in the attitude and
expression
of the various parties at once arrested his
hand and voice.
There is a power of expression in deep and
irremediable
sorrow which cannot be looked upon
without emotion. Boisterous and outrageous as Sir
William Berkley had entered the chapel, his fierce
nature was instantly subdued by the appearance of
his sister-in-law and her daughter. The crowd
which followed were instinctively awed into
silence
by the same powerful and speaking appeals.
When the announcement of the lawful cause
which prevented the consummation of the union
first fell upon Bacon's ear, his head sank upon his
breast, and although he mechanically clasped
Virginia
round the waist, as he felt her clinging to
him, and sinking at his side; he stood stupified
with horror, holding up his lifeless burden,
entirely
enable to think or act. His habitual and
superstitious
reverence for every thing uttered by the
Recluse, induced him to receive the first
impression
of his words unchallenged even in his own
mind.
By the time that Sir William Berkley and his
party arrived, the Recluse had disappeared; every
one was so much absorbed by the instant and
pressing calls for assistance and sympathy from
the suffering females, that the time of his departure
was entirely unnoticed.
The Governor had no sooner recovered from
his first shock and surprise, than he made his way
to one of the young Harrisons to learn the cause
of the present appearance of the parties, so
different
from what he had been taught to expect.
Although
he did not believe that there was one
word of truth in the cause assigned for the
interruption
of the ceremony, he was well enough
satisfied that the parties themselves, and Mrs.
Fairfax should believe it. No matter to him what
horrors they suffered, he considered it all but a
just punishment for their attempted mesalliance.
As for Bacon, and his horror-stricken feelings,
Sir William did not deign to bestow a thought
or word upon them, after the first hasty
exclamation
with which he had entered the door. By
his orders, the female sufferers were placed in a
carriage, and removed to his own house. Bacon
resigned his charge with a listless apathy,
bordering
on stupefaction, and to a superficial observer,
such would doubtless have been the impression;
but his was the deadly deceitful calm which
precedes
the coming storm. The most horrible of
all human sufferings is that where no tear is or can
be shedwhere no enemy presents himself for
vengeanceno hope for the future, all having
been perilled and lost upon a single throw. Bacon
felt himself thus situatedthe cherished hopes of a
lifetime were blasted in an instant, not only for the
present, but under such circumstances as to cut off
all hope for the future. The object of his passion
could not henceforth be enshrined in a holy secret
worship of the soul, such as is sometimes kept up
through a long life of celibacy for the lost one.
No mortified pride arose to his relief! he could
not hatehe dared not love the object around
which his whole heart and soul were entwined.
The very light of his eyesthe sun of his
existence
his
delights of the presenthopes of the
futureall, all were blotted from existence in a
moment. The very retrospects of the past were
poisoned. Could he bear to dwell upon the
enrapturing
delights of their young loves, when
the object and participator was now discovered to
be his own sister? To whichever aspect of the
case he turned, he as speedily revolted in horror.
It was while these things were tearing and
racking
his soul, that he appeared to feel externally
less than might have been expected. His mind
and feelings were precipitately rolled back upon
their own resources, and the suddenly dammed
up waters of bitterness sought vent at every
avenue
.
Virginia was no sooner taken from him,
however, than his perceptions seemed roused at
once to the full horror and hopelessness of his
fate. Without his castor, and still decked in his gay
bridal attire, he burst from the crowd, prostrating
the Governor's minions to the right and left, as he
felled a passage to the door. His eye had lost its
abstracted expression; it was deadly fierce and
terrifically wild as he rushed forth into the kindred
storm withoutno one knew whither.
END OF VOLUME FIRST.Jamestown,
June , 16.
To Nathaniel Bacon, Esq.
Sir
I seize the first moment of your
appearance
in public, restored to health, to demand the
satisfaction due for the grievous insult put upon
me, on the night of the Anniversary Celebration,
16*
in presence of the assembled gentry of the Colony.
All proper arrangements will be made by my
friend Ludwell, who will also await your answer.
I have the honour to be your most obedient
servant
,
Francis Beverly
.
Bacon's answer was no less courteous and
explicit.Berkley Arms,
June , 16.
To Francis Beverly, Esq.
Sir
Your note by the hands of Mr. Ludwell
was this moment received. Your challenge is
accepted
.
To-morrow morning at sunrise I will
meet you. The length of my weapon will be
furnished by my friend Dudley, who will convey
this to Mr. Ludwell, as well as make all other
arrangements on my behalf. I have the honour
to be, yours, &c.
Nathaniel Bacon
.